
THE LIBRARY 

OF 

THE UNIVERSITY 

OF CALIFORNIA 
LOS ANGELES 



Soviet Marxism 



STUDIES OF THE 

RUSSIAN INSTITUTE 

Columbia University 



Soviet Marxism 



A CRITICAL ANALYSIS 



By Herbert Marcuse 



4" 

\tlf/ 



NEW YORK 

COLUMBIA UNIVERSITY PRESS 



The transliteration system used in this series is based on the Library of 
Congress system, with some modifications 



COPYRIGHT © 1958 COLUMBIA UNIVERSITY PRESS, NEW YORK 

First printing 1958 
Fourth printing 1969 

Published in Great Britain by Routledf^e Sc Kegan Paul Ltd. 



LIBRARY OF CONGRESS CATALOG CARD NUMBER: 57-10943 



PRINTED IN THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA 






C) 



The Russian Institute of Columbia University 



THE RUSSIAN INSTITUTE was established by Columbia Uni- 
versity in 1946 to serve two major objectives: the training 
of a limited number of well-qualified Americans for 
scholarly and professional careers in the field of Russian 
studies and the development of research in the social 
sciences and the humanities as they relate to Russia and 
the Soviet Union. The research program of the Russian 
Institute is conducted through the efforts of its faculty 
members, of scholars invited to participate as Senior Fel- 
lows in its program, and of candidates for the Certificate 
of the Institute and for the degree of Doctor of Philosophy. 
Some of the results of the research program are presented 
in the Studies of the Russian Institute of Columbia Uni- 
versity. The faculty of the Institute, without necessarily 
agreeing with the conclusions reached in the Studies, be- 
lieve that their publication advances the difficult task of 
promoting systematic research on Russia and the Soviet 
Union and public understanding of the problems involved. 
The faculty of the Russian Institute are grateful to the 
Rockefeller Foundation for the financial assistance which 
it has given to the program of research and publication. 



3101230 



Acknowledgments 



THE FIRST PART of this work is the result of my studies as 
a Senior Fellow at the Russian Institute, Columbia Uni- 
versity, during the years 1952-53. The second part was 
prepared at the Russian Research Center, Harvard Uni- 
versity, in 1954-55, under a special grant from the Rocke- 
feller Foundation. I am much indebted to the Russian Re- 
search Center, and especially to its Director, William L. 
Langer, and Associate Director, Marshall D. Shulman, for 
their kindness in relinquishing to Columbia University 
Press their publication rights to the second part. 

I also wish to express my thanks to George L. Kline, 
Columbia University, who prepared some of the material 
used in the second part of this essay; to Alfred E. Senn, 
for his assistance with Russian references; and to Arkadii 
R. L. Gurland, who offered valuable help and comments. 

My friend, Barrington Moore, Jr., read the manuscript 
and helped me as usual with his incisive criticism. 

The index was prepared by Maud Hazeltine. 

HERBERT MARCUSE 

Brandeis University 
June, 1957 



Contents 



Introduction 1 

Part I: Political Tenets 

1. The Marxian Concept of the Transition to 
Socialism 17 

2. Soviet Marxism: The Basic Self-Interpretation 38 

3. The New Rationality 78 

4. Socialism in One Country? 93 

5. The Dialectic of the Soviet State 101 

6. Base and Superstructure — Reality and Ideology 120 

7. Dialectic and Its Vicissitudes 136 

8. The Transition from Socialism to Communism 160 

Part II: Ethical Tenets 

9. Western and Soviet Ethics: Their Historical 
Relation 195 

10. Soviet Ethics — The Externalization of Values 210 

11. The Principles of Communist Morality 231 

12. Ethics and Productivity 248 

13. The Trend of Communist Morality 258 

Index 269 



Soviet Marxism 



Introduction 



THIS STUDY attempts to evaluate some main trends of Soviet 
Marxism in terms of an "immanent critique," that is to say 
it starts from the theoretical premises of Soviet Marxism 
develops their ideological and sociological consequences 
and reexamines the premises in the light of these conse 
quences. The critique thus employs the conceptual instru 
ments of its object, namely, Marxism, in order to clarify 
the actual function of Marxism in Soviet society and its 
historical direction. This approach implies a twofold as- 
sumption: 

(1) That Soviet Marxism (i.e., Leninism, Stalinism, 
and post-Stalin trends) is not merely an ideology promul- 
gated by the Kremlin in order to rationalize and justify its 
policies but expresses in various forms the realities of 
Soviet developments. If this is the case, then the extreme 
poverty and even dishonesty of Soviet theory would not 
vitiate the basic importance of Soviet theory but would 
itself provide a cue for the factors which engendered the 
obvious theoretical deficiencies; 

(2) That identifiable objective trends and tendencies 
are operative in history which make up the inherent ra- 
tionality of the historical process. Since this assumption is 



2 Introduction 

easily misrepresented as acceptance of Hegelian meta- 
physics, a few words may be said in the way of defense and 
explanation. 

Belief in objective historical "laws" is indeed at the very 
core of Hegel's philosophy. To him, these laws are the 
manifestation of Reason — a subjective and objective force, 
operating in the historical actions of men and in the ma- 
terial and intellectual culture. History is thus at one and 
the same time a logical and teleological process, namely, 
progress (in spite of relapses and regressions) in the con- 
sciousness and the realization of Freedom. The sequence in 
the principal stages of civilization is thereby ascent to 
higher forms of humanity — quantitative and qualitative 
growth. Marx has retained this basic notion while modify- 
ing it in a decisive sense: history progresses through the 
development of the productive forces, which is progress, 
not in the realization of Freedom, but in the creation of the 
prerequisites of Freedom; they remain mere prerequisites 
in the interest of class society. Thus, for Marx, history is 
certainly not the manifestation of Reason but much rather 
the opposite; Reason pertains only to the future of class- 
less society as a social organization geared to the free de- 
velopment of human needs and faculties. \^'Tiat is history 
to Hegel is still prehistory to Marx. 

The assumption of historical laws can be separated from 
all teleology. Then it means that the development of a 
specific social system, and the changes which lead from one 
social system to another, are determined by the structure 
which the respective society has given itself, that is to say, 
by the basic division and organization of social labor, and 



Introduction 3 

that the political and cultural institutions are generated 
by and correspond to this basic division and organization. 
The manifold dimensions and aspects of societal life are 
not a mere sum-total of facts and forces but constitute a 
clearly identifiable unit so that long range developments in 
any one dimension must be comprehended in their relation 
to the "base." On the ground of such structural unity, con- 
secutive social systems can be distinguished from one an- 
other as essentially different forms of society whose gen- 
eral direction of development is in a demonstrable sense 
"predetermined" by its origins. The very impossibility to 
fix an exact date (even within a century or more) when 
the one social system ends and the other begins (for exam- 
ple, feudalism and capitalism) indicates the underlying 
trend which transforms one system into another. The new 
society emerges within the framework of the old, through 
definable changes in its structure — changes which are 
cumulative until the essentially different structure is there. 
In the last analysis there are no "extraneous" causes in 
this chain, for all apparently outside factors and events 
(such as discoveries, invasions, the impact of far distant 
forces) will affect the social structure only if the ground 
is prepared for them, for example, if they "meet" cor- 
responding developments within the respective society or 
if they meet social wants and needs (as the barbarian in- 
flux into the weakened Roman empire, or as the influence 
of international trade and commerce and of the discoveries 
on the internally changing feudal societies from the thir- 
teenth to the sixteenth century). 

The basic form of societal reproduction, once institu- 



4 Introduction 

tionalized, determines the direction of development not 
only within the respective society but also beyond it. In 
this sense the historical process is rational and irreversible. 
As an example of the development within: The present 
stage of Western industrial society, with its increasing pri- 
vate and governmental regulation of the economy (in other 
words, with its increasing political economy and culture) 
appears as the "logical," i.e., inherent, outcome of the 
free enterprise and free competition prevalent at the pre- 
ceding stage. No Marxist categories are necessary in order 
to elucidate the connection between the concentration of 
economic power and the corresponding political and cul- 
tural changes on the one hand and the capitalistic utiliza- 
tion of growing productivity of labor and technical progress 
on the other. As an example of the development beyond: 
The emergence of the feudal system from the basic institu- 
tions of the agricultural economy in the late Roman empire 
under the impact of the barbarian tribal-military organiza- 
tion provides perhaps the clearest example of inherent his- 
torical rationality and irreversibility. By the same token, 
it seems a reasonable anticipation that, whatever the next 
stage of industrial civilization may be, the basic institu- 
tions of large-scale mechanized industry and the explosive 
growth of the productivity of labor commanded by it will 
bring about political and cultural institutions irrevocably 
different from those of the liberalist period — a historical 
tendency which is likely to supersede some of the present 
most conspicuous differences between the Western and the 
Soviet system. 

This brief outline of the notion of objective historical 



Introduction 5 

laws may serve to show the ateleological character of the 
hypothesis. It implies no purpose, no "end" toward which 
history is moving, no metaphysical or spiritual Reason 
underlying the process — only its institutional determina- 
tion. Moreover, it is a historical determination, that is to 
say, it is not in any sense "automatic." Within the institu- 
tional framework which men have given themselves in in- 
teraction with the prevailing natural and historical condi- 
tions, the development proceeds through the action of men 
— they are the historical agents, and theirs are the alterna- 
tives and decisions. 

In applying the hypothesis to the interpretation of 
Soviet Marxism, one qualification imposes itself from the 
beginning. It seems that the determining trend cannot be 
defined merely in terms of the structure of Soviet society, 
but that it must be defined in terms of the interaction be- 
tween Soviet and Western society. Even the most cursory 
survey of Soviet Marxism is confronted with the fact that at 
almost every turn in the development Soviet theory (and 
Soviet policy) reacts to a corresponding Western develop- 
ment and vice versa. This seems self-evident and hardly 
worth mentioning were it not for the fact that it is usually 
taken too lightly, taken into account merely with respect 
to diplomacy and propaganda, or understood as arrange- 
ments of expediency, short-term adjustments, and so on. 
However, the interaction seems to go much further and to 
express an essential link between the two conflicting sys- 
tems, thus affecting the very structure of Soviet society. 
In its most visible form, the link is in the technical- 
economic basis common to both systems, i.e., mechanized 



6 Introduction 

(and increasingly mechanized) industry as the mainspring 
of societal organization in all spheres of life. As against 
this common technical-economic denominator stands the 
very difTerent institutional structure — private enterprise 
here, nationalized enterprise there. Will the common 
technical-economic basis eventually assert itself over and 
against the different social institutions, or will the latter 
continue to widen the difference in the utilization of the 
productive forces in the two social systems? (According to 
Marxian theory, the technical-economic basis is in itself 
"neutral" and susceptible to capitalist as well as socialist 
utilization, the decision depending on the outcome of the 
class struggle — a notion which well illustrates the limits of 
Marxian "determinism.") The question plays a decisive 
role in evaluating the international dynamic and the pros- 
pects of a global "state-capitalism" or socialism; its dis- 
cussion lies outside the scope of this study, which, however, 
may provide some preparatory material. 

The interaction between Western and Soviet develop- 
ments, far from being an external factor, pertains to the 
determining historical trend — to the historical "law" gov- 
erning Soviet Marxism as well as to the reality reflected in 
Soviet Marxism. From the beginning, the specific interna- 
tional dynamic released by the transformation of "classi- 
cal" into organized capitalism (in Marxist terms, monopoly 
capitalism) defines Soviet Marxism — in Lenin's doctrine 
of the avant garde, in the notion of "socialism in one coun- 
try," in the triumph of Stalinism over Trotskyism and 
over the old Bolsheviks, in the sustained priority of heavy 
industry, in the continuation of a repressive totalitarian cen- 



Introduction 7 

tralization. They are in a strict sense responses to the (in 
Marxian terms, "anomalous") growth and readjustment 
of Western industrial society and to the decline in the 
revolutionary potential of the Western world resulting from 
this readjustment. The degree to which these developments 
have shaped Soviet Marxism may be illustrated by the 
function of tlie term "coexistence." The notion of coexist- 
ence has received very different emphases with Soviet 
Marxism — from a short-term tactical need to a long-range 
political objective. However, the very distinction between 
"short term" and "long range" is meaningless without 
identifiable standards of measurement, which in turn pre- 
suppose a demonstrable theoretical evaluation of the his- 
torical direction of Soviet developments. In Soviet Marxist 
language everytliing is short term if compared with the 
final event of world communism. Outside the realm of this 
language it is nonsensical to call "short term" policies 
which may last decades and which are imposed not by the 
political fluctuations but by the structure of the interna- 
tional situation. Viewed in this context, coexistence is per- 
haps the most singular feature of the contemporary era, 
namely, the meeting of two antagonistic forms of industrial 
civilization, challenging each other in the same interna- 
tional arena, neither one strong enough to replace the other. 
This relative weakness of both systems is characteristic of 
their respective structures and therefore a long-range fac- 
tor; the end of one system's effectiveness would be tanta- 
mount to the end of the system. In Western industrial so- 
ciety, the weakness derives from the constant danger of 
overproduction in a narrowing world market and grave 



8 Introduction 

social and economic dislocations, a danger necessitating 
constant political countermeasures, which in turn limit the 
economic and cultural growth of the system. On the other 
side, the Soviet system still suffers from the plague of un- 
derproduction, perpetuated by its military and political 
commitments against the advanced Western world. The 
implications of this dynamic will be traced in the following 
chapters. 

The development from Leninism to Stalinism and be- 
yond will be discussed as the result, in its main stages and 
features, of the "anomalous" constellation in which a so- 
cialist ^ society was to be built coexistent rather than subse- 
quent to capitalist society, as the competitor rather than the 
heir of the latter. This does not mean that the policies (such 
as the Stalinist industrialization) which decided the funda- 
mental trend of Soviet society were an inexorable neces- 
sity. There were alternatives, but they were in an emphatic 
sense historical alternatives — "choices" presented to the 
classes which fought the great social struggles of the inter- 
war period rather than choices at the discretion of the 
Soviet leadership. The outcome was decided in this strug- 
gle; it was decided in Europe by about 1923; and the 
Soviet leadership did not make this decision though it con- 
tributed to it (at that time probably to a lesser degree dian 
is usually assumed). 

If these propositions can be corroborated, the question 
as to whether or not the Soviet leadership is guided by 

^ Use of the term "socialist" for Soviet society in this study nowhere im- 
plies that this society is socialist in the sense envisaged by Marx and Engels. 
However, it is assumed that the initial intention and objective of the Bolshe- 
vik Revolution was to build a socialist society. 



Introduction 9 

Marxist principles is without relevance; once Incorporated 
into the foundational institutions and objectives of the new 
society, Marxism becomes subject to a historical dynamic 
which surpasses the intentions of the leadership and to 
which the manipulators themselves succumb. An immanent 
discussion of Soviet Marxism may help to identify this his- 
torical dynamic to which the leadership itself is subjected 
— no matter how autonomous and totalitarian it may be. 
Thus, in examining Soviet Marxism and the (theoretical) 
situation from which it originated, we are not concerned 
with abstract-dogmatic validity but with concrete political 
and economic trends, which may also provide a key for 
anticipating prospective developments. 

A few words must be said in justification of such an ap- 
proach. Marxian theory purports to be an essentially new 
philosophy, substantially different from the main tradition 
of Western philosophy. Marxism claims to fulfill this tradi- 
tion by passing from ideology to reality, from philosophi- 
cal interpretation to political action. For this purpose, 
Marxism redefines not only the main categories and modes 
of thought, but also the dimension of their verification; 
their validity is to be determined by the historical situa- 
tion and the action of the proletariat. There is theoretical 
continuity from the early Marxian notion of the Proletariat 
as the objectified truth of capitalist society to the Soviet 
Marxist concept partinost (partisanship). 

Under these circumstances, a critique which merely ap- 
plies the traditional criteria of philosophical truth to Soviet 
Marxism does not, in a strict sense, reach its objective. 
Such a critique, no matter how strong and well founded it 



10 Introduction 

may be, is easily blunted by the argument that its con- 
ceptual foundations have been undermined by the Marxist 
transition into a different area of historical and theoretical 
verification. The Marxist dimension itself thus seems to re- 
main intact because it remains outside the argument. But 
if the critique enters that very dimension, by examining the 
development and use of the Marxist categories in terms of 
their own claim and content, it may be able to penetrate the 
real content beneath the ideological and political form in 
which it appears. 

A critique of Soviet Marxism "from without" must 
either discard its theoretical efforts as "propaganda" or 
take them at their face value, namely, as philosophy or 
sociology in the traditional sense of these disciplines. The 
first alternative seems to beg the question as to what is 
meant seriously in Soviet Marxism and on what grounds 
the distinction is made.^ The second alternative would en- 
gage in philosophical and sociological controversies out- 
side the context in which the Soviet Marxist theories are 
presented and which is essential to their meaning. Treated 
in this manner, as items in the history of philosophical or 
sociological thought, the articles of the Concise Philosophi- 
cal Dictionary, for example, or the logic discussion of 
1950-51, are totally irrelevant — their philosophical faults 
are obvious to any scholar; their function is not the aca- 
demic formulation of generally valid categories and 
techniques of thought but the definition of their relation 
to the political reality.^ In contrast, an immanent critique, 
far from taking these theories at their surface value, could 

' See pp. 39 f . below. * See Chapter 5. 



Introduction 1 1 

reveal the political intention which is their real content. 
The approach suggested here shifts tlie emphasis of the 
critique from the spectacular public controversies, such as 
the Aleksandrov debate or the logic and linguistic discus- 
sion, to basic trends in Soviet Marxism and uses the former 
only by way of illustration of the latter. 

The immanent critique proceeds under the assumption 
that Marxian theory plays a decisive part in the formula- 
tion and execution of Soviet policy, and that from the 
Soviet use of Marxian theory inferences may be drawn for 
the national and international development of the Soviet 
state. The fact is that the Bolshevik Party and the Bolshe- 
vik Revolution were, to a considerable degree, developed 
according to Marxist principles, and that the Stalinist re- 
construction of Soviet society based itself on Leninism, 
which was a specific interpretation of Marxian theory and 
practice. The ideology thus becomes a decisive part of real- 
ity even if it was used only as an instrument of domination 
and propaganda. For this reason, a recurrent comparison 
between Soviet Marxism and pre-Soviet Marxian theory 
will be necessary. The problem of Soviet "revisions" of 
Marxian theory will not be treated as a problem of Marxian 
dogmatics; the relation between the different forms and 
stages of Marxism will rather be used as an indication 
of the way in which the Soviet leadership interprets and 
evaluates the changing historical situation as the frame- 
work for its policy decisions. 

Soviet Marxism has assumed the character of a "be- 
havioral science." Most of its theoretical pronouncements 
have a pragmatic, instrumentalist intent; they serve to ex- 



12 Introduction 

plain, justify, promote, and direct certain actions and at- 
titudes which are actual "data" for these pronouncements. 
These actions and attitudes (for example, accelerated col- 
lectivization of agriculture; Stakhanovism ; integral anti- 
Western ideology; insistence on the objective determin- 
ism of basic economic laws under socialism) are ra- 
tionalized and justified in terms of the inherited body of 
"Marxism-Leninism" which the Soviet leadership applies 
to the changing historical situation. But it is precisely the 
pragmatic, behaviorist character of Soviet Marxism which 
makes it an indispensable tool for the understanding of 
Soviet developments. The theoretical pronouncements of 
Soviet Marxism, in their pragmatic function, define the 
trend of Soviet developments. 

Distinction must therefore be made between overt formu- 
lation and actual meaning of Soviet Marxist statements. 
This distinction is not conveyed by the convenient term 
"Aesopian language," which conceals rather than points up 
the real distinction. To be sure, in Soviet usage the mean- 
ing of "democracy," "peace," "freedom," etc., is very dif- 
ferent from that understood in the Western world — but so 
is the meaning of "revolution" and "dictatorship of the 
proletariat." The Soviet usage also redefines the meaning 
of the specifically Marxian concepts. The latter themselves 
are transformed in so far as Soviet Marxism claims to be 
Marxism in and for a new historical situation; they form 
the Marxist answer to the fundamental economic and politi- 
cal changes during the first half of the century. 

From this point of view, Soviet Marxism appears as the 
attempt to reconcile the inherited body of Marxian theory 



Introduction 13 

with a historical situation which seemed to vitiate the cen- 
tral conception of this theory itself, namely, the Mai^xian 
conception of the transition from capitalism to socialism. 
Preparatory to the discussion of Soviet Marxism, we must, 
therefore, circumscribe the historical as well as the theoreti- 
cal situation from which Soviet Marxism derived. We 
must try to identify the point at which the historical de- 
velopment seemed to explode the Marxian analysis. This 
is the crucial point for the understanding of Soviet 
Marxism. 

Part I of this study aims at analyzing the basic concep- 
tions by virtue of which Soviet Marxism appears as a uni- 
fied theory of contemporary history and society. We take 
these concepts in their dogmatic statement only in order 
to develop them in the context of the social and political 
processes which they interpret and which alone makes them 
meaningful. Emphasis is throughout on the tendencies 
which Soviet Marxism seems to reflect and anticipate. 
Whereas Part I is thus focused on the objective factors 
underlying Soviet Marxism, Part II deals with the subjec- 
tive factor, that is, with the "human material" which is sup- 
posed to follow the lead and to attain the goals set by 
Soviet Marxism. The material for this part is taken from 
Soviet ethical philosophy. 



PART l: POLITICAL TENETS 



1. The Marxian Concept of the 

Transition to Socialism 



THE ORIGINAL CONCEPTION 

The dialectic-historical structure of Marxian theory im- 
plies that its concepts change with a change in the basic 
class relationships at which they aim — however, in such 
a way that the new content is obtained by unfolding the 
elements inherent in the original concept, thus preserving 
the theoretical consistency and even the identity of the con- 
cept. This also pertains to the notion in which the Marxian 
theory of the transition to socialism culminates — the notion 
of the objective historical coincidence between progress of 
civilization and the revolutionary action of the industrial 
proletariat. The latter is, in Marxian theory, the only social 
force that can accomplish the transition to a higher stage 
of civilization. Marx derives this coincidence from the in- 
trinsic laws of capitalist development and thus gives it a 
definite place in the historical process, that is to say, the 
coincidence itself "passes." According to Marx, there is 
only one form of its passing: the proletarian revolution 
abolishes, with the liquidation of all classes, the proletariat 
as a class and thereby creates a new agent of progress — 
the community of free men who organize their society in 
accordance with the possibilities of a humane existence for 



18 Political Tenets 

all its members. But the actual development of capitalism 
suggested still another way of surpassing the historical 
coincidence, namely, through a fundamental change in the 
relations between the two conflicting classes whereby the 
proletariat fails to act as the revolutionary class. The 
emergence of this alternative is perhaps the most decisive 
factor in the development of Soviet Marxism. 

The failure of the proletariat to act as the revolutionary 
class and the defeat of a proletarian revolution are antici- 
pated in Marxian theory; per se, they do not constitute 
events which must refute the theory. In Marxian theory, 
they are generally explained by objective and subjective 
"immaturity" and considered as a temporary regression, 
after which the revolutionary trend will be resumed with a 
subsequent growth in the class consciousness of the or- 
ganized proletariat. But the situation is quite diflferent if, 
with or without a defeated revolution, the development of 
mature capitalism shows a long-range trend toward class 
collaboration rather than class struggle, toward national 
and international division rather than solidarity of the 
proletariat in the advanced industrial countries. In Marxian 
theory, capital and (wage) labor define each other, or, 
more specifically, the growth of the revolutionary prole- 
tariat in the long run defines the irreversible direction of 
capitalist development. Consequently, if the trend is re- 
versed on the side of the proletariat, tlie capitalist develop- 
ment reaches a new stage to which the traditional Marxian 
categories no longer apply. A new historical period be- 
gins, characterized by a change in the basic class relations. 
Then, Marxism is faced with the task of redefining the con- 



Marxian Transition to Socialism 19 

ception of the transition to socialism and of the strategy in 
this period. 

How did the Marxian dialectic comprehend the relation 
between two qualitatively different stages of the historical 
process — in this case, between capitalism and socialism? 
According to Marx, the new stage of the historical process 
is the "determinate negation" of the preceding stage — that 
is, the new stage is determined by the social structure which 
prevailed at the preceding stage. For example, the transi- 
tion from capitalism to socialism is preconditioned by the 
following features of capitalist society: 

(1) A high level of technological and industrial pro- 
ductivity which is not used to capacity for creating a hu- 
mane life for all, because such use would conflict with 
the interest in profitable private utilization 

(2) The growth of productivity beyond the limits of 
private control, which expresses itself in certain changes in 
the social institutions of capitalist enterprise (concentra- 
tion of economic power coalescing with political power, 
decline of free competition and of the managerial function 
of the individual entrepreneur) and the consequent trend 
toward public control and appropriation 

(3) The growth of the political organization of the 
laboring classes, who, acting as a class-conscious force, 
pursue their "real interest," not in, but against the capi- 
talist system 

These quantitative changes gain momentum until, in the 
proletarian revolution, they explode the prevailing struc- 
ture and replace it by a qualitatively different one. Thus, 
the new historical level is not reached in just one leap; 



20 Political Tenets 

the transition rather consists of various phases and com- 
pletes itself only through these phases. The leap matures 
in the highest phase of the attained stage, but the first phase 
of the new stage still retains the birthmarks of its origin 
in the preceding stage. Marx's distinction of two "phases" 
of socialism in the Critique of the Gotha Program (1875), 
far from being an incidental correction, follows from the 
very principle of the dialectical method. In their historical 
continuity, capitalism and socialism are joined by far 
stronger links than those necessitated by a period of "ad- 
justment." During the first phase of socialism, the specific 
socialist principle of the free development and satisfaction 
of individual needs remains subordinated to the new de- 
velopment of the productive forces, especially of the pro- 
ductivity of labor. The societal wealth (material and intel- 
lectual) must be abundant enough to make possible a 
distribution of the social product according to individual 
needs regardless of the individual contribution to socially 
necessary labor. In economic-technological terms, this 
means "rationalization"; for the laborer, it means con- 
tinued toil and continued delay in the free satisfaction of 
individual needs. The first phase of socialism still chains 
the worker to his specialized function, still preserves the 
"enslaving subordination of individuals under the division 
of labor," ^ and thereby the antagonism between rationality 
and freedom; the rational way of developing society con- 
flicts with the self-realization of the individual. The interest 
of the whole still demands the sacrifice of freedom, and 
justice for all still involves injustice. This antagonism dis- 

^ Marx, "Critique of the Gotha Program," in Marx and Engels, Selected 
Works (2 vols.; Moscow, Foreign Languages Publishing House, 1949-50), 
II, 23. 



Marxian Transition to Socialism 21 

solves into the establishment of a genuine res publica only 
to the degree to which the socialized production creates the 
material and intellectual prerequisites of free and univer- 
sal satisfaction of needs. 

The fact that progress prior to the socialist revolution 
has occurred within the framework of class society and that 
material and intellectual productivity has been arrested by 
the interest of private appropriation causes in any case a 
time lag between tlie means and the end of liberation. The 
higher the level of material and intellectual productivity 
attained at the presocialist stage, the shorter the time lag, 
the briefer the first phase. Marx and Engels did not specu- 
late on its duration, nor was such speculation relevant to 
them, for their conception of socialism implied that the 
qualitative change from capitalism to socialism, the "nega- 
tion of the negation," takes place with the beginning of the 
first phase itself as the change from domination to self- 
determination. No matter how long the first phase would 
last, and no matter how much repression it would involve, 
this repression would be self-imposed by the "immediate 
producers," by the proletariat constituted as a state. The 
social distribution of labor time among the various 
branches of production, and thus the satisfaction of the 
individual needs and faculties, would be determined by 
collective decision of the producers of the societal wealth. 
Whatever coercion would have to be applied would be ap- 
plied by the coerced themselves. There would be no 
coercive state organs separate from and above the asso- 
ciated laborers, for they are the socialist state. Wherever 
Marx and Engels contrast the socialist state with its pre- 
ceding forms, they do so in terms of the actual subjects who 



22 Political Tenets 

constitute the state, not in terms of specific institutions. The 
socialist state is nothing but the "revolutionary dictatorship 
of the proletariat";^ socialist society is an "association 
of free men" ; ^ the productive forces are "in the hands of 
producers working in association";^ production is or- 
ganized on the basis of "a free and equal association of the 
producers." ^ 

The qualitative change that, in the Marxian conception, 
characterizes the entire first phase presupposes the activity 
of a class-conscious proletariat. The proletariat that is to 
constitute itself as the socialist state has been, up to the 
very moment of the revolution, the object of capitalist 
domination and, as such, part of the capitalist system. If 
this system has entered the period of the "final crisis," if 
destruction and impoverishment are prevalent, then, in the 
Marxian expectation, the proletariat will organize itself as 
the revolutionaiy class, follow its objective historical mis- 
sion, and function within the capitalist system only as its 
"gravedigger." But if capitalism continues as a "going con- 
cern," even increasing the standard of living of its working 
classes, they may become part of tlie capitalist system in 
quite a different, positive sense. As early as 1858 Engels 
noted the Verbiirgerlichung of the proletariat in England,^ 

"Ibid., p. 577. 'Marx, Capital, I, Chap. I, Sect. 4. 

* Engels, "Anti-Diihring," in A Handbook of Marxism, ed. by E. Bums 
(New York, International Publishers, 1935), p. 294. 

^Engels, Origin of the Family, Private Property, and the State (New York, 
International Publishers, 1942), p. 158. The problem of the "withering 
away" of the state will be discussed below, pp. 102 f. 

* Letter to Marx, October 7, 1858, in Marx and Engels, Correspondence, 
1846-1895; A Selection with Commentary and Notes (New York, Interna- 
tional Publishers, 1935), pp. 115-16; see also his letter to Kautsky, Septem- 
ber 12, 1882, in ibid., pp. 399^00. 



Marxian Transition to Socialism 23 

and in 1884 he formulated the consequence: As long as the 
proletariat is not yet ripe for its self-liberation, so long 
will the majority of the proletariat see in the established 
social order the only possible one and will constitute politi- 
cally the "tail of the capitalist class, its extreme left 
wing." ^ Only a virtually constant crisis could keep the 
class struggle acute and the proletariat class-conscious 
against the capitalist system, as its "absolute negation." 
Under such conditions, the proletariat would fulfill its 
"historical mission," that is, the abolition of the capitalist 
system. But in periods of stability and prosperity the prole- 
tariat itself is bound to come under the sway of "capitalist 
ideas," and its immediate (economic) interests supersede 
its real (historical) interest. This relation can be reversed 
only in the class struggle itself, that is to say, if the prole- 
tariat becomes again a political force and as such operates 
as a catalyst in the capitalist economy. 

The Marxian distinction between real and immediate in- 
terest is of the greatest importance for understanding the 
relationship between theory and practice, between strategy 
and tactics in Marxism. The distinction implies a historical 
conflict between theory and practice, the origin and solu- 
tion of which lie in the development of capitalism. The con- 
flict thus appears as an objective factor. If the societal rela- 
tionships determine consciousness, they do so also with 
respect to the proletariat. And if the societal relationships 
are class relationships, they also introduce the discrepancy 

^ Origin of the Family, p. 158. For the later reinterpretation of this idea 
in the Leninist doctrine of the growing "labor aristocracy," see below, pp. 
41 ff. See E. H. Carr, The Bolshevik Revolution, 1917-1923 (3 vols.; London, 
iviacmilian, 1953), 111, 182. 



24 Political Tenets 

between the form in which reality appears to men and the 
"essence" of reality. The discrepancy between essence and 
phenomena is a cornerstone of the Marxian method, but the 
metaphysical categories have become sociological ones. In 
the analysis of capitalism Marx describes the discrepancy 
in terms of the "veil of commodity production" (reifica- 
tion); he derives it from the separation of physical from 
intellectual work and from the "enslavement of man by the 
means of his labor." As applied to the proletariat, although 
it is "in reality" the negation of the capitalist system, this 
objective reality will not immediately appear in the prole- 
tarian consciousness — the "class in itself" is not neces- 
sarily "class for itself." Since, to Marx, the "essence" of 
the proletariat is a historical force which the theoretical 
analysis only defines and demonstrates, the "real interest" 
of the proletariat as defined by this analysis is not an ab- 
stract and arbitrary construct but a theoretical expression 
of what the proletariat itself is — although it may not or not 
yet be conscious of what it really is. 

In point of fact, when Marx wrote, his concepts did not 
correspond to those of the proletariat and were probably 
less like them than they would be today. Marxian theory 
and its political goals were alien to the existence and inter- 
est of the contemporary proletariat, at least to its majority. 
Marx and Engels were fully aware of the gulf between es- 
sence and phenomena and correspondingly between theory 
and practice. They considered it as expressive of the histor- 
ical "immaturity" of the proletariat and believed that it 
would be overcome by the ultimate political radicalization 
of the working classes — itself the concomitant of the aggra- 



Marxian Transition to Socialism 25 

vating contradictions of capitalism. Indeed, there seemed 
to be a demonstrable link between the real and the imme- 
diate interest of the proletariat in spite of the obvious dis- 
crepancy, namely, the dehumanization and impoverish- 
ment of the laborer, which appeared as an objective barrier 
against the "sway of capitalist ideas," against the dissolu- 
tion of the revolutionary class. 

To Marx and Engels, precisely because the transition 
from capitalism to socialism was the historical function of 
the proletariat as a revolutionary class, the specific political 
forms of this transition appeared as variables which could 
not be fixed and established by tlieory. Once the prole- 
tariat had constituted itself as revolutionary class, con- 
scious of its mission and ready to carry it out, the ways and 
means for accomplishing its task were to be derived from 
the tlien prevailing political and economic situation. Vio- 
lence was at least not inherent in the action of the prole- 
tariat; class consciousness neither necessarily depended 
upon nor expressed itself in open civil warfare; violence be- 
longed neither to the objective nor to the subjective condi- 
tions of the revolution (although it was Marx's and Engels's 
conviction that the ruling classes could and would not dis- 
pense with violence) . It was thus more than "politics" when 
Marx and Engels drew attention to the possibilities of a 
legal and democratic transition to socialism ^ — especially 

* We refer to the following statements: Marx's speech at Amsterdam, 1872, 
quoted in lu. M. Steklov. History of the First International. (New York, 
International Publishers, 1928), p. 240; Marx, "Konspekt der Debatten iiber 
das Sozialistengesetz" (written in 1878), in Marx and Engels, Briefe an A. 
Bebel, W. Liebknecht, K. Kautsky, und Andere (Moscow, Verlagsgenos- 
senschaft Auslandischer Arbeiter in der USSR, 1933), p. 516; Engels, 
"Introduction to Marx's Class Struggles in France," in Marx and Engels, 



26 Political Tenets 

at a time when the numerical and political strength of labor 
was growing continuously and when the labor parties were 
professing strongly revolutionary aims. 

But while the concrete forms of the transition were vari- 
able, its class basis was not. The revolution was to be the 
direct organized action of the proletariat as a class — or it 
was not at all. Marx and Engels did not recognize any other 
agent of the revolution nor any "substitute" for it, for sub- 
stitution would signify the immaturity of the class as such.* 
The "greatest productive force is the revolutionary class it- 
self." ^" The "conquest of political power" can only be the 
result of the political movement of the working class which 
as a class opposes the ruling classes.^^ The class organizes 
itself into a "party," but tliis party develops naturwilch- 
sig out of the "soil of modern society itself"; ^" it is the 
self-organization of the proletariat. 

The Marxian conception thus maintains the identity of 



Selected Works, I, 109-27; Engels, Critique of the Social Democratic Draft 
Program, 1891, Sect. II. 

* The Marxian notion of socialism implies some form of "representation," 
because the proletariat cannot act as a class without organization and 
division of functions. However, Marx and Engels considered only representa- 
tion which was constituted by the class itself, that is to say, directly dele- 
gated by and directly responsible to the "immediate producers." If the 
"consciousness" of the class was "immature" or corrupted, the leadership 
representing the class could help it mature, but could never lead it into 
action. In such circumstances, the leadership would be, in a strict sense, 
a theoretical one. 

'"Marx, The Poverty of Philosophy (New York, International Publishers), 
p. 146. 

"Marx, Letter to F. Bolte, November 23, 1871, in Marx and Engels, 
Selected Works, II, 423; and in Brief e and Auszuge aus Brief en von Joh. 
Phil. Becker, Jos. Dietzgen, Friedrich Engels, Karl Marx u. A. an F. A. 
Sorge und Andere, ed. by F. A. Sorge (Stuttgart, Dietz, 1906), p. 42. 

^Marx, Letter to Freiligrath, in F. Mehring, Freiligrath und Marx in 
ihrem Briefwechsel (Erganzungshefte zur Neuen Zeit, No. 12; Stuttgart, 
Dietz, 1912), p. 43. 



Marxian Transition to Socialism 27 

the historical agent prior to and after the revolution, and 
the political instruments of the class struggle, especially 
the proletarian party, remain expressive of this identity. 
The conception recognizes changes within the proletariat, 
in the degree of class consciousness, in the size and weight 
of the "labor aristocracy," etc., but these changes do not 
destroy the identity of the class as the sole carrier of the 
revolution. If this class does not exist, that is, act as a class, 
then the socialist revolution does not exist. 

SUBSEQUENT MODIFICATIONS 

Marx derived the afore-mentioned conclusions from a 
"theoretical model" of capitalism which omits all features 
(such as foreign trade, government intervention, "third 
persons") that do not pertain to the basic economic process 
which constitutes the capitalist system. As the analysis pro- 
ceeds, in the second and third volumes of Capital, these 
omitted features are reintroduced and theory makes its 
way from the essence to the concrete historical reality of 
capitalism; the theoretical model is recast in its essential 
relation to the historical reality. Now, according to Marx, 
in its historical reality capitalism develops "countertrends" 
against its inherent contradictions, for example, capital ex- 
port (economic and political), monopolies, government 
intervention. Moreover, one sector of capitalist society 
which had found little attention in Marx's theoretical anal- 
ysis proved of decisive significance in reality, namely, the 
large class of peasants. The countertrends and the "neg- 
lected factor" became the focal points in the development 
of post-Marxian theory. 

The discussion of "countertrends" moves into the center 



VJUJ^- 



28 Political Tenets 

of Marxian theory with the doctrines of "finance capital" 
and "imperialism." These doctrines, comprising a variety 
of interpretations from the "revisionist" to the "orthodox" 
Leninist version, attempted to bring Marxist theory into 
line with the continued vitality of the established society 
and especially with the rising standard of living for the 
working classes in the advanced industrial countries — facts 
which seemed strikingly to contradict the Marxian notion 
of the impending final crisis of capitalism and of the im- 
poverishment of the proletariat. In spite of the wide dif- 
ferences in interpretation, the doctrines of imperialism 
agreed that, around the turn of the century, capitalism had 
entered a new stage. The main features of the stage were 
said to be the transformation of free into regimented com- 
petition, dominated by national and international cartels, 
trusts, and monopolies, the amalgamation between banking 
and industrial capital, government and business, and an 
expansionist economic policy toward "noncapitalist" and 
weaker capitalist areas (e.g., intensified exploitation of 
colonial and dependent countries). However, in the evalua- 
tion of this development, the theories of imperialism were 
irreconcilably divided into the "reformist" and "orthodox" 
camp. The theory of the former, emerging in Eduard Bern- 
stein's writings of 1900-1901 ^^ and culminating in the 
doctrine of economic democracy {Wirtschajtsdemokra- 
tie),^'^ maintained that, within the framework of "organ- 

"See Eduard Bernstein, Evolutionary Socialism: A Criticism and 
Affirmation, trans, by Edith C. Harvey (New York, Huebsch, 1909). 

" Formulated by Rudolf Hilferding at the conference of the German So- 
cial Democratic Party at Kiel, 1927, and in Fritz Naphtali, Wirtschaftsdemo- 
kratie, published by the German Trade Union Federation, Berlin 1928. 



Marxian Transition to Socialism 29 

ized capitalism," the proletariat could continue to improve 
its economic as well as its political position and ultimately 
establish socialism by legal and democratic means through 
the increasing economic and political influence of organ- 
ized labor. In sharp contrast, the orthodox interpretation, 
in its extreme represented by Lenin, saw in the growth of 
capitalism a tenuous and temporary stabilization bound to 
explode in armed conflicts among the imperialist powers 
and in sharpening economic crises. Lenin explained the 
reformist tendencies among the proletariat in terms of the 
rise of a small "labor aristocracy," "corrupted" by high 
wages paid out of monopolistic surplus profits, with a 
vested interest in the established system. 

We are here concerned only with the Leninist interpreta- 
tion. The emergence of Leninism as a new form of Marxism 
is determined by two main factors: (1) the attempt to draw 
the peasantry into the orbit of Marxian theory and strategy, 
and (2) the attempt to redefine the prospects of capitalist 
and revolutionary development in the imperialist era. The 
two main currents of Leninist thought are closely interre- 
lated; the _yi ability of advanc ed capitalism (unexpected 
from the traditional Marxist point of view) and, conse- 
quently, the continued strength of i^ eformism] among the 
proletariat in the advanced capitajUst_£Quntries called al- 
most inevitably for a shift in Marxist emphasis to the 
bgxikward countries, which were predominantly agricul- 
tural and where the weakness of the capitalist sector 
seemed to offer better chances for a revolution. True, the 
notion tliat the capitalist chain must be brok en at its " weak.-. 
est link" — a notion stressed by Stalin after the revolution 



30 Political Tenets 

— was originally Trotsky's rather than Lenin's, but the 
whole trend of Leninist thought from the beginning is in 
this direction. When the ''w orkers' a nd peasants^ revolu- 
tion^^' rather than the workers' revolution, becomes the 
center of Soviet Marxism, it is not only because the revolu- 
tion happened to be successful in Russia but because the 
revolutionary potential of the industrial working class 
seemed to recede throughout the advanced capitalist world. 
It was this fact that, in the long run, decided the develop- 
ment of Soviet Marxism. We therefore take as a starting 
point Lenin's analysis of the situation of the proletariat at 
the imperialist stage. 

Significant in this intei^pretation is the underestimation 
of the economic and political potentialities of capitalism, 
and of the change in the position of the proletariat. In fact, 
the refusal to draw the theoretical consequences from the 
new situation characterizes the entire development of Len- 
inism and is one of the chief reasons for the gap between 
theory and practice in Soviet Marxism. For, while Lenin 
from the beginning of his activity reoriented the revolu- 
tionary strategy of his party in accordance with the new 
situation, his theoretical conception did not follow suit. 
Lenin's retention of the classical notion of the revolution- 
ary proletariat, sustained with the help of the theory of the 
labor aristocracy and the avant garde, revealed its inade- 
quacy from the beginning. Even prior to the First World 
War it became clear that the "collaborationist" part of the 
proletariat was quantitatively and qualitatively different 
from a small upper stratum that had been corrupted by 
monopoly capital, and that the__SiicialJQeniacra.tic__Par,ty 



Marxian Transition to Socialism 31 

and trade u nion bureaucracy were more jhan ^traitors"— 
rather that their policy reflected pretty exactly the eco- 
nomic and social condition of the majority of Ihe^ organized 
working classes in the advanced industrial countries. And in- 
deed, Lenin's strategy of the revolutionary avant garde 
pointed to a conception of the proletariat which went far be- 
yond a mere reformulation of the classical Marxian concept; 
his struggle against "economism" and the doctrine of spon- 
taneous mass action, his dictum that class consciousness 
has to be bxought-upon the proletariat "from without" an- 
ticipate the later factual transformation of the proletariat 
from the subject to an object of the revolutionary process. 
True, Lenin's What Is to Be Done? ^^ where these ideas 
found their classical formulation, was written for the strug- 
gle of the Russian Marxists for leadership over a backward 
proletariat, but their implications go far beyond this con- 
text. 'nie„ultimale_J;aigens_stated at the beginning of Len- 
in's pamphlet: it is the rising reformist camp in "interna- 
tional social democracy,^' j^resenteji_.for_Lenin by Bern- 
stein~and Millerand, who demanded a "decided change 
from revolutionary social democracy to bourgeois reform- 
ism." Moreover, the phrase "class conscio usness from with- 
out" did not originate from tlieKussian situation but was 
coined by Karl Kautsky in his polemics against the draft 
of the new program of the Austrian Social Democratic 
Party.^^ Lenin aimed beyond the exigencies of the specific 
Russian situation, at a general international development 
in Marxism, which in turn reflected the trend of large sec- 

^^ Lenin, Chto delat'? (What Is to Be Done?) appeared first in 1902. 
"See What Is to Be Done? (New York, International PubUsliers, 1929), 
p. 40. 



32 Political Tenets 

tions of organized labor toward "class cooperation." As 
this trend increased, it threatened to vitiate the notion of 
the proletariat as the revolutionary subject on which the 
whole Marxist strategy depended. Lenin's formulations in- 
tended to save Marxian orthodoxy from the reformist on- 
slaught, but they soon became part of a conception that no 
longer assumed the historical coincidence between the pro- 
letariat and progress which the notion of the "labor aris- 
tocracy" still retained. The groundwork was laid for the 
development of the Leninist party where the true interest 
and the true consciousness of the proletariat were lodged in 
a group different from the majority of the proletariat. The 
centralistic organization, which was first justified by and 
applied to the "immaturity" of backward conditions, was 
to become the general principle of strategy on an interna- 
tional scale. 

The construction of the Leninist party (or party leader- 
ship) as the real representative of the proletariat could not 
bridge the gap between the new strategy and the old theo- 
retical conception. Lenin's strategy of the avant garde ac- 
knowledged in fact what it denied in theory, namely, that 
a fundamental change had occurred in the objective and 
subjective conditions for the revolution. 

In his Finanzkapital,^' published in 1910, Rudolf Hil- 
ferding interpreted this change in terms of Marxian theory. 

^^ Das Finanzkapital; Fine Studie iiber die jiingste Entwicklung des 
Kapitalismus (Marx-Studien III; Vienna, Wiener Volksbuchhandliing, 1910). 
Hilferding's term designates not merely a specific form of capital, but a 
specific form of capitalist organization. He identifies its two essential elements 
as (a) the "abolition" (Aufhebung) of free competition by the formation of 
cartels and trusts, and (b) the ever closer amalgamation between "banking 
capital" and "industrial capital." 



Marxian Transition to Socialism 33 

He pointed out that, under the leadership of finance capi- 
tal, the entire national economy would be mobilized for 
expansion, and that this expansion, through the collusion 
of giant monopolistic and semimonopolistic enterprises, 
would tend toward large-scale international integration, 
economic as well as political. On this new intercontinental 
market, production and distribution would be to a great 
extent controlled and regimented by a cartel of the most 
powerful capitalist interests. In the huge dominion of such 
a "general cartel," the contradictions of the capitalist sys- 
tem could be greatly controlled, profits for the ruling 
groups secured, and a high level of wages for labor within 
the dominion sustained — at the expense of the intensified 
exploitation of markets and populations outside the domin- 
ion. Hilferding thought that such internaUonal capitalist 
planning would require the abolition of democratic liber- 
alism in the economy as well as in the political and ideo- 
logical sphere; individualism and humanism would be 
replaced by an aggressive militarist nationalism and au- 
thoritarianism. Similar ideas were subsequently (1914) 
advanced by Karl Kautsky in his concept of "ultra- 

• T ?? 18 

imperialism. 

These developments were presented only as tendencies 
the realization of which for any length of time was doubted 
by Hilferding as well as Kautsky. Nor did these writers 
draw the full conclusions concerning the changing class 
situation of the proletariat. But the economic and political 
conditions had been outlined under which the capitalist 

'^Kautsky, "Der Imperialismus," Die Neue Zeit, XXXII, 2, No. 21 (Sep- 
tember 11, 1914) , 921. 



34 Political Tenets 

world could be stabilized and hierarcbically integrated — 
conditions which in Marxian theory appeared as Utopian 
unless the actual forces which would supersede the contra- 
dictions and conflicts among the imperialist powers devel- 
oped. Once they materialized, an economic basis for inte- 
gration could indeed emerge. It did emerge, very gradually 
and with many regressions and breaks, under the impact of 
two World Wars, atomic productivity, and the growth of 
Communist power. These events altered the structure of 
capitalism as defined by Marx and created the basis of a 
new economic and political organization of the Western 
world. ^^ This basis came to be utilized eff^ectively only after 
the Second World War. From then on, the conflicting com- 
petitive interests among the Western nations were gradu- 
ally integrated and superseded by the fundamental East- 
West conflict, and an intercontinental political economy 
took shape — in extent much smaller than the former free 
world market, but susceptible to a planned regulation of 
that blind "anarchy" in which Marxism saw the root of 
capitalist contradictions. At the same time, the laboring 
classes were split on an international scale into (to use 
Toynbee's terms) an internal and external proletariat, the 
latter consisting of those (urban and rural) proletarian and 
semiproletarian classes, outside and inside the area of ef- 

" Soviet Marxism maintains — and indeed must maintain if the Marxian 
conception is to be preserved — that these events are intrinsically related: the 
"permanent war economy," as the sole outlet for the imperialist contradic- 
tions, leads to atomic productivity, and the latter enforces economic as well 
as political integration of the Western powers. According to this conception, 
the events which bring about the transformation of the Western world 
are not extraneous but rather internal to the dynamic of the capitalist 
system, and the same forces that make for war make for progress in 
productivity and for "temporary stabilization." 



Marxian Transition to Socialism 35 

fective reconstruction, which did not benefit from it by 
higher wages, better living conditions, or greater political 
influence. 

The external proletariat (including, as its largest part, 
the peasantry), which came to provide the Soviet leader- 
ship with a mass basis for the struggle against capitalism 
after the First World War, emerged as a historical "sub- 
ject" seemingly by virtue of (from the Marxian viewpoint) 
an exogenous event, namely, by virtue of the fact that the 
revolution succeeded in backward Russia, failed to mate- 
rialize in the advanced industrial countries, and subse- 
quently spread from Russia into preindustrial areas, while 
the advanced industrial countries continued to remain im- 
mune. But this event was not quite as exogenous as it seems. 
The gradual "immunization" of decisive areas of Western 
society had already begun to show its effectiveness prior to 
the First World War; the nationalist attitude of the Social 
Democratic parties in 1914 — at that time the unchallenged 
Marxist organization of labor — was only its most conspicu- 
ous manifestation. The immunization then proved its power 
in the Central European revolutions from 1918 to 1923, 
where the majority of organized labor defeated the Com- 
munist assault in alliance with the bourgeoisie and the 
army. In England, the predominance of the reformist 
Labor Party had never been seriously disturbed. In France 
and Italy, Communist strength continued to trail far behind 
that of Social Democracy; and in Germany, the only coun- 
try where it came to a powerful resurgence after the defeat, 
Social Democratic as well as Communist labor succumbed 
quickly to the Fascist regime. The sustained weakness of 



36 Political Tenets 

the revolutionary potential in the advanced industrial coun- 
tries confined the revolution to that area where the prole- 
tariat had not been thus affected and where the regime had 
shown political disintegration together with economic back- 
wardness. 

Marxian theory explained the rising standard of living, 
which lay at the economic roots of the immunization proc- 
ess, in terms of the growing productivity of labor, the effec- 
tive organization of the industrial workers, which counter- 
acted the pressure on the wage level, and in terms of 
monopolistic surplus profits in the most advanced capital- 
ist areas. According to Marxism, none of these factors 
could neutralize for any length of time the inherent contra- 
dictions of the capitalist mode of production. The benefits 
for the working class were expected to be wiped out period- 
ically by wars and crises since there was no basis for long- 
range international capitalist consolidation. This interpre- 
tation did not provide for the possibility (soon to become a 
fact) that such an international basis would materialize. 
On it, Western industrial society created its new economic 
and political institutions. The catastrophic violence, the un- 
precedented extent of physical and cultural destruction, 
and also the equally unprecedented growth of technical 
productivity which characterized the period after 1918, 
corresponded to the scope of the task. It was the very struc- 
ture of the established civilization that was challenged and 
that had to be reaffirmed against a competing civilization. 
The technological and political potential developed in this 
struggle made it soon appear that minor adjustments would 
not suffice to meet the challenge. The need for the total mo- 



Marxian Transition to Socialism 37 

bilization of all material and mental forces necessitated 
the abolition of laissez-faire in economic and cultural life, 
the methodical control of the political process, and national 
regrouping under the actual hierarchy of economic power 
— at the expense of cherished traditional sovereignties. The 
overriding interest of Western society as a whole modified 
national and class interests: the national parties aligned 
themselves with the international economic and political 
forces. Labor was no exception and, at the end, Social De- 
mocracy became part of the Western, and Communism part 
of the Eastern, orbit. For Marxism, the capitalist world had 
never come closer to the dreaded specter of a "general 
cartel" which would replace the anarchy of capitalist pro- 
duction and distribution by ultraimperialist planning. And 
it was the very progress of the Soviet system which had 
promoted the realization of this dreaded possibility. 



2. Soviet Marxism: The Basic Self -Interpretation 



THE LENINIST HERITAGE 

A comparison between the above analysis of the histor- 
ical presuppositions of Soviet Marxism with the official 
Soviet pronouncements shows that the latter do not ex- 
plicitly acknowledge these presuppositions. Leninist as 
well as Stalinist theory has recurrently and emphatically 
denied the possibility of a long-range international integra- 
tion of the Western world. The readjustments of the post- 
Stalinist period, while explicitly rejecting the "theory of 
absolute stagnation of capitalism" and Stalin's theses on 
the shrinkage of the capitalist system, still retain the notion 
of the "intensification of the capitalist contradictions" in 
the present era.^ Soviet Marxism has equally emphatically 
denied the concomitant changes in the structure of the la- 
boring class in the Western countries; the classical Marxist 
notion of the revolutionary proletariat having been a main- 
stay of Soviet theory. However, all the decisive policies 

^ See Mikoyan's speech, February 16, 1956, at the Twentieth Congress of 
the Communist Party of the Soviet Union, in XX S"ezd Kommunisticheskoi 
Partii Sovetskogo Soiuza: Stenograficheskii otchet (The Twentieth Congress 
of the Communist Party of the Soviet Union: Stenographic Account) (2 
vols.; Moscow, Gospolitizdat, 1956), I, 319-21; Khrushchev's speech of 
February 14, in ibid., I, 14-20; also New York Times, February 19, 1956; and 
Khrushchev's speech of November 6, 1957, (as broadcast by Moscow Home 
Service, p. A-47). 



Self-Interpretation 39 

of constructing socialism in the Soviet orbit are based on 
the structural changes which characterize the contemporary 
period, and on the decline of the revolutionary proletariat 
in the Western world. This dichotomy raises the problem of 
the objective sincerity of Soviet Marxist theoretical pro- 
nouncements — part of the larger problem of the relation- 
ship between Soviet theory and practice. 

We have already mentioned that "Aesopian language" 
is systematically employed within the Soviet Marxist camp 
itself and for Marxist audiences and communications. So- 
viet Marxism continues to use the "orthodox" Marxian no- 
tions to designate situations and policies which obviously 
contradict these notions. Under these circumstances it 
would seem to be appropriate to dismiss Soviet Marxism 
as mere "propaganda." This is a deceptive solution, be- 
cause the distinction between "propaganda" and "truth" 
presupposes a demonstrable "truth" with which propa- 
ganda can be contrasted. If it is maintained that the truth 
expresses itself only in the practice and not in the theory of 
Soviet Marxism, that the theory serves only as an ideolog- 
ical prop for mass manipulation, then this contention has 
to be proved. It is by no means self-evident in the face of 
the difficulties which the regime creates for itself by con- 
stantly teaching and publicizing Marxian ideas that can be 
reconciled with reality only by great expenditure of physi- 
cal and intellectual force. The fact is that, regardless of its 
"level," the exposition of Marxist theory continues to be 
one of the main efforts of the regime, and the tension be- 
tween theory and practice continues to exist. 

But if it seems inappropriate to dismiss the whole of 
theory as propaganda, it seems equally inappropriate to 



40 Political Tenets 

retain parts of it as the truth and classify others as "subter- 
fuge." There are no criteria for such a selection — unless 
we can detect certain Marxist notions that remain constant 
through the various changes in Soviet theory and strategy. 
Then it might be possible to arrive at an identification of the 
"basic elements," and to derive the "revisions" and "rejec- 
tions" from these elements, thus obtaining a body of theo- 
retical principles in relationship to practice. It is this ap- 
proach which guides the subsequent discussion. 

The formation of Soviet Marxist theory proceeds on the 
basis of Lenin's interpretation of Marxism, without going 
back to original Marxian theory. A brief summary of the 
essential links between Leninism and subsequent Soviet 
Marxism will suffice to clarify the starting point. 

We suggested above that the characteristic features of 
emerging Leninism, i.e., the shift in the revolutionary agent 
from the class-conscious proletariat to the centralized party 
as the avant garde of the proletariat and the emphasis on 
the role of the peasantry as ally of the proletariat, devel- 
oped under the impact of the sustained strength of capital- 
ism at the "imperialist stage." The conception which was 
initially aimed at the "immaturity" of the Russian prole- 
tariat became a principle of international strategy in the 
face of the continued reformist attitude of the "mature" 
proletariat in the advanced industrial countries. To coun- 
teract the integration of a large sector of organized labor 
into the capitalist system, the "subjective factor" of revo- 
lutionary strategy is monopolized by the Party, which as- 
sumes the character of a professional revolutionary organi- 
zation directing the proletariat. 



Self-Interpretation 41 

The Leninist conception may be presented as a develop- 
ment of the Marxian distinction between the "immediate" 
and the "real" interest (and consciousness) of the prole- 
tariat. Here are the principal stages: (a) Societal being 
determines consciousness: the individual proletarian, in 
capitalist relationships of production, desires to improve 
his individual conditions immediately and continually 
within the capitalist system. (6) The "economistic" policy 
of the trade unions, in achieving such improvement, sus- 
tains the proletariat as an exploited class and thereby sus- 
tains capitalist society; but at the same time it modifies the 
social structure in so far as it provides a basis for "class 
peace." (c) This change in the social structure "deflects" 
the proletariat from its objective historical position as the 
revolutionary class which can liberate itself only by abol- 
ishing the capitalist system, [d) The objective historical 
position can be "rescued" only by subordinating the imme- 
diate subjective interest to the real interest of the class, by 
transforming the economic into a political struggle. This 
task is the function of the Leninist party. Since, according 
to Marxian theory, the economic struggle by itself can 
never achieve more than a brief improvement, the capital- 
ist process, through recurrent depressions and crises, will 
redress the balance and lead to the radicalization of the 
proletariat, thus reestablishing the coincidence of its im- 
mediate and real interests. 

But what happens when the process (c) affects the bulk 
of the proletariat in the advanced capitalist countries? Has 
not Marxian theory then lost the mass basis required for its 
realization? And is not the connection between theory and 



42 Political Tenets 

reality also lost, unless the former redefines itself by re- 
defining the latter? These questions seem to have driven 
Leninist theory toward a reevaluation of contemporary cap- 
italist development, which has become the theoretical foun- 
dation for the doctrine of "socialism in one country." 

This doctrine, which predates the Bolshevik Revolution, 
revealed itself from the beginning as defined and deter- 
mined by the new stage of industrial society. Lenin's "law 
of the uneven development of capitalism" was at first only 
the expression of an actual state of affairs, but the infer- 
ences drawn from it form the very core of Soviet Marxism. 
Lenin noted that "uneven economic and political develop- 
ment is an absolute law of capitalism" and immediately 
added, therefore, "the victory of socialism is, at the begin- 
ning, possible in a few capitalist countries," or even in a 
single capitalist country.^ The conclusion clearly implies 
here that socialism may be victorious first in a few or even 
in one single advanced capitalist country, while the more 
backward countries will lag behind. One year later, Lenin 
wrote that socialism will achieve victory first in one or sev- 
eral countries while the others will remain bourgeois or 
"pre-bourgeois" for some time.^ 

Lenin retained the Marxian conclusion that the socialist 

""The United States of Europe Slogan" (written in 1915), in The 
Strategy and Tactics of World Communism, House Document No. 619, 
Supplement I (Washington, D.C., U.S. Government Printing Office, 1948), 
p. 29; Lenin, Selected Works (12 vols.; New York, International Pub- 
lishers, 1937-38), V, 141. 

^ "Voennaia programma proletarskoi revoliutsii" (The War Program of the 
Proletarian Revolution), in Sochineniia (Works) (3d ed., 30 vols.; Moscow, 
Institut Lenina, 1928-37), XIX, 325. See also History of the Communist 
Party of the Soviet Union (New York, International Publishers, 1939), p. 
169. 



Self-Interpretation 43 

revolution will be the result of the exploding contradictions 
in a fully matured capitalist country — and not even the tri- 
umph of the Bolshevik Revolution made him abandon this 
conviction. His hesitation to acknowledge the socialist char- 
acter of the revolution is well known — a hesitation in spite 
of his thesis that the "bourgeois-democratic revolution" 
had to be surpassed by a workers' and peasants' revolution 
which would replace the parliamentary republic by a 
Soviet republic. As late as March, 1919, he called the Oc- 
tober Revolution a "bourgeois revolution in so far as the 
class struggle on the countryside had not yet developed." * 
And he added that only in the summer of 1918 did the real 
proletarian revolution on the countryside begin. He clung 
to the notion that the Russian Revolution must be rescued 
by the German revolution. 

But it is precisely Lenin's belief in the tentative and pre- 
liminary character of the Russian Revolution which leads 
him to formulations clearly foreshadowing the Stalinist 
policy. Socialism presupposes capitalism — or at least the 
achievements of capitalism, namely, a high degree of in- 
dustrialization, a high productivity of labor, and a highly 
developed, skilled, and disciplined labor force. Stages in 
this sequence may perhaps be "jumped" (Lenin was hesi- 
tant also with respect to this problem^), but without the 
achievements of a fully industrialized and rationalized 

* His speech on rural policy to the Eighth Congress of the Russian Com- 
munist Party, March 23, 1918, in Sochineniia (Works), XXIV, 162. 

^ See for example the contradictory statements in "Two Tactics of Social 
Democracy" (written in 1905), in Selected Works, III, 75; and in the 
report of the Commission on the National and Colonial Question to the 
Second World Congress of the Comintern, 1920, in Selected Works, X, 
239-44. 



44 Political Tenets 

economy there can be no socialism, no distribution of the 
social product according to individual needs and faculties. 
In a backward country, industrialization has priority over 
socialization, that is, over production and distribution ac- 
cording to individual needs. At the meeting of the All- 
Russian Central Executive Committee in April, 1918, in 
his polemic against the "left Communists" who foresaw the 
"road to state capitalism," Lenin declared: 

In reality, state capitalism would be a step forward for us. If we 
were capable of attaining state capitalism in Russia within a short 
time, this would be a victory. ... I said that state capitalism 
would be our savior. If we would have it in Russia, then the 
transition to full socialism would be easy and certain. For state 
capitalism is a system of centralization, integration, control, and 
socialization. And this is precisely what we lack.^ 

And one month later he quoted a statement of September, 
1917, to the effect that "state-monopolistic capitalism is the 
complete material preparation for socialism," the "ante- 
room" of socialism, the historical stage immediately pre- 
ceding socialism, and he added, "Is it not clear, that, in the 
material, economic sense, in terms of production, we are 
not yet in the 'anteroom' of socialism? And that we cannot 
reach the door to socialism by any other way than through 
this 'anteroom'?" ^ 

The implications of these statements remain obscured 
by the fact that the German revolution of 1918 seemed to 

" Sochineniia (Works), XXII, 482. 

' "O 'levom' rebiachestve i mel'koburzhuaznosti" (On "Leftist" In- 
fantilism and Petty-Bourgeois Attitudes), Pravda, May 9-11, 1918. 



Self-Interpretation 45 

unleash that chain of revolutions in mature countries which 
would restore the "orthodox" way of international revolu- 
tion. The Soviet state would not only be "protected" by the 
proletarian state of a highly developed industrial country 
but would also share in its technical and material wealth, 
and the transition to socialism would thus be secured and 
accelerated. The almost desperate orientation toward Ger- 
many is contained in the record of the meetings of the Com- 
intern and its executive committee and of Lenin's speeches 
during the first years of the revolution. But from about 
1921 on, Soviet policy drew the consequences from the 
defeat of the German revolution. In view of the central 
role which the relationship between mature capitalism and 
the transition to socialism plays in Marxian theory, the 
failure of the German revolution — coupled with the grow- 
ing leadership of the United States in the reconstruction of 
the Western world — seemed to necessitate a reevaluation 
of the international development. If the capitalist potential 
should, for a long time to come, prove stronger than the 
revolutionary potential, if not even the First World War 
and its effect on the economy could break the hold of re- 
formism over the "mature proletariat," then the historical 
agent of the revolution had changed not only in a geograph- 
ical but also in a social sense. If there was real "capitalist 
stabilization," then not only would the Soviet state, for a 
long time to come, "coexist" with the far more powerful 
capitalist world, but it would also have to look toward the 
developing revolutionary movement in the colonial and 
semicolonial countries as more than a mere "reserve" for 



46 Political Tenets 

the revolutionary army. Not only the international strat- 
egy, but also the construction of socialism in Soviet society, 
would have to be redefined. 

Lenin's Pravda article, "Better Fewer, But Better," 
(March, 1923), combines the traditional and the new eval- 
uation of the international development in a few telescoped 
propositions. They center on the statement that the Western 
European capitalist countries are not accomplishing their 
way to socialism "in the way we formerly expected." 
Lenin continued: They "are not accomplishing it by the 
even ripening of socialism, but by the exploitation of some 
countries by others . . . combined with the exploitation 
of the whole of the East." How does imperialist exploita- 
tion of vanquished capitalist countries (in Lenin's context, 
Germany specifically) alter the "expected" accomplish- 
ment of socialism? Lenin's text suggests several answers: 
(a) by shifting the capitalist center from Central Europe to 
the West, ultimately to the United States; ^ (6) by rapidly 
drawing "the East, India, China, etc.," into the capitalist 
world system; (c) by, at the same time, accelerating na- 
tionalist and revolutionary movements in the East (and in 
the vanquished capitalist countries?). Lenin's propositions 
imply, on the one hand, capitalist growth (through the 
"new exploitation of the defeated countries and of the 
East") and, on the other, growth of the revolutionary po- 
tential "in the East" ("we have the advantage in that the 

* In Selected Works, IX, 399. 

*In 1915, in his article "The United States of Europe Slogan," Lenin 
wrote: "In comparison with the United States of America, Europe as a 
whole signifies economic stagnation. . . . The times when the cause of democ- 
racy and Socialism was associated with Europe alone have gone forever." 
Selected Works, V, 140-41. Italics added. 



Self-Interpretation 47 

whole world is now passing into a movement that must give 
rise to world socialist revolution"). 

The difficulties presented by these formulations are aug- 
mented by Lenin's statement that "we are laboring under 
the disadvantage that the imperialists have succeeded in 
splitting the world into two camps." ^" The "disadvantage" 
can only be explained in terms of the new strength accruing 
to capitalism through exploitation of the vanquished coun- 
tries, "combined" with the exploitation of the whole East, 
and through the collaboration of the working classes of the 
imperialist victor countries. Lenin stressed the fact that "a 
number of the oldest states in the West are in a position to 
utilize their victory for the purpose of making a number of 
insignificant concessions to their oppressed classes which, 
insignificant as they are, nevertheless retard the revolution- 
ary movement in these countries and create something 
which has the appearance of class peaceJ^ 

This comes close to Hilferding's conception of the estab- 
lishment of an effective national interest uniting labor and 
capital in advanced imperialist countries. However, in con- 
trast, Lenin's analysis led to a "guidance" for Soviet policy 
which was based on the expectation of interimperialist con- 
flicts and which has become "obligatory" for Soviet Marx- 
ism. Here again, the ambiguities of Lenin's statements are 
striking. He raised the question of how to "save ourselves 
from the impending conflict with these imperialist coun- 

^^ Selected Works, IX, 399. In Stalinist theory, in view of the greatly 
increased strength of the Communist camp, this "split" appears as an ad- 
vantage, and as a success, not of the "imperialists," but of the Com- 
munists. 

"/6td., IX, 398. Italics added. 



48 Political Tenets 

tries," thereby implying the typical Stalinist contraposition 
of the Soviet and the imperialist camp. But he immediately 
answered with the "hope that the internal antagonisms and 
conflicts between the thriving imperialist countries of the 
West and the thriving imperialist countries of the East will 
give us a second respite," ^^ without discussing the obvious 
possibility that the former conflict (between the imperialist 
countries and the Soviet Union) may "neutralize" or "sus- 
pend" the conflict within the imperialist camp. In any case, 
he declared, the "final outcome" of the struggle between 
socialism and imperialism, namely, the victory of socialism, 
is "absolutely assured" by the fact that the population of 
"Russia, India, China, etc.," constitutes the overwhelming 
majority of the earth's population, and is rapidly being 
"drawn into the struggle for its emancipation." What was 
"interesting" to Lenin was not the final outcome, but the 
Soviet policy of "preventing the West European counter- 
revolutionary states from crushing us." And he held that 
the Soviet policy of "ensuring our existence" until this 
conflict erupted, must aim at making the East "more civil- 
ized." And this in turn made it necessary "to develop 
electrification, hydro-peat, to construct Volkhovstroy, etc." 
"In this and in this alone lies our hope." ^^ 

Without reconciling them, Lenin's analysis contains the 
old and the new elements of the situation: the "internal 
antagonisms and conflicts within the imperialist camp" 

"Ibid., IX, 399. The conception of the respite or "breathing space" 
began to play a decisive role in Soviet foreign and domestic policy in 1920. 
See E. H. Carr, The Bolshevik Revolution, 1917-1923 (3 vols.; London, 
MacmiUan, 1953), III, 318 £F. 

^Selected Works, IX, 400-401. 



Self -Interpretation 49 

stand side by side with the "impending conflict" between 
this camp and the Soviet state. The policy conclusions 
which Lenin derived from this analysis take equal account 
of both sets of contradictions. 

The interimperialist contradictions. The survival of the 
Soviet state depends ultimately on them. The Soviet state 
must obtain and preserve a long "respite" by utilizing the 
conflicts among the imperialist powers. Thus Lenin had al- 
ready formulated the substance of Soviet foreign policy at 
the Eighth All-Russian Congress of Soviets in December, 
1920: "Our existence depends, first, on the existence of a 
radical split in the camp of the imperialist Powers." ^* 

The contradictions between the capitalist world and the 
Soviet state. Temporary stabilization and "class peace" in 
the victorious capitalist countries shifts the revolutionary 
potential from these countries to the "revolutionary and 
nationalist East." The shift is more than a geographical 
change — it signifies the emergence of a new agent of the 
historical process. Lenin designated this agent only as the 
population of "Russia, India, China, etc." The vagueness 
of this designation is characteristic: Lenin did not intro- 
duce a new theoretical concept which would alter the struc- 
ture of Marxian doctrine, nor did he elaborate the notion 
of the new international character of the class struggle. But 
his policy guidance is clear: the interimperialist contradic- 
tions are the decisive ones; they must be utilized for the 
accomplishment of the main task — Soviet industrializa- 
tion. 

^* Sochineniia (Works), XXVI, 14-15. For translation see Carr, The 
Bolshevik Revolution, III, 331. 



50 Political Tenets 

Soviet Marxism has followed Lenin's twofold guidance: 
its main theoretical effort has been to correlate the two sets 
of contradictions as a basis for policy, and to determine 
their relative weight. We cannot discuss here the various 
turns and variants of the Soviet Marxist analysis of the 
international situation from the Fifth Congress of the Com- 
intern in 1924 to the Twentieth Party Congress in 1956, 
but we shall try to demonstrate that the basic Soviet con- 
ception of capitalist development has not fundamentally 
changed throughout the entire period. To be sure, the zig- 
zag of right and left turns has continued in Communist 
tactics, but since the Sixth World Congress at the latest, 
they appear as short-lived tactical trials in contradistinc- 
tion — and often in conflict — to the underlying conception 
and strategy. In order to clarify this distinction between 
tactical devices and the basic conception, we shall begin by 
trying to identify the Soviet Marxist categories which have 
remained constant throughout the various turns during the 
Stalinist period. 

THE ANALYSIS OF CONTEMPORARY CAPITALISM 

Soviet Marxism sees the entire capitalist development 
since the First World War as comprising one period: the 
subdivisions of this period appear to represent only stages 
in the growth of one and the same basic trend. Its main fea- 
tures ^^ as interpreted by Soviet Marxism are as follows: 

^°They are taken from: (a) the program, theses, and resolutions of the 
Comintern; (b) the theoretical statements of Soviet leaders that have been 
"canonized" as obligatory; (c) the principal discussions and papers of 
Soviet economists, especially the discussions of 1947 (the Varga contro- 
versy), 1949, and 1950, and the analyses of the contemporaiy capitalist 
situation in Voprosy Ekonomild (Problems of Economics) after the Nine- 
teenth Party Congress. Specific references will be given below. 



Self -Interpretation 51 

1. The triumph of monopoly capitalism over the surviv- 
ing elements of "free" capitalism 

2. The organization of monopoly capitalism on an inter- 
national scale on the basis of a permanent (potential or ac- 
tual) war economy, with growing "state capitalist tenden- 
cies 

3. Economic and political subjugation of the weaker 
capitalist powers by the stronger, and of the stronger by the 
strongest capitalist power (the United States) ; thereby cre- 
ation of large intercontinental areas of "exploitation" 

4. Total mobilization of all human, material, and tech- 
nical resources for the struggle against communism 

5. Restriction or outright abolition of the democratic 
process, of civil and political liberties, and of liberal and 
humanitarian ideologies 

6. Containment, by force and by "corruption," of the 
revolutionary potential within the capitalist system 

7. Global sociopolitical division into the "imperialist" 
and "socialist" camp 

Before explaining this interpretation, three questions 
must be answered: (1) How does Soviet Marxism justify 
the assumption of one basic trend for the entire period 
after the First World War in view of the obvious difficulty 
of placing fascism and the Western democracies, the 
"grand alliance" and the "cold war" on one common de- 
nominator? (2) How is the notion of the successful contain- 
ment of the revolutionary forces within the capitalist sys- 
tem reconcilable with the recurrent "left turns" and ag- 
gressive ventures of Communist strategy, and (3) with the 
spectacular growth of the French and Italian Communist 
parties after the Second World War? 



52 Political Tenets 

As to the first question, Soviet Marxism sees fascism as a 
specific phase in the national and international class strug- 
gle, namely, as the open, terroristic "dictatorship of the 
most reactionary, most chauvinistic and most imperialist 
elements of finance capital." ^*' This dictatorship is the at- 
tempt to "solve" the capitalist crisis by intensified exploita- 
tion of the working classes and of the colonies, by the "en- 
slavement of the weak nations," and by preparing or actu- 
ally waging war against the Soviet Union. This formulation 
contains all the chief characteristics subsequently applied 
to "Anglo-American or American imperialism." Such 
transfer is implied in Point 3 of the Soviet Marxist analy- 
sis: the hierarchical international organization of contem- 
porary capitalism under the supremacy of the strongest 
economic power, necessitating the sacrifice of traditional 
sovereignties and democratic liberties. The economic basis 
for German Fascist supremacy was too narrow. This 
"anomaly" was corrected by the Second World War, 
which redressed the international balance and redivided 
the spheres of influence in accordance with actual economic 
strength, that is, with the emergence of the United States as 
the strongest capitalist power. Fascism and the defeat of 
fascism thus appear as "logical" steps in the international 
reorganization of monopoly capitalism. 

But if the struggle against the Soviet Union is one of the 
essential elements of this reorganization (Point 4), how 

"Thirteenth Plenum of the Executive Committee of the Comintern: 
Theses and Decisions (New York, Workers Library Publishers, 1934), pp. 
3f. ; Dimitrov's report to the Seventh World Congress of the Comintern, 
1935, in United Front Against Fascism (New York, New Century Publishers, 
1935), pp. 5-7. 



Self-Interpretation 53 

can one explain the alliance between the capitalist West 
and the USSR during the Second World War? Soviet Marx- 
ism has two answers: (a) the Western powers needed the 
aid of the USSR to defeat German Fascism, and (6) even 
during the alliance, the Western struggle against the USSR 
continued (cited as examples are the delay in opening the 
second front, Churchill's Balkan strategy, and the Western 
powers' alleged efforts to obtain a separate peace with 
Germany). 

As to the second and third questions, before the Second 
World War, Soviet Marxism subdivided the contemporary 
capitalist development into three periods. The acute revo- 
lutionary situation after the First World War (the "first 
period") was followed by a period of "relative stabiliza- 
tion" (the "second period"). In his first Political Report 
to the Central Committee, delivered at the Fourteenth Party 
Congress in 1925, Stalin analyzed the international situa- 
tion in terms of a "stabilization of capitalism." He called 
it a temporary and "partial" stabilization,^^ and three 
years later, at the Sixth World Congress of the Comintern, 
the coming of a "third period" was announced. The Com- 
munist parties were directed toward leftist radicalism. 
Mass demonstrations in the face of resolute armed resist- 
ance, the disastrous struggle against "social fascist" labor 
parties and trade unions, alliances with the extreme right, 
the proclamation of a new "revolutionary tide" in China — 
these were the manifestations of the left turn, which seemed 
to find its economic justification in the great depression of 

"Political Report of the Central Committee (Moscow, Foreign Languages 
Publishing House, 1950), pp. 10 f. 



54 Political Tenets 

1929. In 1932, the Twelfth Plenum of the Executive Com- 
mittee of the Comintern again announced the "end of cap- 
italist stabilization" and the beginning of a new cycle of 
wars and revolutions. The "third period" was said to be 
characterized by a "growing revolutionary upsurge" in the 
capitalist countries and by a "sharpening of tlie economic 
crisis." ^^ This is perhaps the most extreme "left turn" the 
Comintern made after the failure of the Central European 
revolution, and in his report to the Plenum on the interna- 
tional situation Kuusinen stated that every effort should be 
made to "prepare the proletariat and the rest of the work- 
ing population for the struggle for power in the new pe- 
riod." ^^ But the strategy directions seem to presuppose 
quite a different evaluation of the capitalist situation. The 
Thesis on Kuusinen's report adopted by the Twelfth Ple- 
num has, in contrast to the report itself, a predominantly 
defensive tone. Although retaining the phrase, "the grow- 
ing revolutionary upsurge," the Thesis calls for the strug- 
gle against the "capitalist offensive" ~^ rather than for the 
seizure of power, for waging the class struggle "on the 
basis of the united front from below," "^ for a mass politi- 
cal strike when the "proper condition for it exists," ^^ and 
ends with the usual exhortation to the Communist parties 
to direct the movement "along the channel of the World 
Socialist Revolution." 

^Capitalist Stabilization Has Ended; Thesis and Resolutions of the 
Twelfth Plenum of the Executive Committee of the Communist Interna- 
tional (New York, Workers Library Publishers, 1932), p. 7. 

"0. Kuusinen, Prepare for Power (New York, Workers Library Pub- 
lishers 1932) p. 40. 

^ Capitalist Stabilization Has Ended p. 16. ^ Ibid. p. 22. 

'^Ibid. p. 17. 



Self-Interpretation 55 

Thus even the most "leftist" Comintern program does 
not contradict our assumption that Stalinist strategy im- 
plied effective containment of the revolutionary potential in 
the Western world after the failure of the Central European 
revolutions. The strategy of the "united front against fas- 
cism," which followed in 1935, went one step further in 
acknowledging the decline of the revolutionary potential 
in the West, by committing the Communist parties to a 
"minimum program" within the framework of the "bour- 
geois-democratic" state. 

The situation at the end of the Second World War may 
serve as another illustration of the degree to which Stalinist 
policy, in spite of declarations to the contrary, operated 
under the assumption of a "capitalist stabilization." At 
that time, in France and Italy, the popular strength of the 
Communist parties was greater than ever before, and, for 
the first time, their armed strength seemed adequate for 
an attempt at seizing power. However, after a few scattered 
and uncoordinated local putsches, the Communists pursued 
a policy of cooperation, surrendered their military units, 
and adhered to a "minimum program" which, even during 
the subsequent period of the great political strikes, never 
aimed at revolution as the immediate objective. This strat- 
egy may be explained by the weakness of its "mass basis." 
The national Communist parties were confronted with a sit- 
uation which defied the traditional concepts of Marxian 
revolutionary strategy; it soon became apparent that they 
fought in an entirely different arena. The Allied armies 
which, together with the legitimate national contingents, 
confronted the Communists in France, Italy, and Western 



56 Political Tenets 

Germany, unmistakably symbolized the new situation 
which continued to prevail even after their withdrawal: 
the "class enemy" could no longer be defeated "on the bar- 
ricades" in Paris or Lyon or Toulouse, in Milan or Turin 
or Bologna. Its central positions now were in Washington 
and New York, in the Allied headquarters and commis- 
sions. The civil war had become a matter of international, 
intercontinental policy in a far more objective sense than 
that of a dictatorship of the USSR over foreign Communist 
parties. And in the international constellation at the end of 
the war, all the odds were in the hands of the Western 
Allies, specifically, of the United States. To be sure, after 
the quick Western demobilization, the Soviet armies could 
have overrun the Continent. But if Marxism played any 
role at all in Soviet policy decisions, then it influenced 
Stalin to the extent that he could not envisage the defeat 
of the capitalist world through a blitzkrieg in Europe, 
waged by an exhausted and largely destroyed Russia 
against the practically unimpaired forces of the econom- 
ically most powerful nation in the world. And Stalin, whose 
theory still stuck to the traditional notion of the aggravat- 
ing interimperialist contradictions, may well have been 
surprised at the rapidity with which the "united capitalist 
front" against Communism reasserted itself after the war 
(Churchill's speech at Fulton, Missouri, 1946; the "Tru- 
man Doctrine" and the Marshall Plan, 1947; Anglo- 
American negotiations on the Ruhr, 1947). 

The Stalinist answer was the doctrine of the "two camps" 
and the aggressive strategy of 1947-1948 usually associ- 
ated with Zhdanov. The doctrine comes closest to the open 



Self-Interpretation 57 

recognition of international capitalist unification "^ and 
thus closest to discarding the traditional notion of the inner 
imperialist contradictions — though it actually does neither. 
For the "two-camp" doctrine includes the Western prole- 
tariat in the "anti-imperialist camp" and reiterates the idea 
of the inevitability of internal and external wars. At about 
the same time, Varga's cautious recognition of the stabiliz- 
ing and "productive" function of the capitalist state at this 
stage was violently rejected. Stalinist foreign policy fol- 
lowed the notion underlying the "two-camp" doctrine that 
the contradictions between the imperialist and the Com- 
munist camp had, for the time being, superseded those be- 
tween the imperialist powers: Communist rule was tight- 
ened and expanded; loopholes were being closed (estab- 
lishment of Cominform, 1947; coup in Czechoslovakia, 
Soviet walkout from the Allied Control Council in Ger- 
many, Berlin blockade, and break with Tito, 1948). But as 
early as 1948-1949, the intransigent Communist strategy 
in the West was petering out (failure and abandonment of 
the political strikes in France and Italy) and was being re- 
placed by a new "united-front" policy, which has been re- 
tained and stepped up ever since. In tlie East, the course 
was different: the Indian party adhered to an extreme left 
strategy until 1950; military operations in Indo-China 
were increased ; and the war in Korea began at a time v/hen 
the Western parties were on the defensive. During the en- 

^ See Zhdanov's report to the Cominform conference, September 1947, in 
The Strategy and Tactics of World Communism, House Document No. 619, 
Supplement I, p. 216. "A new alignment of poHtical forces has arisen." 
Zhdanov continued by stating that the Western as well as the Far and 
Middle Eastern countries in the "imperialist camp" follow the leadership 
of the United States in all main questions. 



58 Political Tenets 

tire Stalinist period, Western and Eastern policy were 
never effectively correlated; from the time of the dismal 
consequences of Stalinist "guidances" in the first phases 
of the Chinese revolution, Stalinism seemed to follow 
rather than direct the momentum of the "colonial revolu- 
tions." There, tlie new historical agent of the revolution 
seemed to ripen "naturally," and the peasant masses, 
which Lenin had incorporated into revolutionary strategy, 
seemed to fulfill their function. The West, the capitalist 
world, remained the determining problem for Soviet Marx- 
ism. 

The Soviet Marxist interpretation of capitalism centers 
on the notion of the "general crisis" of the capitalist sys- 
tem. The crisis itself is seen as expressive of the monopo- 
listic stage of capitalist development — a stage at which the 
fundamental conflict between the social character of the 
productive forces and their private capitalist utilization 
has reached its peak, the last stage before the turning point 
to socialism. The foreign policy of the Western nations and 
the internal economic and political changes within these 
nations are explained in terms of this conflict.^* 

The "general crisis," which comprises a whole historical 
period, is subdivided into two main phases.^^ The second 

^ For what follows see: M. Rubinshtein, "Osnovnoi ekonomicheskii zakon 
sovremennogo kapitalizma" (The Basic Economic Law of Contemporary 
Capitalism), Voprosy Ekonomiki (Problems of Economics), 1952, No. 10, 
pp. 38-55; I. Lemin, "Obostrenie protivorechii i neizbezhnost' voin mezhdu 
kapitalisticheskimi stranami" (The Sharpening of Contradictions and the 
Unavoidability of Wars Between Capitalist Countries), Voprosy Ekonomiki 
(Problems of Economics), 1952, No. 12, pp. 34-53; and I. Trakhtenberg, 
"Osobennosti vosproizvodstva i krizisov v sovremennom kapitalizme" (Char- 
acteristics of Production and Crises in Contemporary Capitalism), Voprosy 
Ekonomiki (Problems of Economics), 1952, No. 10, pp. 69-85. 

^ For example, G. V. Kozlov, "Obshchii krizis kapitalisma i ego obostrenie 



Self-Interpretation 59 

phase, which began with the Second World War, is the 
sharpening of the crisis. The crisis itself was unleashed 
by the emergence of the Soviet state and was intensified 
by its subsequent growth. The specific features of the 
crisis are the tremendous shrinking of the capitalist world 
market and the establishment of two parallel but op- 
posed world markets: the capitalist and the "socialist." 
While the former decreases, the latter increases without de- 
pression and dislocation — steadily. Much of the colonial 
and semicolonial and almost the whole Eastern European 
market has "broken away" from the capitalist orbit. More- 
over, capitalism has not only been cut off from a large part 
of its former sales market but also from access to many of 
its former resources of raw materials and cheap labor. 
The consequence: capitalist production proceeds on an 
ever-narrowing basis; the difficulties in the extraction and 
realization of surplus value and, therefore, of profit (al- 
ready greatly intensified by the "higher organic composi- 
tion" of capital, that is — in terms of total capital — the 
growing proportion of constant capital and the decreasing 
proportion of wages) increase, and force the most power- 
ful capitalist groups into a brutal struggle for their share in 
the greatly reduced market. This in turn aggravates the 
competitive conflicts among the capitalist powers. The 
struggle for markets assumes, at the late imperialistic 
stage, the form of the subjugation of the weaker by the 
stronger capitalist powers, culminating in the supremacy 



na sovremennom etape" (The General Crisis of Capitalism and Its Sharpen- 
ing at the Present Stage), Voprosy Ekonomiki (Problems of Economics), 
1952, No. 4, pp. 68 ff. 



60 Political Tenets 

of American imperialism. According to Soviet Marxism, 
the trend indicated by Lenin in 1915 has reached its apex. 
The militarization of the economy, the "classical" feature 
of imperialism, becomes the "normal" state of affairs. The 
war economy, while yielding monopolistic surplus profits 
to the top capitalists, depresses the level of consumption 
even in the richest capitalist countries, channels the bulk of 
capitalist investments into direct and indirect war indus- 
tries, and thus increases the disproportionality between the 
two main divisions of capitalist production. The crisis af- 
fects the very reproduction of the system. 

According to this interpretation, the rise of the Soviet 
state has set in motion a chain reaction which, by intensify- 
ing the inherent capitalist contradictions, has aggravated 
the conflicts between the capitalist powers.^*' This was the 
theoretical conclusion at the time of the Sixteenth Party 
Congress (1930) and again at the time of the Twentieth 
Congress (1956). The contradictions which, in the Marx- 
ian conception, are inherent in the structure of capitalist 
production, reassert themselves as the determining ones — 
contrary to all appearances. Soviet Marxism consistently 
denies that the international integration of capitalism into 
one camp against the common enemy can "neutralize" 
these contradictions. The doctrines of "ultraimperialism" 

^ I. Lemin, "Obostrenie protivorechii i neizbezhnost' voin mezhdu kapi- 
talisticheskimi stranami" (The Sharpening of Contradictions and the Un- 
avoidability of Wars between Capitalist Countries), Voprosy Ekonomiki 
(Problems of Economics), 1952, No. 12, p. 44. This gives the reasons for 
the violent reaction against Varga's book, Izmeneniia v ekonomike kapitalizma 
V itoge vtoroi mirovoi voiny (Changes in the Economy of Capitalism Re- 
sulting from the Second World War) (Moscow, Gospolitizdat, 1946). See 
p. 66 below. 



Self -Interpretation 61 

and "organized capitalism" are again emphatically re- 
jected ^' — as they were forty years ago. The efforts of the 
American monopolists to establish an American "world 
trust" have failed. The competitive conflicts within the cap- 
italist orbit sharpen in spite of all integration; the "subju- 
gated" nations balk and strive for reconquering their for- 
mer position in the world market; Western Germany and 
Japan reemerge as the most dangerous competitors."^ The 
operation of the fundamental economic laws which in 
Marxian theory determine the course of events thus leads 
to the growth and explosion of the imperialist contradic- 
tions, to military conflicts within the imperialist camp, to 
the "further deepening of the general crisis of the capitalist 
system and the approach of its final breakdown." "^ 

There are the customary warnings against interpreting 
the situation in terms of an impending collapse of the cap- 
italist system. Thus, Trakhtenberg states that the increasing 
difficulty in finding a "way out" of the economic crisis does 
not mean the "absolute impossibility" of a way out, nor of 
a prolongation of the crisis. He points to the inflationary 
boom of the armament economy prevailing in the capitalist 
orbit at present, but concludes by reiterating that under the 
surface of a capitalist "revival" the disintegrating forces 
of the economic crisis continue to grow.^'* 

It is hard to see how the thesis on the sharpening capital- 

^ I. Lemin, "Obostrenie protivorechii i neizbezhnost' voin mezhdu kapi- 
talisticheskimi stranami" (The Sharpening of Contradictions and the Un- 
avoidability of Wars between Capitalist Countries) , Voprosy Ekonomiki 
(Problems of Economics), 1952, No. 12, p. 45. 

"^Ibid., p. 40. ^Ibid., p. 53. 

^ I. Trakhtenberg, "Osobennostl vosproizvodstva i krizisov v sovremennom 
kapitalizme" (Characteristics of Reproduction and Crises in Contemporary 



62 Political Tenets 

ist crisis can provide the pivotal orientation for Soviet 
Marxism. Repeated for over thirty years in apparent con- 
tradiction to the facts, it seems so paradoxical that it is eas- 
ily dismissed as propaganda. In reality, however, it is a 
policy-making concept. 

In Marxist terminology, the "general crisis" of capital- 
ism (as distinguished from cyclical "depressions") is char- 
acterized by the fact that capitalism is no longer capable of 
functioning in its "classical," "normal" way. The repro- 
duction of capitalist society can no longer be left to (rela- 
tively) free enterprise and (relatively) free competition, 
with the economic laws asserting themselves freely, i.e., in 
a blind and anarchic manner. The advent of "imperialism" 
terminates the "classical" period of capitalism and initi- 
ates its general crisis; the system can continue to function 
only through expanding state controls with monopolistic 
regimentation and domination, wars or preparation for 
wars, and "intensified exploitation." The "general crisis" 
does not mean impending collapse and a revolutionary sit- 
uation, but rather a whole stage of historical development. 
Thus it means at the same time the continued existence of 
the capitalist system, and far from excluding "stabiliza- 
tions," it implies them as its very essence. To Soviet Marx- 
ism, the determining factor in the world situation is that 
the development of socialism coexists with and parallels 
the general crisis of capitalism (instead of following it, as 
envisaged by Marxian theory). 



Capitalism), Voprosy Ekonomiki (Problems of Economics), 1952, No. 10, 
p. 85, 



Self -Interpretation 63 

The theses on the tasks of the Comintern and the Com- 
munist Party of the Soviet Union (CPSU) in 1925, as 
adopted by the Fourteenth Conference of the CPSU, speak 
of "two stabilizations": "Side by side with the partial 
stabilization of capitalism in bourgeois Europe occurs the 
indubitable growth of state industry and the strengthening 
of the socialist elements of the national economy in the 
USSR." ^^ The "partial stabilization of capitalism" to 
which these theses referred has, according to Soviet theory, 
since been surpassed by other (and even more lasting) 
forms of partial stabilization (permanent war economy 
and the formation of one "imperialist camp"), but the 
parallelism has remained, and with it the "anomaly" of 
the development toward socialism. As long as it prevails, 
it is likely to be the basic factor in the orientation of Soviet 
policy. In this respect, too, "coexistence" is not merely a 
statement of fact but also a statement of theory. As such 
it appeared in Lenin's last political guidance, in the 
Resolutions of the Fourteenth Party Congress,^" and it has 
not been discarded since. Even at the time of the founda- 
tion of the Cominform and the corresponding intransigent 
and "hard" foreign policy, Zhdanov declared that "Soviet 
foreign policy proceeds from the fact of the coexistence 
for a long period of the two systems — capitalism and so- 
cialism. From this it follows that cooperation between the 

"^ V sesoiuznaia Kommunisticheskaia Partita (B) v rezolintsiiakh i re- 
sheniiakh s"ezdov konferentsii, i plenumov TsK (The All-Unon Communist 
Party [Bolsheviks] in the Resohitions and Decisions of Congresses, Confer- 
ences, and Plenums of the Central Committee) (2 vols.; Moscow, Gospolitiz- 
dat, 1936), II, 27. 

"^Ibid., II, 48. 



64 Political Tenets 

USSR and countries with other systems is possible, pro- 
vided that the principle of reciprocity is observed and that 
obligations once assumed are honoured." ^^ Coexistence 
makes the avoidance of a military conflict with the major 
"imperialist" powers (in Soviet language, a "policy of 
peace") the objective that must stand in the center of the 
entire foreign policy of the government and must "deter- 
mine all its basic steps" ^^ — not because of any innate 
peacefulness of the Soviet leaders, but because such a 
conflict would "suspend" the capitalist contradictions and 
break the "respite" which Lenin declared the prerequisite 
for the survival of the Soviet state. Just as the "general 
crisis" of capitalism marks a whole period of historical de- 
velopment, so does the "respite": it comprises nothing less 
than the time required for bringing the civilization of the 
backward East up to the level of the advanced industrial 
countries. If and when this objective has been attained, 
another turning point in the development of Soviet so- 
ciety and capitalist society will have been reached: the 
commencing of the "second phase" of socialism would 
also initiate the reactivation of the revolutionary potential 
in the Western world. 

Within the framework of this analysis (extremely crude 
and superficial if compared with the theoretical work of 
Hilferding, Rosa Luxemburg, Lenin, and Bucharin), modi- 
fications and corrections have been introduced since the 

^^ Report at the Cominform conference, September, 1947, in The Strategy 
and Tactics of World Communism, House Document No. 619, Supplement 
I, p. 219. 

^ Vsesoiuznaia Kommunisticheskaia Partiia (B) (The All-Union Com- 
munist Party [Bolsheviks]), II, 48. 



Self-Interpretation 65 

time of the Nineteenth Congress of the CPSU. They appear 
first as mere changes in emphasis, trifling enough and not 
altering the underlying conception. However, they assume 
greater significance in the context of Soviet developments 
during the last period of Stalin's life and after his death, 
as anticipating the possibility of a long term shift in Soviet 
policy. In this function, they will be discussed in the chap- 
ter on "The Transition from Socialism to Communism"; 
here only a preliminary statement will be given. 

The first of these modifications concerns the interimperi- 
alist contradictions and those between the Western world 
and the Soviet camp. Stalinist policy was in its general 
tendency oriented toward the actual predominance of the 
East- West conflict over the interimperialist contradictions. 
Then, at the time of the Nineteenth Congress, a shift be- 
came noticeable. It was first announced by Stalin's dictum 
on a theoretical controversy: he enjoined the party and its 
spokesmen that the interimperialist contradictions must be 
considered as the determining ones.'^'' "Theoretically," the 
conflict between the capitalist and socialist camp is greater 
than the interimperialist conflicts — "in actuality," how- 
ever, the latter supersede the former. The derogatory con- 
trast between theory and actuality here served as a warn- 
ing to bring both into line. And indeed, Stalin's statement 
was followed by a reexamination of the international situa- 
tion and by a change in domestic and foreign policy which 
has become ever more conspicuous since his death. The 
statement suggested the increasing reliance on the "nor- 

^ "Economic Problems of Socialism in the USSR," in Current Soviet 
Policies, ed. by Leo Gruliow (New York, F. A. Praeger, 1953), pp. 7 ff. 



66 Political Tenets 

mal" workings of the international political economy, on 
the inherent difficulties of the capitalist system rather than 
on an assault on its positions from without.^' 

The second modification pertains to the evaluation of 
contemporary monopoly capitalism, more specifically, to 
that of the growing economic and political function of 
the state in the present era. The question whether or not 
Soviet Marxism could admit the emergence of "state capi- 
talism" had played a considerable role in the postwar dis- 
cussion. Varga's book, published in 1946, had been re- 
jected because of its emphasis on state capitalism, particu- 
larly as manifested in the United States. His notion of the 
integrating and organizing role of the capitalist state 
seemed to vitiate the Marxian thesis of the class character 
of the state and of the impossibility of coping with the 
"anarchic" character of capitalism through centralized 
planning. For Soviet Marxism this was not only an ideo- 
logical off^ense; it threatened to undermine the theoretical 
ground of a revolutionary strategy which denied the ,long 
range effectiveness of capitalist stabilization. In defense 
of his thesis on the strengthening of the capitalist state and 
its changing role in the capitalist "war economy," Varga 
had cited Lenin's proposition on the "transformation of 
monopoly capitalism into state-monopoly capitalism" ^^ 
as suggesting the advent of a new stage of imperialist de- 
velopment which can no longer be interpreted in the sacro- 
sanct terms of the previous stage. But, in spite of the fact 

^^For the modification of the thesis on the "inevitability of war" see pp. 
161 f. below. 

^'In the Preface to the first edition of State and Revolution (New York, 
International Publishers, 1932), p. 5. 



Self -Interpretation 67 

that in the subsequent discussion of Varga's book such 
transformation was recognized,^^ his position was rejected. 
Only "state-capitalist tendencies'' were acknowledged, but 
no new stage characterized by "state capitalism." ^^ Recent 
articles/*' however, speak without reservation of "state- 
monopolistic capitalism" and lay great stress on the posi- 
tive economic function of the capitalist state — much in 
the sense used in Varga's previously condemned book. 
Again, the change in emphasis seems quite insignificant, 
especially since the same articles stress, in traditional So- 
viet Marxist terms, the progressing "decay" of monopoly 
capitalism and the aggravated tensions in its economy, in- 
ternal as well as international. The possibility of any "ul- 
traimperialist" integration of the capitalist world is just 
as strongly ridiculed as it was before, and capitalist unity 
is pictured as permeated with intense competitive conflicts 
on a reduced world market. However, these well-known 
cliches of Stalinist doctrine now appear within a program- 
matic reevaluation of capitalism. The flat rejection of 
one of the most intensively publicized theses in Stalin's 

'^English translation of this discussion in Soviet Views on the Post-War 
World Economy (Washington, D.C., Public Affairs Press, 1948) ; see espe- 
cially p. 9. 

^^ E. Varga, "The Decline of British Imperialism," in Current Digest of the 
Soviet Press, II, No. 32 (September 23, 1950), pp. 3 ff. (condensed from 
Voprosy Ekonomiki [Problems of Economics], 1950, No. 4, pp. 48-71). 

*" V. Cheprakov, "Burshuaznye ekonomisty i gosudarstvenno-monopolitiche- 
skii kapitalizm" (Bourgeois Economists and State-Monopoly Capitalism), 
Voprosy Ekonomiki (Problems of Economics), 1955, No. 9, pp. 134-47; and 
V. Cheprakov, "Leninskaia teoriia neravnomernosti razvitiia kapitalizma i 
obostrenie mezhimperialisticheskikh protivorechii v poslevoennyi period" 
(The Leninist Theory of the Unequal Development of Capitalism and the 
Sharpening of the Imperialistic Contradictions in the Post-War Period), 
Voprosy Ekonomiki (Problems of Economics), 1956, No. 4, pp. 30-47. 



68 Political Tenets 

last article (namely, the shrinking of production in the 
United States, Britain, and France), ^^ the warning against 
taking a "simplified view of Lenin's theses on the decay of 
imperialism," *^ the admission that since "the time of 
Lenin the world situation has fundamentally changed" ^^ 
— all these in the context of the discussion of the interna- 
tional situation — point to a reformulation of some of the 
sacrosanct tenets of the Stalinist era. The former refusal 
to recognize a "new stage" of capitalist development is at 
least implicitly invalidated when it is acknowledged that 
the improving conditions of the workers and the "growth 
of production in capitalist countries" (though they did 
not take place "on a sound economic foundation") are 
due to "basic factors." They are said to be chiefly the 
following: ^^ (1) the "militarization of the economy" with 
its influence on the general level of output; (2) the expan- 
sion of the capitalist market, which was rendered possible 
by the defeat of Germany and Japan and by the introduc- 
tion of the Marshall Plan; (3) the long overdue renewal 
of fixed capital and modernization of equipment; (4) in- 
tensified "exploitation of the working class," mainly 
through rationalization and the ensuing higher produc- 
tivity of labor. These factors are, of course, operating pre- 
dominantly in the United States, and the fact that they are 
now so heavily emphasized in the most authoritative Soviet 

" Mikoyan, at the Twentieth Party Congress, in XX S"ezd Kommunisti- 
cheskoi Partii Sovetskogo Soiuza (The Twentieth Congress of the Com- 
munist Party of the Soviet Union), I, 323. AUhough Stalin's name was men- 
tioned specifically in the broadcast of Mikoyan's address, it was omitted in 
the official report of the Congress. 

*' Khrushchev, in ibid., I, 15. *" Mikoyan, in ibid., I, 323. 

" Khrushchev, in ibid., I, 15-16, and Khrushchev's speech of November 6, 
1957 (as broadcast by Moscow Home Service, p. A-47). 



Self-Interpretation 69 

Marxist statements is tantamount to a revaluation of the 
strength of American capitalism. The draft resolution of 
the American Communist Party adds another decisive fac- 
tor of strength: "The ruling class was not so hard pressed 
as to be unable to continue its established method of gov- 
ernmental rule." *" In Marxian theory, these economic and 
political factors are indeed "basic" enough to render the 
"repeated estimates of impending economic crisis" "harm- 
ful" and "unrealistic." '**^ 

However, it is important to note again the "positive" as- 
pects of this revaluation for the Soviet state. Quite apart 
from the "unsound foundation" of the stabilized capitalist 
system, the latter would live up to Engels's ^^ and Lenin's ^ 
notion of the "last stage" of capitalism. Fully developed 
"state-monopolistic capitalism" ^^ would better than mere 
state-capitalist "tendencies" qualify for the historical level 
at which capitalism reaches its unsurpassable "limits." 

THE "general crisis" AND THE WESTERN 
PROLETARIAT 

The extent to which the Soviet Marxist argument applies 
the traditional Marxian categories to the analysis of West- 

*'New York Times, September 23, 1956. '"Ibid. 

""Anti-Diihring," in A Handbook of Marxism, ed. by E. Burns (New 
York, International Publishers, 1935), pp. 292 fF. 

*" Imperialism: The Highest Stage of Capitalism (New York, International 
Publishers, 1933), pp. 7, 14, 15. 

" Its main features are summarized in Cheprakov, "Leninskaia teoriia 
neravnomernosti razvitiia kapitalizma i obostrenie mezhimperialisticheskikh 
protivorechii v poslevoennyi period" (The Leninist Theory of the Unequal 
Development of Capitalism and the Sharpening of the Imperialistic Contra- 
dictions in the Post-War Period), Voprosy Ekonomiki (Problems of Eco- 
nomics), 1956, No. 4, pp. 30-47. 



70 Political Tenets 

ern society becomes especially clear in the evaluation of 
the Western proletariat. During the Stalinist period, Soviet 
Marxism denied the existence of an economic basis for any 
long-range stabilization of capitalism; the post-Stalinist 
modifications come close to recognizing such a basis (al- 
though they regard it as "unsound"). In both cases, how- 
ever, Soviet theory denies any fundamental change in the 
class situation. The Western proletariat continues to be 
considered as the revolutionary class (though not in a 
"revolutionary situation"), and, by the same token, as the 
final disruptive force in the general crisis. The very same 
Resolution of the Fourteenth Party Congress which pro- 
claimed a policy of "peaceful coexistence" as the center 
of Soviet foreign policy demanded a strengthening by all 
means of the "union between the proletariat of the USSR, 
as basis for the world revolution, and the Western European 
proletariat and the subjugated peoples." ^*^ In his conclud- 
ing remarks to the Nineteenth Congress, Stalin harked back 
to this union by recalling the role of the Soviet proletariat 
as the "shock brigade" of the "world revolutionary and 
workers' movement." ^^ The Twentieth Congress reiterated 
the thesis that the laboring masses in the capitalist coun- 
tries were the strongest force in the struggle against im- 
perialist aggression. The reconciliation of large sections 
of labor with the capitalist system and the increase in their 
standard of living are explained in terms of "relative im- 
poverishment." Lenin's notion of the "corruption" of the 
"labor aristocracy" is retained with slight modifications: 

^ Vsesoiuznaia Kommunisticheskaia Partita (B) (All-Union Communist 
Party [Bolsheviks]), II, 43. 

" Current Soviet Policies, p. 235. 



Self -Interpretation 71 

the challenge of Soviet socialism, the growth of world 
communism, and the power of organized labor in the capi- 
talist countries compel the monopoly capitalists to "make 
a series of social concessions, whose extent and duration 
depend on the level of the struggle of the working class in 
the capitalist countries." ^' 

But while Soviet theory continues to be concerned with 
the sharpening class struggle in the capitalist countries, 
Soviet policy has adjusted itself to the factual situation and 
has put the Western proletariat "on ice" until the turning 
point is reached at which it will be reactivated as a revo- 
lutionary force. The lumping together of the proletariat 
with other "peace-loving" social groups indicates recogni- 
tion of the underlying historical tendency. The "revolu- 
tionary class" assumes the features of democratic reform- 
ism. Soviet Marxism makes use of a well-known theoretical 
concept in order to explain and justify this tendency. 

According to Soviet Marxism, the failure of the Central 
European revolutions and the subjugation of formerly in- 
dependent capitalist countries under American hegemony 
threw the revolutionary development in Western Europe 
back to a stage prior to the "bourgeois-democratic revolu- 
tion." Monopoly-capitalist domination undermines na- 
tional sovereignties, democratic rights, and liberal ideolo- 
gies; the great progressive achievements of the ascending 
bourgeoisie have been betrayed by the monopolistic bour- 
geoisie. Under these circumstances, it becomes the task of 

"^ V. Cheprakov, "Nekotorye voprosy sovTemennogo kapitalizma" (Some 
Questions on Contemporary Capitalism), Kommunist (Communist), 1956, 
No. 1 (January). See also Khrushchev's speech of November 6, 1957 (as 
broadcast by Moscow Home Service, p. A-47). 



72 Political Tenets 

the proletariat and the Communist parties in the subju- 
gated countries to lift and carry the "banner of bourgeois 
democratic freedoms," of "national independence and na- 
tional sovereignty" ^^ — in other words, to take over, or 
rather to resume, at a higher stage, the historical role of 
the progressive against the reactionary bourgeoisie. The 
"minimum program" of the Western Communist parties 
thus conforms to the Soviet evaluation of the international 
constellation and must be considered a long-range feature 
rather than a brief expediency. As such the "minimum 
program" is incorporated into the ritual formulas of Soviet 
Marxism: "Defense of national sovereignty and the strug- 
gle against the threat of foreign enslavement have become 
vitally important for the working class and the working 
people of all countries in the present epoch." "^ Not "pro- 
letarian solidarity" but the sponsorship of the "bourgeois- 
democratic" program provides the tenuous link between 
the Soviet state and the masses that follow the national 
Communist parties (a good index for the change in the 
historical "subject") and this program is used as a lever 
for activating the interimperialist contradictions. 

The "united-front" policy ^^ belongs to the same con- 
ception. It is dictated by the objective conditions of "or- 
ganized capitalism" which has made large sections of the 
laboring classes into beneficiaries of the new prosperity 
and thereby has seemed to provide a late justification for 
reformist and antirevolutionary attitudes. If, as Marxism 

^ Stalin, in Current Soviet Policies, p. 236. 

" P. Fedoseev, "Socialism and Patriotism," in Current Digest of the Soviet 
Press, V, No. 28 (August 22, 1953), 4 (condensed from Kommunist [Com- 
munist], No. 9 [June, 1953], pp. 12-28). 

^ The "united front" is discussed here only in its function in the West, 
not in the Communist orbit, where it has a very different significance. 



Self-Interpretation 73 

has never ceased to claim, the effectiveness of the revolu- 
tion depends on winning over the majority, not only of the 
proletariat but of the people, then Communist strategy has 
to be adjusted to the conditions under which the majority 
is not revolutionary. And in so far as the nonrevolutionary 
conditions pertain to a whole stage of the capitalist de- 
velopment, the united-front policy is a fundamental strata- 
gem which cannot be discarded at the discretion of the 
leadership. Indeed, the united front has been an objective 
of Soviet policy at least ever since 1934, although the 
emphasis and scope of the effort have changed several 
times. What is decisive for the evaluation is not whether 
the united front aims at the rank and file, or also at the 
leadership of the socialist parties and trade unions, not 
whether it aims beyond these groups at some or all of the 
"bourgeois parties," but whether the policy is likely to 
alter the very character of the Communist parties. Even the 
problem of the success of the policy is of minor impor- 
tance. Since the response of the would-be noncommunist 
allies is determined by the degree of the functioning of 
Western society, the united front is bound to remain abor- 
tive and "localized" as long as this society remains a going 
concern. If this should no longer be the case, the united- 
front policy would be all but superfluous. However, the 
mere sustained effort to achieve a united front may make 
the Communist parties in important aspects the political 
heirs of the Social Democratic parties.^*' As the latter tend 
to lose the working-class character and approach that of 
the middle-class parties, a vacuum may arise in which the 

^"See p. 242 below. See also the Joint Communique of Communist and 
Workers' Parties, New York Times, November 22, 1957, 



74 Political Tenets 

Communists may appear as tlie sole representatives of 
working-class interests — interests which in turn would 
call for nonrevolutionary representation. A tendency in 
this direction is noticeable in France and in Italy, and the 
declarations, at the Twentieth Congress of the CPSU, on 
the possibility of a parliamentary way to socialism ^^ re- 
call substantially Engels's preface to Marx's Class Strug- 
gles in France, which was for a long time taken as guidance 
for Social Democratic strategy. We may venture the sug- 
gestion that this tendency would be much stronger were it 
not for the identification of the interests of the national 
Communist parties with that of the USSR and for the politi- 
cal countermeasures against the Communist parties. 

In view of the constancy of the main elements of Soviet 
Marxism, the question must be asked whether there is a 
"break" between Leninism and Stalinism. The differences 
between the first years of the Bolshevik Revolution and the 
fully developed Stalinist state are obvious; they readily 
appear as the steady growth of totalitarianism and authori- 
tarian centralization, as the growth of the dictatorship not 
of but over the proletariat and the peasantry. But if the 
dialectical law of the turn from quantity into quality was 
ever applicable, it was in the transition from Leninism 
(after the October Revolution) to Stalinism. The "retarda- 
tion" of the revolution in the West and the stabilization of 
capitalism made for qualitative changes in the structure of 
Soviet society. Lenin tried to counter the isolation of the 
revolution in a backward country by establishing the pri- 

^^ Khrushchev, at the Twentieth Party Congress, in XX S" ezd Kommunisti- 
cheskoi Partii Sovetskogo Soiuza (The Twentieth Congress of the Com- 
munist Party of the Soviet Union, I, 38 fl.; Mikoyan, in ibid., pp. 312 ff. 



Self-Interpretation 75 

ority of industrialization over socialist liberation (it is 
epitomized in his definition of socialism as electrification 
plus Soviet power) — the priority of the Soviet state over 
Soviet workers."^ Lenin died before the ascent of fascism 
in Germany; from then on, the "respite" for which he had 
striven seemed to be of an ever shorter duration. Thus, 
Stalin accelerated the program of "civilization" which 
Lenin had made the prerequisite for the preservation of 
the Soviet system. The height of the Stalinist terror coin- 
cided with the consolidation of the Hitler regime. At the 
outbreak of the Second World War, Soviet civilization had 
progressed far enough to withstand the most powerful 
war machine of an advanced industrial country. Postwar 
reconstruction was amazingly fast in view of the unprece- 
dented destruction — but so was the reconstruction in the 
other camp. Soviet policy at the end of the war, with its 
series of occupations and "revolutions from above," re- 
gardless of the constellation of the indigenous social forces 
in the respective countries, indicates that Stalin did not 
believe that a revolutionary system was maturing in 
Europe, or that the Soviet state could depend for its long- 
range preservation on the colonial revolutions. Lenin's pre- 
scription was still valid, and set the overriding objective of 
the Soviet state during the "first phase" of socialism. It has 
been ritualized in the formula, "to outstrip the economic 
level of the chief capitalist countries." ^^ Soviet society 

■^For the most striking examples of this attitude (then fully endorsed by 
Trotsky), see Carr, The Bolshevik Revolution, II, passim, especially pp. 
93 f., 188 f., 213-16. 

"Stalin at the Eighteenth Party Congress in 1939, in Leninism (New 
York, International Publishers, 1942), p. 448; and again after the war in 
his speech of February 9, 1946, in Pravda, February 10, 1946. The formula 



76 Political Tenets 

continued to grow; the development of socialist produc- 
tion continued to increase the material and technical po- 
tential while repressing the human potential. 

But the very success of Stalinist civilization leads to an 
impasse, which is clearly defined in the Marxist-Leninist 
theory of imperialism. According to this theory, the war 
economy provides an outlet for the aggravating inherent 
contradictions of capitalism, although the capitalist con- 
solidation thus created is precarious and short-lived and 
bound to explode in wars between the competing imperi- 
alist countries. However, if and when there is a "common 
enemy" outside the capitalist world, whose growing power 
and expansion requires the maintenance of a "permanent" 
war or preparedness economy in which the imperialist 
powers unite, while at the same time technological progress 
enables capitalism to maintain this economy without no- 
ticeably reducing the standard of living (perhaps even in- 
creasing it!), then a situation prevails where the very 
growth of the Soviet orbit seems to sustain the unity and 
stability of the "imperialist" orbit. The former cannot 
break this impasse without fundamentally altering its pol- 
icy — and this in turn is conditional upon a corresponding 
advance of Soviet society. Such a change in policy — aim- 
ing at the dissolution of the "war economy" on which the 
capitalist stabilization is held to rest — presupposes that 
the Soviet state has attained a level of competitive strength 
which enables it to "relax" its intransigent and aggressive 



also concludes N. Voznesenskii's Voennaia Ekonomika SSSR v Period Oteche- 
stvennoi Voiny (The Military Economy of the USSR in the Period of the 
Fatherland War) (Moscow, Gospolitizdat, 1947) ; it was not because of 
this conclusion that the book was repudiated. 



Self-Interpretation 77 

strategy. Only such a relaxation, sustained systematically 
and for a long time, could possibly shatter the interna- 
tional capitalist stabilization and revert the capitalist sys- 
tem to that "normality" in which the internal contradic- 
tions are supposed to ripen and ultimately to explode. The 
ideological and political changes, which began at the time 
of the Nineteenth Congress and gained momentum during 
1955-1956 indicated an impending shift in policy. Its 
timing was not a matter of discretion by the Soviet lead- 
ership, nor was Stalin's death the decisive factor. The 
latter must rather be seen in the fulfillment of the funda- 
mental prerequisite for restoring the "normal" capitalist- 
socialist dynamic, namely, the attainment of the level of 
advanced industrial civilization for Soviet society. If, as 
we propose, the recent policy changes suggest that, in the 
Soviet Marxist evaluation, this prerequisite has now been 
established, then these changes would usher in an essen- 
tially new stage in international Communist developments. 
The following chapters will survey the main features of 
Soviet Marxism during the Stalinist period and try to con- 
nect them with the underlying trend in the construction of 
Soviet society. 



3. The New Rationality 



WE SHALL BEGIN with the attempt to define, in a prelimi- 
nary way, the rationale of the civilization of "socialism in 
one country," that is to say, the principles which govern 
its construction and its inner dynamic. In doing so, we ac- 
cept as guidance neither the term "socialism," nor its sim- 
ple negation, nor "totalitarianism" and its synonyms — not 
socialism because the validation of the concept depends on 
agreement on definition and can even then only be the re- 
sult of the examination; not totalitarianism because the 
notion is applicable to a wide variety of social systems v/ith 
different and antagonistic structures. We shall rather try 
to arrive at the identification of these principles by assem- 
bling those features of the construction of Soviet society 
which have remained generally constant throughout all 
stages, regressions, and modifications. They may be re- 
stated, in summary form, as follows: 

1. Total industrialization, on the basis of nationalized 
production, with priority of "main division I" (production 
of the means of production) 

2. Progressive collectivization of agriculture aiming at 
the ultimate transformation of collective into state property 

3. General mechanization of labor, extension of "poly- 



New Rationality 79 

technic" training, leading to "equalization" between urban 
and rural occupations 

4. Gradual rise in the general standard of living condi- 
tional on the maintenance of the goals set in Points 1-3 

5. Building up of a universal work morale, competitive 
efficiency, elimination of all transcendent psychological 
and ideological elements ("Soviet realism") 

6. Preservation and strengthening of the state, military, 
managerial, and party machinery as the vehicle for these 
processes (1-5) 

7. Transition to the distribution of the social product 
according to individual needs after attainment of the goals 
set in Points 1-5 

The goals are conditional upon the attainment of the 
productivity level of the advanced industrial countries; 
this is the termination point for the presently prevailing 
trends. Beyond this point, new and qualitatively different 
trends are stipulated; they will be indicated in Chapter 
8, in an attempt to evaluate the prospects of the "transition 
to communism." 

The following principles refer to the Soviet Marxist in- 
terpretation of this transition : 

1. The development of Soviet society from socialism to 
communism takes place as the dialectical process of un- 
folding internal and external contradictions. 

2. The internal contradictions can be solved rationally, 
without "explosion," on the basis of the socialist economy 
under the control and direction of the Soviet state. 

3. The fundamental internal contradiction, which pro- 
vides the motor power for the transition to communism, is 



80 Political Tenets 

that between the constantly growing productive forces and 
the lagging relations of production. Its rational and con- 
trolled development makes for a gradual and administra- 
tive transition to communism. 

4. The gradual transition to communism occurs under 
conditions of capitalist encirclement (environment). The 
external contradictions involved in this situation can be 
finally solved only at the international level — through a 
socialist revolution in some of the advanced capitalist 
countries. 

5. This solution is itself a long-range process, covering 
a whole period of capitalist and socialist development. The 
weakness of the revolutionary potential in the capitalist 
world and the still prevailing backwardness of the Soviet 
orbit necessitate a new extended "respite" and "coexist- 
ence" of the two systems. 

6. The Soviet Union must preserve this respite by 
utilizing conflicts among the imperialist powers/ avoiding 
a war with them, and discouraging revolutionary experi- 
ments ("seizure of power") in the advanced capitalist 
countries. 

7. The solution of the external contradictions will ripen 
through (a) the inherent capitalist and intercapitalist con- 
tradictions, which will make the proletariat again the his- 

^ The last two points summarize Lenin's conception for the "third historic 
phase of the Russian Revolution" (beginning with the victory of the October 
Revolution and lasting into the present), as paraphrased by Stalin. See 
Stalin, Sochineniia (Works), (13 vols.; Moscow, Gospolitizdat, 1946-51), 
VI, 153; also L. F. Shorichev, Voprosy strategii i taktiki v trudakh I. V. 
Stalina perioda 1921-1925 godov (Problems of Strategy and Tactics in 
the Writings of J. V. Stalin, 1921-1925) (Moscow, Pravda, 1950). 



New Rationality 81 

torical agent of the revolution; {b) the growing economic, 
political, and strategic power of the USSR. 

8. The "main reserves" supporting these basic revolu- 
tionary forces are the semiproletarian and petty peasant 
masses in the developed countries, and the liberation 
movements in the colonies and dependent countries. 

The social process guided by these principles is more 
than the industrialization of the backward areas of the 
East on the basis of nationalization under totalitarian ad- 
ministration. What is happening here extends beyond the 
borders of the Communist orbit. Communist industrializa- 
tion proceeds through "skipping" and telescoping whole 
historical periods. The fundamental difference between 
Western and Soviet society is paralleled by a strong trend 
toward assimilation. Both systems show the common fea- 
tures of late industrial civilization — centralization and 
regimentation supersede individual enterprise and auton- 
omy; competition is organized and "rationalized"; there 
is joint rule of economic and political bureaucracies; the 
people are coordinated through the "mass media" of com- 
munication, entertainment industry, education. If these 
devices prove to be effective, democratic rights and in- 
stitutions might be granted by the constitution and main- 
tained without the danger of their abuse in opposition to 
the system. Nationalization, the abolition of private prop- 
erty in the means of production, does not, by itself, con- 
stitute an essential distinction as long as production is cen- 
tralized and controlled over and above the population. 
Without initiative and control "from below" by the "im- 



82 Political Tenets 

mediate producers," nationalization is but a technological- 
political device for increasing the productivity of labor, 
for accelerating the development of the productive forces 
and for their control from above (central planning) — a 
change in the mode of domination, streamlining of domina- 
tion, rather than prerequisite for its abolition. By abrogating 
the individual as the autonomous economic and political 
subject, certain "obsolete" brakes on the development of 
the productive forces are eliminated. Individual units of 
production (material and intellectual) are no longer ade- 
quate instrumentalities for integrating society; technologi- 
cal progress and mass production shatter the individualis- 
tic forms in which progress operated during the liberalist 
era. 

But, at the same time, technical progress and growing 
productivity threaten to counteract this trend. Increasing 
social capacity and wealth militate against the repressive 
organization and division of labor. Awareness of these 
countertrends manifests itself in the recent policy changes 
and in the increased Soviet Marxist emphasis on the neces- 
sary transition to the "second phase of socialism," which 
will be discussed below.^ 

The Soviet system seems to be another example of a late- 
comer "skipping" several developmental stages after a 
long period of protracted backwardness, joining and run- 
ning ruthlessly ahead of a general trend in late industrial 
society. The skipped stages are those of enlightened abso- 
lutism and liberalism, of free competitive enterprise, of 
matured middle-class culture with its individualistic and 

' See Chapter 8. 



New Rationality 83 

humanitarian ideologies. The effort to catch up, in record 
time and from a state of backwardness, with the level of 
the advanced industrial countries led to the construction 
and utilization of a huge productive apparatus within a 
system of domination and regimentation incompatible with 
individualistic rationality and liberalism. Here lie the 
roots of the relentless struggle of Soviet Marxism against 
the liberal and idealist elements of "bourgeois ideolo- 
gies"; the struggle reflects the societal organization of the 
productive forces as instruments of control rather than 
liberation. 

The idea of Reason which was representative of modern 
Western civilization centered on the autonomy of the Ego 
Cogitans, whose independent thinking discovered and im- 
plemented the laws of the rational organization of nature 
and society. The Ego was itself subject to the objective laws 
of nature — but subjective and objective Reason were to co- 
incide in a society that had mastered nature and trans- 
formed it into a practically inexhaustible material for the 
development of human needs and faculties. Attainment of 
this goal called for the emancipation of the individual as 
long as the state, the established authorities, were an im- 
pediment to technical and economic progress. The latter 
was expected to result from the reasonably free function- 
ing of a multitude of individual enterprises (economic, 
political, cultural), and the rationality of the whole was 
to assert itself through the competitive process of these in- 
dividual units. This process required a high degree of in- 
dividual autonomy, foresight, calculability, perspicacity 
— qualities that had to be acquired not only in the actual 



84 Political Tenets 

business of living but also in the preparation for it: in the 
family, in school, in the privacy of thinking and feeling. 
Social progress thus depended to a large extent on the au- 
tonomy of the individual, that is, on the distinction and 
tension between subjective and objective Reason, and on 
a solution of this tension in such a way that objective Rea- 
son (the social need and the social interest) preserved and 
developed subjective Reason (the individual need and the 
individual interest). 

Technological progress and the development of large 
industry contained two (antagonistic) tendencies which 
had a decisive impact on this process: (1) mechanization 
and rationalization of labor could free an ever greater 
quantum of individual energy (and time) from the ma- 
terial work process and allow the expenditure of this 
energy and time for the free play of human faculties be- 
yond the realm of material production; and (2) the same 
mechanization and rationalization generated attitudes of 
standardized conformity and precise submission to the 
machine which required adjustment and reaction rather 
than autonomy and spontaneity.^ If nationalization and 
centralization of the industrial apparatus goes hand in 
hand with counteracting the first of these tendencies, i.e., 
with the subjugation and enforcement of labor as a full- 
time occupation, progress in industrialization is tanta- 
mount to progress in domination: attendance to the ma- 
chine, the scientific work process, becomes totalitarian, 
affecting all spheres of life. The technological perfection 

^Thorstein Veblen, The Instinct of Workmanship (New York, B. W, 
Huebsch, 1922) , pp. 306 ff. 



New Rationality 85 

of the productive apparatus dominates the rulers and the 
ruled while sustaining the distinction between them. Au 
tonomy and spontaneity are confined to the level of effi 
ciency and performance within the established pattern 
Intellectual effort becomes the business of engineers, spe 
cialists, agents. Privacy and leisure are handled as relaxa 
tion from and preparation for labor in conformity with the 
apparatus. Dissent is not only a political crime but also 
technical stupidity, sabotage, mistreatment of the ma- 
chine. Reason is nothing but the rationality of the whole: 
the uninterrupted functioning and growth of the apparatus. 
The experience of the harmony between the individual and 
the general interest, between the human and the social 
need, remains a mere promise. 

The Soviet Marxist self-interpretation of this rationality 
may serve to elucidate its function. According to this inter- 
pretation, the October Revolution has created a "conform- 
ity" between production relations and the "character of 
the productive forces" which eliminates the conflict be- 
tween the individual and society, between the particular 
and the common interest. Consequently, Reason ceases to 
be split into its subjective and objective manifestations; it 
is no longer antagonistic to and beyond reality, a mere 
"idea" — but is realized in the society itself. This society, 
defined as socialist in terms of Marxian theory, becomes 
the sole standard of truth and falsehood; there can be no 
transcendence in thought and action, no individual au- 
tonomy because the Nomos of the whole is the true Nomos. 
To transcend that which is, to set subjective reason against 
state reason, to appeal to higher norms and values, belongs 



86 Political Tenets 

to the prerogatives of class society, where the Nomos of 
society is not the Nomos of its individuals. In contrast, 
Soviet society institutionalizes the real interests of the 
individuals — by this token, it contains all standards of 
true and false, right and wrong. "Soviet realism" is not a 
mere matter of philosophy and aesthetics; it is the general 
pattern of intellectual and practical behavior demanded 
by the structure of Soviet society. 

To be sure, outside the validity of Soviet Marxism, 
where the equation of the Soviet state with a free and ra- 
tional society is not accepted, this notion of the "realiza- 
tion of Reason" is itself an ideology. Since in actuality the 
individual interest is still antagonistic to the interest of the 
whole, since nationalization is not socialization, the ra- 
tionality of Soviet realism appears as utterly irrational, as 
terroristic conformity. However, to stop the evaluation of 
the new Soviet rationality at this point would be to overlook 
its decisive function. For what is irrational if measured 
from without the system is rational within the system. The 
key propositions of Soviet Marxism have the function of 
announcing and commanding a definite practice, apt to 
create the facts which the propositions stipulate. They 
claim no truth-value of their own but proclaim a preestab- 
lished truth which is to be realized through a certain at- 
titude and behavior. They are pragmatic directives for 
action. For example, Soviet Marxism is built around a 
small number of constantly recurring and rigidly canon- 
ized statements to the effect that Soviet society is a socialist 
society without exploitation, a full democracy in which 
the constitutional rights of all citizens are guaranteed and 



New Rationality 87 

enforced ; or, on the other side, that present-day capitalism 
exists in a state of sharpening class struggle, depressed 
living standards, unemployment, and so forth. Thus formu- 
lated and taken by themselves, these statements are ob- 
viously false — according to Marxian as well as non- 
Marxian criteria. But within the context in which they 
appear, their falsity does not invalidate them, for, to So- 
viet Marxism, their verification is not in the given facts, 
but in "tendencies," in a historical process in which the 
commanded political practice will bring about the desired 
facts. 

The value of these statements is pragmatic rather than 
logical, as is clearly suggested by their syntactical struc- 
ture. They are unqualified, inflexible formulas calling for 
an unqualified, inflexible response. In endless repetition, 
the same noun is always accompanied by the same adjec- 
tives and participles; the noun "governs" them immedi- 
ately and directly so that whenever it occurs they follow 
"automatically" in their proper place. The same verb al- 
ways "moves" the proposition in the same direction, and 
those addressed by the proposition are supposed to move 
the same way. These statements do not attribute a predicate 
to a subject (in the sense of formal or of dialectical logic) ; 
they do not develop the subject in its specific relations — 
all these cognitive processes lie outside the propositional 
context, i.e., in the "classics" of Marxism, and the routine 
statements only recall what is preestablished. They are to be 
"spelled," learned mechanically, monotonously, and liter- 
ally; they are to be performed like a ritual which accom- 
panies the realizing action. They are to recall and sustain 



88 Political Tenets 

the required practice. Taken by themselves they are no 
more committed to the truth than are orders or advertise- 
ments: their "truth" is in their effect. Soviet Marxism here 
shares in the decline of language and communication in the 
age of mass societies. It is senseless to treat the proposi- 
tions of the official ideology at the cognitive level: they 
are a matter of practical, not of theoretical reason. If 
propositions lose their cognitive value to their capacity of 
bringing about a desired effect, that is to say, if they are 
to be understood as directives for a specific behavior, then 
magical elements gain ascendancy over comprehending 
thought and action. The difference between illusion and 
reality becomes just as obliterated as that between truth 
and falsehood if illusions guide a behavior that shapes 
and changes reality. With respect to its actual effect on 
primitive societies, magic has been described as a "body 
of purely practical acts, performed as means to an end." ^ 
The description may well be applied to formally theoreti- 
cal propositions. The official language itself assumes magi- 
cal character. 

However, the contemporary reactivation of magical fea- 
tures in communication is far from primitive. The 
irrational elements of magic enter into the system of 
scientifically planned and practiced administration — they 
become part of the scientific management of society. More- 
over, the magical features of Soviet theory are turned 
into an instrument for rescuing the truth. While the 
ritual formulas, severed from their original cognitive 

* Bronislaw Malinowski, Magic, Science and Religion (Anchor Books; 
New York, Doubleday, 1954), p. 70. 



New Rationality 89 

context, thus serve to provide unquestioned directives 
for unquestioned mass behavior, they retain, in a hyposta- 
tized form, their historical substance. The rigidity with 
which they are celebrated is to preserve the purity 
of this substance in the face of an apparently con- 
tradicting reality and to enforce verification in the face 
of apparently contradicting facts which make the pre- 
established truth into a paradox. It defies reason; it seems 
absurd. But the absurdity of Soviet Marxism has an ob- 
jective ground: it reflects the absurdity of a historical sit- 
uation in which the realization of the Marxian promises 
appeared — only to be delayed again — and in which the 
new productive forces are again used as instruments for 
productive repression. The ritualized language preserves 
the original content of Marxian theory as a truth that must 
be believed and enacted against all evidence to the con- 
trary: the people must do and feel and think as if their 
state were the reality of that reason, freedom, and justice 
which the ideology proclaims, and the ritual is to assure 
such behavior. The practice guided by it indeed moves 
large underprivileged masses on an international scale. In 
this process, the original promises of Marxian theory play a 
decisive part. The new form of Marxian theory corre- 
sponds to its new historical agent — a backward popula- 
tion which is to become what it "really" is : a revolutionary 
force which changes the world. The ritualization of this 
theory has kept it alive against the power of factual refu- 
tation and communicated it, in ideological form, to a 
backward and suppressed population which is to be 
whipped into political action, contesting and challenging 



90 Political Tenets 

advanced industrial civilization. In its magical use, Marx- 
ian theory assumes a new rationality. 

The paradoxical character of Soviet rationality is not 
confined to its own orbit; it also pertains to statements re- 
ferring to the capitalist orbit. To be sure, straight false- 
hood may often be attributed to mere propaganda require- 
ments. But here too, the recurrent pattern of falsehood 
beyond plausibility suggests the intent of defiance: the con- 
certed struggle with facts which, measured against the 
world historical "truth," are accidental and to be negated. 
If, for example, Pravda's special New York correspond- 
ent reports ^ that in the card catalogue of the New York 
Public Library he did not find a single book "about Stalin- 
grad or the Soviet army in general," the fact that the New 
York Public Library's catalogue contains about "two 
dozen cards bearing directly on the Battle of Stalingrad" 
and "about 500 cards under 'Army, Russia' " is, for the 
Soviet reporter, "negated" by the essential context of sys- 
tematic American hostility to the Soviet Union. Or, if Wil- 
liam Z. Foster's History of the Communist Party of the 
United States, published in 1952 — at a time when the party 
was practically without any popular support, its leader- 
ship in jail, its membership a negligible quantity — ends 
with a chapter headed "The Party of the Working Class 
and the Nation," and with a section headed "The Progress 
of the Communist Party," then the shattering unreality of 
these statements is itself part of their function: to refuse 
submission to the facts, to uphold and accomplish the true 
nature of the party as the "Leninist mass party" against 
its inadequate factual existence. 

*New York Times, February 2, 1953. 



New Rationality 91 

Hypostatized into a ritual pattern, Marxian theory be- 
comes ideology. But its content and function distinguish 
it from the "classical" forms of ideology: it is not "false 
consciousness," ^ but rather consciousness of falsehood, a 
falsehood which is "corrected" in the context of the "higher 
truth" represented by the objective historical interest. This 
tends to cancel the ideological freedom of consciousness 
and to assimilate ideology with the basis as part of con- 
sciously directed social action. As the contrast between 
ideology and reality sharpens with the growing contrast 
between the productive potential of society and its repres- 
sive use, the previously free elements of the ideology 
are subjected to administrative control and direction. The 
weakening of the relative independence of ideologies from 
established social needs, the ossification of their content, 
is characteristic of the present stage of civilization. In its 
ossified form, emptied of its meaning which was critical 
of and antagonistic to the established society, the ideology 
becomes a tool of domination. If ideas like human liberty 
and reason or individual autonomy of thought are no 
longer comprehended in their still unfulfilled claim but 
are items in the routine equipment of newspapers, states- 
men, entertainers, and advertisers who betray them daily 
in their business of perpetuating the status quo, then the 
progressive notions of the ideology are deprived of their 
transcendent function and made into cliches of desired be- 
havior. 

The decline of independent thought vastly increases the 
power of words — their magical power, with whose destruc- 

® Engels, letter to Franz Mehiing, July 14, 1893, in Marx and Engels, 
Selected Works (2 vols.; Moscow, Foreign Languages Publishing House, 
1949-50), II, 451. 



92 Political Tenets 

tion the process of civilization had once begun. Protected 
against the intellectual effort which traces the way back 
from the words to the ideas they once expressed, the words 
become weapons in the hand of an administration against 
which the individual is completely powerless. Through the 
means of mass communication, they transmit the objectives 
of the administration, and the underlying population re- 
sponds with the expected behavior. 

The rationality which had accompanied the progress of 
Western civilization had developed in the tension between 
thought and its object: truth and falsehood were sought in 
the relation between the comprehending subject and its 
world, and logic was the comprehensible development of 
this relation, expressed in propositions. Just as the object 
of thought was taken as something by and in itself (no mat- 
ter how inseparable from thought), so the subject was held 
to be something "for itself" — free to discover the truth 
about its object — and especially the still hidden truth: its 
unrealized potentialities. Cognitive freedom was held to 
be an essential part of practical freedom, of the ability to 
act in accordance with the truth, to realize the subjective 
and objective potentialities. Where this relation between 
subject and object no longer prevails, traditional logic has 
lost its ground. Truth and falsehood then are no longer 
qualities of cognitive propositions but of a preestablished 
and predefined state of affairs to which thought and action 
are to be geared. Logic then is measured by the adequacy 
of such thought and action to attain the predetermined goal. 



4. Socialism in One Country? 



THE NEW rationality, which the preceding chapter tried to 
identify, characterizes the atmosphere in which the con- 
struction of Soviet society takes place. More specifically, 
this rationality pertains to the paradoxical nature of Soviet 
society, where the most methodical system of domination 
is to prepare the ground for freedom, where the policy of 
suppression is justified as the policy of liberation. We did 
not accept the assumption that Soviet Marxism is simply 
a superimposed ideology,- serving as a prop for the regime; 
nor did we accept the opposite assumption that Soviet so- 
ciety is a socialist society in the Marxian sense. Therefore 
we cannot explain the paradox merely as the plain contrast 
between ideology and reality. The paradox rather seems to 
reflect the construction of Soviet society under the "anoma- 
lous" conditions of coexistence. 

We have stressed that as long as control over the means 
of production and over the distribution of the product is 
not vested in the "immediate producers" themselves, that 
is, as long as there is no control and initiative "from be- 
low," nationalization is a mere instrument of more effec- 
tive domination as well as industrialization, of increasing 
and manipulating the productivity of labor within the 



94 Political Tenets 

framework of mass societies. In this respect, Soviet society 
follows the general trend of late industrial civilization. 
However, the question must be asked whether, in spite of 
this fact, Soviet nationalization, under the historical con- 
dition of its progress, does not possess an inner dynamic 
which may counteract the repressive tendencies and trans- 
form the structure of Soviet society — regardless of the 
real or alleged policies and objectives of the leadership. 
Within the scope of this study, the dynamic will be traced 
only in so far as it is reflected in the development of Soviet 
Marxism, and the discussion will be confined to some se- 
lected conceptions which seem to be particularly illuminat- 
ing. We shall take the conception of "socialism in one 
country," the dialectic of the Soviet state governed by this 
policy conception, certain changes in the ideology, and 
finally the "transition from socialism to commimism," in 
which this dynamic culminates. 

The doctrine of "socialism in one country," which pro- 
vided the general framework for Soviet Marxism during 
the Stalinist period,^ also serves to provide a world-histori- 
cal justification for the repressive functions of the Soviet 
state. The doctrine has retained throughout its dependence 
on the international development: the initial isolation of 
the Bolshevik Revolution, the confinement of socialism to 
backward areas, and the reconsolidation of capitalism on 
an intercontinental scale are held responsible for the in- 
ternal as well as external contradictions which plague So- 
viet society. Stalinist doctrine holds that the former can 

^ M. M. Rozental, Marksistskii dialekticheskii metod (Marxist Dialectical 
Method) (Moscow, Gospolitizdat, 1951), pp. 57, 108, and passim. 



Socialism in One Country? 95 

be solved by and within the Soviet Union, through the "di- 
recting" role of the state, while the latter can be ultimately 
removed only through the international process ^ — through 
revolution within the capitalist world. In reality, however, 
the external contradictions perpetuate the internal ones 
and vice versa, so that the distinction loses its finality; by 
its own development, "socialism in one country" dissolves 
into a larger conception which reestablishes the essential 
links between the construction of Soviet society and the 
capitalist development. 

The Soviet Marxist designation of the internal contradic- 
tions varies with the various stages of the development. 
Chiefly they are defined in terms of the contradiction be- 
tween the proletariat and the peasantry,^ between the so- 
cialist state and "our own bourgeoisie," ^ between kulaks 
and poor peasants, mental and physical labor, "old con- 
sciousness" and socialist mentality.^ Their basis is iden- 
tified as the contradiction between the growth of the pro- 
ductive forces and the lagging level of consumption. The 
external contradictions are interpreted in terms of a shift 
in the class struggle to the international arena: 

While one end of the class struggle is being conducted within the 
boundaries of the USSR, its other end stretches out to the territories 

"The first "authentic" formulation in Stalin's "Results of the Work of the 
Fourteenth Party Conference" (written in 1925). See Sochineniia (Works) 
(13 vols.; Moscow, Gospolitizdat, 1946-51), VII, 90-132. 

" Stalin, "Results of the Work of the Fourteenth Party Conference," 
quoted in his Problems of Leninism (New York, International Publishers, 
1934), p. 63. 

* Stalin, "Letter to Ivanov." in The Strategy and Tactics of World Com- 
munism, House Document No. 619, Supplement I (Washington, D.C., U.S. 
Government Printing Office, 1948), p. 151. 

^ Rozental, Marksistskii dialekticheskii metod (Marxist Dialectical 
Method), pp. 293 ff. 



96 Political Tenets 

of the bourgeois states surrounding us. . . . The more acute aspect 
of class struggle affecting the USSR has now been transferred to 
the international arena.^ 

According to Marx, the class struggle is international 
by its very nature; it would be meaningless to talk about a 
"shift" to the international arena. The Soviet Marxist no- 
tion has a different connotation: it tries to adjust the Marx- 
ian theory of the class struggle to the historical fact of its 
"neutralization" in the advanced industrial countries. The 
notion is linked to the "two-camp" doctrine; the "demo- 
cratic socialist" camp, led by the Soviet Union, represents 
the fight for the "real" class interests of the international 
proletariat. Since the Western proletariat is geographically 
"enclosed" in tlie "imperialist camp" (although "in real- 
ity" belonging to the socialist camp), it cannot effectively 
assert its "real" interest — this function rather devolves 
upon the group of nations joined in the Soviet camp. The 
conflict between the real and the immediate interests of the 
proletariat, contained from the beginning in Marxian the- 
ory, now becomes the conflict between two international 
groupings: the "external" proletariat of the backward 
countries is supposed to fight for the real interest, assuming 
the historical task of the proletariat as a whole. With this 
change in protagonist, the content and strategy of the class 
struggle also change. The class struggle becomes a fight for 
space and populations, and the social issues become a func- 
tion of political issues. The class interests of the Western 

* Stalin in 1937, quoted in a lecture on the "Marxist-Leninist Theory of 
Classes and Class Struggle," Soviet Home Service, Moscow Radio, March 5, 
1951. See also Rozental, Marksistskii dialekticheskii metod (Marxist Dialec- 
tical Method), p. 302. 



Socialism in One Country? 97 

proletariat (and for that matter of the entire proletariat) 
are sustained in Soviet policy only to the degree to which 
they do not conflict with the political interests of the USSR. 
Thus, the class struggle is not transferred to the interna- 
tional level, but rather transubstantiated into an interna- 
tional political struggle. 

The transubstantiation of the class struggle vitiates all 
attempts to solve the internal contradictions of Soviet so- 
ciety without changing its very structure. Marxism de- 
pends, for the attainment of its goals, on the solution of the 
conflict between the productive forces and their repressive 
organization and utilization. According to Marx, the aboli- 
tion of capitalism is not an end in itself but the means for 
solving this conflict, thereby terminating the enslavement 
of man by his labor and the domination of men by men. 
And in so far as such enslavement is institutionalized in the 
process of production, it can be abolished only in the proc- 
ess of production, and the individuals can be free only if 
they themselves control production. There may be several 
stages on this way to freedom — even stages of repression 
(Marx has sketched them in his Critique of the Gotha Pro- 
gram) — but unless this way is traveled by the laboring 
class itself, as the sole historical agent of liberation, the 
socialist revolution has no raison d'etre. And if the revolu- 
tion does not from the beginning reverse tlie relationship 
between the laborer and the means of his labor, that is to 
say, transfer control over them to him, it does not have a 
raison d'etre essentially diff^erent from that of capitalist 
society. Abolition of private property in the means of pro- 
duction is thus substantially linked with transfer of control 



98 Political Tenets 

to the laborers themselves. As long as such transfer is not 
accomplished, the revolution is bound to reproduce the 
very antagonisms which it strives to overcome. They ap- 
pear in manifold forms: as the repressive utilization of the 
nationalized means of production, as the contrast between 
the level of productivity and the level of consumption, as 
the conflict between social and individual needs, between 
state and private and semiprivate property; or in the inter- 
national arena, between the interests of the USSR and those 
of the foreign Communist parties, between the objectives 
of national Soviet security and those of socialist policy. 
They persist even if "socialism in one country" becomes so 
to speak "socialism in one orbit," for, in the last analysis, 
they are due to the very factors which brought about and 
sustained the coexistence of the two systems. If Soviet 
Marxism justifies the perpetuation of the repressive state 
machine by the continued prevalence of the "capitalist 
threat," it admits that the structure of Soviet society still 
is antagonistic; and that the solution of these antagonisms 
depends on a fundamental change in the international con- 
stellation. In 1938, Stalin implied that the internal contra- 
dictions had been solved by the successful building of so- 
cialism in the USSR; ^ in 1952, he emphasized again the 
internal contradictions, which now reappear on a different 
level.' 

The historical situation thus overrides the Stalinist con- 

' "Letter to Ivanov," in The Strategy and Tactics of World Communism, 
House Document 619, Supplement I, p. 150. 

^"Economic Problems of Socialism," in Current Soviet Policies, ed. by 
Leo Gruliow (New York, F. A. Praeger, 1953), pp. 5, 11, 14. See below, pp. 
166 f. 



Socialism in One Country? 99 

ception of "socialism in one country," according to which 
the internal contradictions could be solved by the Soviet 
state while the external contradictions continued to prevail. 
The external contradictions perpetuate the internal con- 
tradictions. According to Soviet Marxism, the "capitalist 
environment" enforces the continued strengthening of the 
repressive political and military establishment and pre- 
vents the free utilization of the productive forces for the 
satisfaction of individual needs. But the continued strength- 
ening of the Soviet political and military establishment in 
turn perpetuates the "capitalist environment" and even 
promotes its intercontinental unification. Ever since Lenin, 
Soviet Marxism has held that the USSR will ultimately not 
be able to survive unless it succeeds in breaking the dead- 
lock in its own favor. The break is expected to come about 
through the reactivation of the "inherent capitalist con- 
tradictions" in the "imperialist camp." They are frozen in 
the Western defense economy; the dissolution of this in- 
tegrated political economy is, therefore, the indispensable 
first objective. 

But the Soviet leadership can hope to attain this objective 
only if the USSR is no longer a military and political threat 
to the West, that is, if the productive power of the Soviet 
state is redirected to serve the needs and faculties of its 
citizens. This would mean that production and the produc- 
tion relations are reorganized in such a way that the rise 
of the level of material and intellectual culture is not the 
mere by-product but the goal of the social effort. To Soviet 
Marxism, such a transformation of Soviet society appears 
as a historical necessity, as a requirement of international 



100 Political Tenets 

politics in the era of coexistence. Soviet Marxism is forced 
to recognize the interdependence of the two sets of contradic- 
tions which makes the social issues determine the political 
issues. The vital aim of breaking the deadlock can be 
achieved only by a transformation of Soviet society which 
is to establish the economic and cultural superiority of 
socialism over capitalism, to spread socialism "by con- 
tagion," and thus to provide the basis for unfreezing the 
class struggle in the capitalist world. 

In order to evaluate the prospects of this transformation, 
we shall have to discuss the social structure of the Soviet 
state, which, according to Soviet theory, is to remain the 
"directing agent" of social change. 



5. The Dialectic of the Soviet State 



A BRIEF SUMMARY suffices to recall the chief elements in 
Stalin's theory of the retention and growth of the socialist 
state. In contrast to Engels's formula of the "withering 
away" of the state, which is valid for the victory of social- 
ism in all or in a majority of countries, the socialist state 
must assume new decisive functions under the conditions of 
"socialism in one country" and "capitalist encirclement." 
These functions change in accordance with the internal de- 
velopment and the international situation. In the first phase 
of the development (from the October revolution to the 
"elimination of the exploiting classes"), the functions of 
the state were: {a) "to suppress the overthrown classes in- 
side the country," {b) "to defend the country from foreign 
attack," and (c) "economic organization and cultural edu- 
cation." In the second phase (from the "elimination of the 
capitalist elements in town and country" to the "complete 
victory of the socialist system and the adoption of the new 
constitution") function (o) ceased and was supplanted by 
that of "protecting socialist property"; functions (6) and 
(c) "fully remained." Moreover, the state is to continue 
also in the period of communism "unless the capitalist en- 
circlement" is liquidated, and "unless the danger of for- 



102 Political Tenets 

eign military attack has disappeared" — only then will it 
"atrophy." ^ As early as 1930, Stalin had condensed the 
dialectic of the socialist state to the formula: "The highest 
possible development of the power of the State with the ob- 
ject of preparing the conditions for the dying away of the 
State — that is the Marxist formula." ^ Later on, emphasis 
was placed on the strengthening of the state power prior to 
and during the transition to communism.^ 

The continuation of the state in the first period of social- 
ism is implied in the original Marxian conception. Marx 
assumed that the "enslaving subordination of the individ- 
uals to the devision of labor" would continue during the 
First Phase of socialism.'* Consequently, the state would 
continue; its "withering away would be gradual and pre- 
ceded by a period of transformation" of the political insti- 
tutions. Thus was the development outlined by Engels as 
early as 1847,^ and it was again emphasized in the eighties 
in his polemic against the anarchists: 

The anarchists . . . declare that the proletarian revolution must 
begin with the abolition of the political organization of the state. 
But the only organization which the proletariat finds available 

^ Stalin, "Report on the Work of the Central Committee to the Eighteenth 
Party Congress," in Leninism (New York, International Publishers, 1942), 
p. 474. 

" Stalin, Political Report to the Sixteenth Party Congress (New York, 
Workers Library Publishers, 1930), p. 171. 

^Stalin, Marksizm i voprosy iazykoznaniia (Marxism and Linguistic Prob- 
lems) (Moscow, Gospolitizdat, 1950). See also M. M. Rozental, Marksistskii 
dialekticheskii metod (Marxist Dialectical Method) (Moscow, Gospolitizdat, 
1951 ) , p. 109. 

* "Critique of the Gotha Program," in Marx and Engels, Selected Works 
(2 vols.; Moscow, Foreign Languages Publishing House, 1949-50), II, 23; see 
above, p. 20. 

^ Principles of Communism, Questions 17 and 18. 



Dialectic of the Soviet State 103 

ifertig) after its victory is the state. This state may have to undergo 
considerable changes before it can fulfil its new functions. But 
to destroy it in one moment would mean to destroy the only or- 
ganization with which the victorious proletariat would exercise 
the power which it has just conquered — to subdue its capitalist 
enemies and to carry through that economic revolution of society 
without which the victory would of necessity end in a new defeat.^ 

The Marx quotations around which Lenin built his refuta- 
tion of Kautsky in State and Revolution do not contradict 
this conception.^ The "state machinery" which is to be shat- 
tered, the "bureaucratic and military machinery" which 
cannot be transferred from one hand to the other but must 
be "broken up," is the machinery of the bourgeois class 
state. To be sure, according to Marx, all historical forms of 
the state were forms of the class state — but in so far as the 
first phase of socialism still is "affected" with its capitalist 
heritage, so is its state. However, while the socialist state 
continues to exercise coercive functions, its substance has 
undergone a fundamental change: the socialist state is the 
proletariat, constituted as the ruling class. ^ Consequently, 
in terms of class position and class interests, the subject 

* Letter to Ph. van Patten, April 18, 1883, in Marx and Engels, Brief e an 
A. Bebel, JF. Liebknecht, K. Kautsky und Andere (Moscow, Verlagsgenossen- 
schaft Auslandischer Arbeiter in der USSR, 1933), I, 296. Engels's statement 
in "Anti-Diihring," written only five years earlier, seems to contradict this 
notion. There he says that the "first act in which the state appears really as 
the representative of the whole society — the appropriation of the means of 
production in the name of the society— is at the same time its last inde- 
pendent act as a state." However, the qualifying terms ("really," "the whole 
of society," "independent") would make it possible to locate tliis "act" at 
the end rather than the beginning of the first phase. 

''State and Revolution (New York, International Publishers, 1932), pp. 25, 
33. 

* "Communist Manifesto," in The Strategy and Tactics of World Commu- 
nism. House Document No. 619, Supplement I (Washington, D.C., U.S. 
Government Printing OfiBce, 1948), p. 19. 



104 Political Tenets 

and the object of coercion are identical.^ In this sense, the 
state of the first phase is a "non-state," the state "broken 
up" and "shattered." ^" Since political power is, "prop- 
erly" speaking, "merely the organized power of one class 
for oppressing another," ^^ the class identity between the 
subject and object of the state now tends to transform coer- 
cion into rational administration. Marx and Engels sum- 
marized the changes in the function of the state as this very 
transformation: "The public functions will lose their po- 
litical character and be transformed into the simple admin- 
istrative function of watching over the true interest of 
society." ^^ 

In contrast to this conception, the Soviet state exercises 
throughout political and governmental functions against 
the proletariat itself; domination remains a specialized 
function in the division of labor and is as such the monop- 
oly of a political, economic, and military bureaucracy. 
This function is perpetuated by the centralized authoritar- 
ian organization of the productive process, directed by 
groups which determine the needs of society (the social 

* Except, of course, where the state power is directed against the "capitalist 
enemies" within and without. But in the Marxian conception, this function 
does not change the basic structure of the socialist state; military and police 
actions against the class enemy are seen as a levee en masse, as actions of 
the armed people themselves. 

'"Marx, Letter to Kugelmann, April 12, 1871, in Marx and Engels, 
Selected Works, II, 420. See Lenin, State and Revolution, p. 33. 

" "Communist Manifesto," in The Strategy and Tactics of World Com- 
munism, House Document No. 619, Supplement I, p. 19. 

'^ Engels, "On Authority," in Marx and Engels, Selected Works, I, 577. See 
also Engels's famous formulation in "Anti-Diihring": "The functions of 
government transform themselves into simple functions of administration." 
See Marx and Engels, Die Allianz der sozialistischen Demokratie und die 
Internationale Arbeiterassoziation, ed. by Wilhelm Bios under the title Marx 
oder Bakunin? (Stuttgart, Volksverlag fiir Wirtschaft und Verkehr, 1920), p. 
14. 



Dialectic of the Soviet State 105 

product and its distribution) independent of the collective 
control of the ruled population. Whether or not these 
groups constitute a "class" in the Marxian sense is a prob- 
lem of Marxist exegesis. ^^ The fact is that Soviet Marxism 
itself stresses the "directing" function of the state as distin- 
guished from the underlying institutions, and that this state 
retains the separation of the "immediate producers" from 
collective control over the process of production. Soviet 
Marxism justifies this "anomaly" by the anomalous cir- 
cumstances of socialism in a "capitalist environment." 
These circumstances are supposed to require the continua- 
tion and even the growth of the state as a system of political 
institutions, and the exercise by the state of oppressive 
economic, military, police, and educational functions over 
and against society. The Soviet state thus takes shape ex- 
actly as that structure which Engels described as character- 
istic of class society: the "common societal functions" be- 
come a "new branch of the division of labor" and thereby 
constitute particular interests separate from those of the 
population.^* The state is again a reified, hypostatized 
power. 

As such a power, the state, according to Soviet Marxism, 

" Clearly, if "class" is defined in terms of the relation to the basic means 
of production, and the latter in terms of ownership, the Soviet bureaucracy 
is not a class. If control over the means of production is made the cri- 
terion, the question whether or not such control is delegated and in turn 
effectively controlled by the "immediate producers" would be decisive. 
We use "class" here as designating a group which exercises governmental 
(including managerial) functions as a "separate" function in the social 
division of labor— with or without special privileges. Thus, if the bureaucracy 
would be open to ascent "from below," it would still be a class as long as 
the separateness of its function makes it independent from the people whom 
it manages and administers. 

" Engels, Letter to Conrad Schmidt, October 27, 1890, in Ober Historischen 
Materialismus, ed. by Hermann Duncker (Berlin, Internationaler Arbeiter- 
verlag, 1930) , II, 140. 



106 Political Tenets 

becomes the Archimedean point from which the world is 
moved into socialism, the "basic instrument" for the estab- 
lishment of socialism and communism. Soviet Marxism 
links the perpetuated hypostatization of the state to the very 
progress of socialist construction/^ The argument runs as 
follows: With the overthrow of capitalism and the national- 
ization of the economy, the Bolshevik Revolution laid the 
foundation for a state which represents the interests of the 
urban and rural proletariat. The state is their state, and, 
consequently, the further development of the revolution 
takes place "from above" rather than "from below." The 
liquidation of the "old bourgeois economic order in rural 
areas" and the creation of a "socialist collective farm 
order" was such a revolution from above, "on the initiative 
of the existing regime with the support of the basic masses 
of the peasantry." ^^ The firm institutionalization of the 
state in the revolution from above took shape under the first 
Five- Year Plan, which revolutionized the economic order 
of the country not only over and above and against the "im- 
mediate interests" of workers and peasants, but also by 
subjecting them to the bureaucratic-authoritarian organiza- 
tion of production. According to Stalinism, transition to the 
subsequent stages of socialism will likewise be made by 
strengthening the institutionalized state rather than by dis- 
solving it.^' But the hypostatization of the regime implied 

"Ts. A. Stepanian, "Usloviia i puti perekhoda ot sotsializma k kom- 
munizmu" (The Conditions and the Paths of the Transition from Socialism 
to Communism), in O sovetskom sotsialisticheskom obshchestve (On Soviet 
Sociahst Society), ed. by F. Konstantinov (Moscow, Gospolitizdat, 1948), 
p. 544. 

^"Stalin, Marksizm i voprosy iazykoznaniia (Marxism and Linguistic 
Problems) (Moscow, Gospolitizdat, 1950). 

'' See below, p. 167. 



Dialectic of the Soviet State 107 

in these formulations might boomerang against alterations 
in the political structure necessitated by international and 
internal developments. The power of the state has its ob- 
jective limits. In the later period of Stalinism, Soviet Marx- 
ism emphasized that the state itself is subject to general 
socioeconomic laws, that its forms "are changing and will 
continue to change in line with the development of our 
country and with the changes in the international situa- 
tion." ^^ In Soviet Marxist evaluation, such internal and 
international developments were asserting themselves on 
the ground of the achievements of Stalinism and were call- 
ing for a corresponding change in Soviet theory and 
strategy. 

Before outlining the trend in the development of the state 
envisaged by Soviet Marxism, the question must be asked: 
Who or what is that Soviet state? Neither the rise of the So- 
viet intelligentsia as a new ruling group, nor its composi- 
tion and its privileges are any longer disputed facts — 
least so in tlie USSR. The recruitment and training of 
highly qualified specialists, technicians, managers, etc., 
is continually emphasized and their privileges are adver- 
tised.^^ Moreover the uninterrupted growth of this group 
is considered one of the essential preconditions for the 
transition to communism.^'' Decisive in the problem of the 

" Stalin, "Report on the Work of the Central Committee to the Eighteenth 
Party Congress," in Leninism (New York, International Publishers, 1942), 
p. 473. 

"At least since 1935. See Stalin's speech to the graduates of the Red 
Army Academy in Leninism, pp. 363 f. 

^ For example see Stepanian, "Usloviia i puti perekhoda ot sotsializma k 
kommunizmu" (The Conditions and the Paths of the Transition from So- 
cialism to Communism), in sovetskom sotsialisticheskom obshchestve (On 
Soviet Socialist Society), pp. 516 f. and 520. 



108 Political Tenets 

development of the state are not merely the privileges of 
the governmental bureaucracy, its numerical strength, and 
its caste character, but the basis and scope of its power. 
Obviously the bureaucracy has a vital interest in maintain- 
ing and enhancing its privileged position. Obviously, there 
are conflicts among various groups within the bureaucracy. 
In order to evaluate their significance for the tendential 
development of Soviet society, an attempt must be made to 
determine whether or not there is a political and economic 
basis for using the special position of the bureaucracy (or 
special positions within the bureaucracy) for exploding 
and changing the structure of Soviet society. The following 
paragraphs suggest only some of the general aspects per- 
taining to such an attempt. 

We have emphasized that Soviet Marxism admits the 
existence of contradictory interests in Soviet society ^^ and 
derives them from the existence of different forms of So- 
cialist property and labor. As specific sources of contradic- 
tions are mentioned: the coexistence of state, collective, 
and private property in the means of production; the dif- 
ference between mental and physical labor; the stratifica- 
tion into intelligentsia, workers, and peasants; the uneven 

^ "Socialism in our country has been built upon the basis of the solution 
of internal contradictions by our own forces." Bol'shaia Sovetskaia Entsik- 
lopediia (Large Soviet Encyclopedia) (65 vols.; Moscow, OGIZ RSFSR, 
1926^7), XLVII, col. 378. For the enumeration of specific contradictions, 
see, for example, Stalin's speech to the Stakhanovites, 1935, in Leninism, p. 
368, and his "Economic Problems of Socialism in the USSR," in Current 
Soviet Policies, ed. by Leo Gruliow (New York, F. A. Praeger, 1953), 
passim; Rozental, Marksistskii dialekticheskii metod (Marxist Dialectical 
Method), pp. 283-88; Stepanian, "Usloviia i puti perekhoda ot sotsializma 
k kommiinizmu" (The Conditions and the Paths of the Transition from 
Socialism to Communism), in sovetskom sotsialisticheskom obshchestve 
(On Soviet Socialist Society), pp. 528-31; and Pravda, August 20, 1947. 



Dialectic of the Soviet State 109 

development of the two main divisions of social produc- 
tion. As long as the bureaucracy is a special branch in the 
division of labor, engendering a special position in society, 
it has a separate, special interest. According to Soviet 
Marxism, these "internal" contradictions, and with them 
the separate position of the bureaucracy, will "flatten out" 
with the gradual equalization of mental and physical labor, 
which in turn will result from the gradual elimination of 
the lag of production relations behind the growth of the 
productive forces. The elimination of the class position of 
the bureaucracy (but not of the bureaucracy itself) thus 
will appear as a "by-product" of the transition from social- 
ism to communism. At that stage, the bureaucracy would 
still exercise special functions but no longer within an 
institutionalized, hierarchical division of functions; the 
bureaucracy would be "open" and lose its "political" con- 
tent to the degree to which, with the wealth of the material 
and intellectual productive forces, the general societal 
functions would become exchangeable among the individ- 
uals. Is the Soviet Marxist assumption of such a trend even 
theoretically consistent with the actual structure of the So- 
viet state? 

Bureaucracy by itself, no matter how huge it is, does not 
generate self-perpetuating power unless it has an economic 
base of its own from which its position is derived, or unless 
it is allied with other social groups which possess such a 
power base. Naturally, the traditional sources of economic 
power are not available to the Soviet bureaucracy; it does 
not own the nationalized means of production. But obvi- 
ously "the people," who constitutionally own the means 



110 Political Tenets 

of production, do not control them. Control, therefore, and 
not ownership must be the decisive factor. But unless fur- 
ther defined, "control" is an insufficient index for the real 
locus of power. Is it exercised simply by particular inter- 
ests independent enough to assert themselves against oth- 
ers, or are these interests themselves subject to overriding 
laws and forces? With respect to the Soviet system and its 
organization of production, distinction must be made be- 
tween technical-administrative and social control. The two 
levels of control would coincide if those which manage the 
industrial and agricultural key establishments determine 
by and for themselves and as a special group entrepreneur- 
ial and labor policies, thereby wielding decisive influence 
over the social need and its satisfaction. Such a coincidence 
cannot be taken for granted. In Soviet doctrine, it is the 
Party which exercises the social control overriding all 
technical-administrative control, and since the Party is 
fused with the state, social control assumes the form of cen- 
tralized and planned political control. But the same ques- 
tion as to the ultimate superseding control must be asked 
with respect to the Party — even its top leadership com- 
prises various groups and interests, including managerial 
ones. Obviously, the "people" can be excluded: there is no 
eff^ective social control "from below." Thus, two possibil- 
ities are left: either (1) a specific group within the bu- 
reaucracy exercises control over all the rest of the bureauc- 
racy (in which case this group would be the autonomous 
subject of social control) ; or (2) the bureaucracy as a 
"class" is truly sovereign, i.e., the ruling group (in which 



Dialectic of the Soviet State 111 

case social and technical-administrative controls would co- 
incide). This alternative will be discussed presently. 

Personal power, even if effectively institutionalized, 
does not define social control. Stalin's dictatorship may 
well have overridden all divergent interests by virtue of his 
factual power. However, this personal power was itself 
subject to the requirements of the social system on whose 
continued functioning it depended, and over and above the 
subsistence minimum, these requirements were codeter- 
mined by the interests controlling the industrial and agri- 
cultural basis, and by those of the police and the army. The 
same holds true, to a much greater extent, for the post- 
Stalinist leadership. The search for the locus of social con- 
trol thus leads back from personal dictatorship to the alter- 
native formulated above. But there seems to be no separate 
homogeneous group to which social control could be mean- 
ingfully attributed. The top ruling group is itself changing 
and comprises "representatives" of various bureaucracies 
and branches of the bureaucracies, economic as well as 
political: management, army, party. Each of them has a 
special interest and aspires for social control. But the mo- 
nopolization of power is counteracted by two forces : on the 
one side, the Central Plan, in spite of its vagaries, loop- 
holes, and corrections, ultimately supersedes and integrates 
the special interests; on the other side, the entire bureauc- 
racy, up to the highest level, is subject to the competitive 
terror, or, after the relaxation of the terror, to the highly 
incalculable application of political or punitive measures, 
leading to the loss of power. To be sure, the Central Plan 



112 Political Tenets 

is itself the work of the bureaucracy in the main branches 
of the system: government, party, armed forces, manage- 
ment; but it is the result of their combined and adjusted 
interests and negotiations, ensuing in a sort of general in- 
terest which in turn depends on the internal growth of 
Soviet society. This relation also played an important role in 
the development of the terror. 

Terror is the centralized, methodical application of 
incalculable violence (incalculable for the objects of the 
terror, and also for the top groups and even the practition- 
ers of the terror) — not only in an emergency situation, but 
in a normal state of affairs. As long as the Soviet state re- 
lied on such incalculable application, it relied on terror- 
istic force — although the terror would approximate a nor- 
mal competitive social system to the degree to which the 
punitive measures (such as removal from office, demotion) 
would be nonviolent. In its historical function, terror may 
be progressive or regressive,^" depending upon whether it 
actually promotes, through the destruction of repressive 
institutions, the growth of liberal ones, and the rational 
utilization of the productive forces. In the Soviet state, the 
terror is of a twofold nature: technological and political. 
Inefficiency and poor performance at the technical and busi- 
ness level are punished; so is any kind of nonconformity: 
politically and dangerously suspect attitudes, opinions, be- 
havior. The two forms are interconnected, and efficiency is 
certainly often judged on political grounds. However, with 
the elimination of all organized opposition, and with the 

"" See Franz Neumann, "Notes on the Theory of Dictatorship," in The 
Democratic and the Authoritarian State (Glencoe, 111., Free Press, 1957), 
pp. 233-56. 



Dialectic of the Soviet State 113 

continued success of the totalitarian administration, the ter- 
ror tends to become predominantly technological, and, in 
the USSR itself, strictly political terror seems to be the 
exception rather than the rule. The completely standard- 
ized cliches of the political charges, which no longer even 
pretend to be rational, plausible, and consistent, may well 
serve to conceal the real reason for the indictment: differ- 
ences in the timing and implementation of administrative 
measures on whose substance the conflicting parties agree. 

The technological terror is omnipresent — but this very 
omnipresence implies a high degree of indifference toward 
special privilege and position. An action started on a low 
level may involve the highest level if the circumstances are 
"favorable." The chiefs themselves are not immune — they 
are not the absolute masters of oppression. The circum- 
stances which set the machine in motion against a specific 
target seem to be the end-constellation of numerous cross 
currents in the areas of the respective bureaucracies. The 
ultimate decision in prominent cases is also likely to be the 
result of negotiations and compromises among the top 
groups — each representing its ow^n "apparatus," but each 
apparatus again subject to competitive controls within the 
framework of the Central Plan and the then prevailing 
principles of foreign and domestic policy. This framework 
leaves much room for personal and clique influences and 
interests, corruption, and profiteering; it also permits one 
group (and one individual of the group) to come out on 
top — but it also sets the limits beyond which the monop- 
olization of power cannot go without upsetting the structure 
on which Soviet power rests. 



114 Political Tenets 

These limits are circumscribed by the exigencies of the 
planned growth and correlation of the economic, political, 
and military establishments. The rate and mode of growth, 
and the priorities of and within the main establishments 
are apparently determined through struggles and compro- 
mises between competing vested interests. Sooner or later, 
however, the outcome must conform to the basic trend of 
the construction of Soviet society and to the principles 
which have governed this trend since the first Five-Year 
Plan. Once institutionalized, they have their own momen- 
tum and their own objective requirements; the vested inter- 
ests themselves depend on the observance of these require- 
ments. The principles are altered and adjusted in accord- 
ance with the changing domestic and international situa- 
tion, but a long-range general trend emerges into which 
the modifications are integrated. When Stepanian stated 
that the development of Marxism presupposes "the un- 
changeability of its principles and foundations," ^^ this 
was more than propaganda: identical principles (Marxist 
or not) have indeed governed the controls in all basic 
spheres of the Soviet system. They are likely to reassert 
themselves in the conflict of competing powers and vested 
interests because they pertain to the veiy structure of the 
society in which these powers and interests prevail. For ex- 
ample, the efforts to reduce the investments in heavy indus- 
try in favor of light industry and an increase in consumers' 
goods, which came into the open after Stalin's death, as- 
sumed the form of a struggle for power among certain 

^"Usloviia i puti perekhoda ot sotsializma k konimunizmu" (The Condi- 
tions and the Paths of Transition from Socialism to Communism), in so- 
vetskom sotsia'isticheskom obshchestve (On Soviet Socialist Society), p. 482. 



Dialectic of the Soviet State 115 

groups of the top leadership. However, the long-range 
trend of Soviet industrialization and the political setup 
defined by it seem to have predetermined the decision to a 
great extent. The Stalinist construction of Soviet society 
rested on the sustained priority of heavy industry ; a funda- 
mental shift in the balance would mean a fundamental shift 
in the structure itself — in the economic as well as political 
system. Such a shift was not precluded by the Stalinist pro- 
gram — on the contrary: we emphasized the "tentative" 
character of this program and its orientation on a "second 
phase." However, this change is not within the discretion 
and power of any particular group or individual: it de- 
pends on the international constellation and on the eco- 
nomic and political level of the productive forces of Soviet 
society. More specifically, it depends on the attainment of 
the capacity level of the advanced industrial countries and 
the corresponding relative weakening of the capitalist world. 
Whether or not this level has been attained, and whether or 
not the international situation is feasible for the change, is 
a political decision, to be fought out among the leadership 
of the top bureaucracies — but the decision will be can- 
celled if it is not corroborated and "verified" by the ob- 
jective factors of the international and domestic situation, 
that is, in the last analysis, by the international effective- 
ness of Soviet policy. 

Another example for the perseverance of basic objec- 
tives and principles overriding the bureaucratic "struggle 
for power" may be provided by the agricultural policy: it 
aims, through all turns, regressions, leaps, and corrections 
and through consecutive stages of collectivization, at the 



116 Political Tenets 

establishment of complete socialist property on the land, 
total mechanization, and assimilation of urban and rural 
life and labor. In foreign policy, through "hard" and 
"soft" periods, through local wars and "peace offensives," 
Lenin's guidance stands supreme: to preserve the "respite" 
for the building of socialism and communism in coexist- 
ence with the capitalist world. Here, too, the interpretation 
of the governing principles, and the decision on the timing 
and scope of the measures which they stipulate, remain ul- 
timately the monopoly of a top group of leaders. But no 
matter how its composition and number may change, nor 
how the extent of consultation and compromise with the 
lower strata of the bureaucracy may vary, the governing 
principles seem to be rigid enough to define the limits of 
special powers and to preclude their institutionalization 
within a system governed by these principles. 

The Soviet bureaucracy thus does not seem to possess 
a basis for the effective perpetuation of special interests 
against the overriding general requirements of the social 
system on which it lives. The bureaucracy constitutes a sep- 
arate class which controls the underlying population 
through control of the economic, political, and military 
establishments, and exercise of this control engenders a 
variety of special interests which assert themselves in the 
control; however, they must compromise and ultimately 
succumb to the general policy which none of the special 
interests can change by virtue of its special power. Does 
this mean that the bureaucracy represents the common in- 
terest of society as a whole? 

In a society composed of competing groups with differ- 



Dialectic of the Soviet State 117 

ent economic, occupational, and administrative interests, 
"common interest" is not per se a meaningful term. Even 
if one assumes that the general rise in the material and cul- 
tural living conditions with a maximum of individual lib- 
erty and security defines the common interest of every civ- 
ilized society, it appears that in any nonhomogeneous so- 
ciety the realization of this interest will proceed in conflict 
with the interests of some of the (privileged) groups in 
society. The common interest would not be identical with 
the interest of all and each; it would remain an "ideolog- 
ical" concept. This antagonistic situation prevails not only 
in the relationship between the bureaucracy and the under- 
lying population, but also in that between the urban and 
rural groups, and even between different subgroups within 
these groups, such as between male and female, skilled and 
unskilled workers. Even in a highly advanced industrial 
society with abundant resources, the rise in the general 
standard of living and of general freedom could take place 
only as a most unequal development, overriding the imme- 
diate interests of large parts of the population. Just as the 
social need is not identical with the individual needs, so is 
the realization of "universal" liberty and justice at one 
and the same time also injustice and unfreedom in individ- 
ual cases (and even in the case of whole social groups). 
The very universality of right and law — the guarantor of 
freedom and justice — demands such negation and limita- 
tion by virtue of the fact that it must necessarily abstract 
from "particularities." 

The inequality implied in the common interest would be 
much greater in a backward society; neither nationaliza- 



118 Political Tenets 

tion nor central planning per se would eliminate it. The 
common interest would retain a high degree of "abstract- 
ness" as against the immediate interest (although this ab- 
stractness may be gradually reduced as society develops). 
In other words, the traditional distinction between the gen- 
eral (common) interest and the sum-total of particular in- 
terests would hold true, and the former would have to be 
defined in terms of its own — as a separate entity, as the so- 
cial interest over and above individual interests. Soviet 
Marxism defines the former in relation to the productive 
forces and their organization; the social interest is said to 
be represented by those groups and interests which promote 
the development of the productive forces. This relation is 
itself a historical factor, to be defined in terms of the politi- 
cal and economic situation of the respective society. 

In the case of Soviet society the accelerated development 
of its productive forces is considered a prerequisite for 
the survival and competitive strength of the Soviet state in 
the circumstances of "coexistence." The position of the 
bureaucracy thus depends on the expansion of the produc- 
tive apparatus, and the specific and conflicting interests 
within the bureaucracy are superseded, through the mech- 
anisms of technology and force, diplomacy and power 
politics, by this common social interest. The Soviet bu- 
reaucracy therefore represents the social interest in a 
hypostatized form, in which the individual interests are 
separated from the individuals and arrogated by the state. 

The Soviet state emerges as the institutionalized collec- 
tive in which the Marxian distinction between the immedi- 
ate and the real (objective historical) interest is made the 



Dialectic of the Soviet State 119 

rationale for the building of the political structure. The 
state is the manifestation of the real (the social) interest, 
but as such the state is "not yet" identical with the interests 
of the people whom it rules: their immediate interests do 
"not yet" coincide with the objective social interest. For 
example, the people want less work, more freedom, more 
consumer goods — but, according to the official theory, the 
still prevailing backwardness and scarcity necessitate the 
continued subordination of these interests to the social in- 
terest of armament and industrialization. This is the old 
discrepancy between the individual and society, represented 
by the state; however, in Soviet theory, it occurs at a new 
stage of the historical process. Formerly, the state repre- 
sented not the interest of society as a whole but that of the 
ruling class. To be sure, in a sense, the class state too rep- 
resented the collective interest ^* in so far as it organized 
and sustained the orderly reproduction of society as a 
whole and the development of the productive forces. How- 
ever, the conflict between their rational development in the 
common interest and their private-profit utilization was, 
within the framework of the class state, insoluble and viti- 
ated the identity of interests. As this conflict ripened, the 
class state would become of necessity ever more regressive 
and a fetter to the development of society. In contrast, the 
Soviet state is supposed to run the opposite course, capable 
of resolving the conflict ~'^ and of establishing the harmony 
between individual and social need on the basis of an all- 
out development of productivity. 

** See below, p. 120. * See above, pp. 94 f ., and below, p. 167. 



6. Base and Superstructure — Reality and Ideology 



IN MARXIAN THEORY, the State belongs to the superstructure 
inasmuch as it is not simply the direct political expression 
of the basic relationships of production but contains ele- 
ments which, as it were, "compensate" for the class rela- 
tionships of production. The state, being and remaining the 
state of the ruling class, sustains universal law and order 
and thereby guarantees at least a modicum of equality and 
security for the whole of society. Only by virtue of these 
elements can the class state fulfill the function of "moder- 
ating" and keeping within the bounds of "order" the class 
conflicts generated by the production relations.'^ It is this 
"mediation" which gives the state the appearance of a 
universal interest over and above the conflicting particular 
interests. The universal function of the state is itself deter- 
mined by the base, but contains factors transcending and 
even antagonistic to the base — factors which may become 
semi-independent forces, in turn actively affecting the base 
in various ways. 

Engels distinguished two principal modes in which the 

^ Engels, Origin of the Family, Private Property, and the State (New 
York, International Publishers, 1942), p. 155. See also Marx and Engels, 
The German Ideology (New York, International Publishers, 1939), pp. 
40-41. 



Reality and Ideology 121 

state can "react" on the basic economic process, namely, ei- 
ther counter to or "in the same direction" as the economic 
development. In the latter case, the state "accelerates" the 
economic development." The second mode of reaction pre- 
supposes conformity between the political superstructure 
and the development of the productive forces — a conform- 
ity which Marxian theory denies for all but the ascending 
phases of capitalist society (and class society in general). 
According to Soviet Marxism, the Bolshevik Revolution 
brought the political superstructure "into agreement" with 
the economic base, while the nationalization of the means 
of production rendered possible centralized control over 
the economic development.[The economic laws continue to 
operate as objective forces determining the superstructure, 
they can neither be "created" nor "changed" by the state, 
but they have become susceptible to conscious use and ap- 
plication.^ This, according to Soviet Marxist theory, is the 
decisive difference between the Soviet and the capitalist 
superstructure. Both forms of the state constitute a "polit- 
ical superstructure," that is to say, they are determined by 
the respective "economic structure" of society, but while 
this determination is blind and supreme in the capital- 
ist state, the Soviet state can "direct" and "control" it. 
Thus, whereas under capitalism "it is rather the state that 
is controlled by the capitalist economy," the Soviet state 

^Letter to Conrad Schmidt, October 27, 1890, in Marx and Engels, Se- 
lected Works (2 vols.; Moscow, Foreign Languages Publishing House, 
1949-50), II, 447. 

" Stalin, "Economic Problems of Socialism in the USSR," in Current 
Soviet Policies, ed. by Leo Gruliow (New York, F. A. Praeger, 1953), p. 18. 
See also articles from Izvestiia, January 23, 1953, in Current Digest of the 
Soviet Press, VI, No. 1 (February 14, 1953), 3-6; and below, pp. 166 f. 



122 Political Tenets 

"becomes the directing force of the country's economic 
development," the "directing force" of the economy/ 

Some analysts of Soviet developments have seen in this 
redefinition of the relation between base and superstructure 
(which is generalized and authenticated in Stalin's Marx- 
ism and Linguistic Problems) a revision of the fundamen- 
tal Marxian conception.^ In reality, it is only an applica- 
tion of Engels's proposition concerning the reciprocal ac- 
tion [W echselivirkung) between base and superstructure. 
The state, if it "accelerates" the economic development, 
"becomes a very great active force, helping (cooperating) 
with its base to form and consolidate itself; it takes all 
measures to help the new order to destroy and liquidate 
the old basis and the old classes." ^ This statement from 
Stalin's Marxism and Linguistic Problems refers not only 
to the state but to the superstructure in general. These for- 
mulations follow logically from the assumption, indisput- 
able for Soviet Marxism, that the Soviet society is a social- 
ist society. Naturally, a socialist state will have an essen- 
tially different relation to the base than a capitalist state 
(in Soviet Marxist language, a nonantagonistic relation). 

* G. Glezermann, "The Socialist State — Mighty Instrumentality for Build- 
ing Communism," in Current Digest of the Soviet Press, IV, No. 41 (Novem- 
ber 24, 1951), 7-10 (translated from Izvestiia, October 12, 1951). This does 
not preclude that "the bourgeois state influences the economic development." 
Stalin expands on this formulation in his "Economic Problems of Socialism," 
in Current Soviet Policies, pp. 1-20. See below, pp. 167 f. 

^Robert Daniels, "State and Revolution: A Case Study in the Genesis and 
Transformation of Communist Ideology," American Slavic and East European 
Review, XII, No. 1 (February, 1953), 22-43. 

" For the Soviet Marxist evaluation of Stalin's statement, see M. B. Mittin, 
Novyi vydaiushchiisia vklad I. V. Stalina v razvitie marksistsko-leninskoi 
teorii (The Distinguished New Contribution of J. V. Stalin to the Develop- 
ment of Marxist- Leninist Theory) (Moscow, Vsesoiuznoe obshchestvo po 
rasprostraneniiu politicheskikh i nauchnykh znanii, 1950), especially p. 13. 



Reality and Ideology 123 

Consequently, the development from socialism toward 
communism can equally logically be envisaged as a non- 
antagonistic development in the sense that progress to the 
"higher stage" does not involve "destructive" alterations 
in the base but rather the gradual unfolding of its potential- 
ities. The existence of a socialist base would indeed change 
the entire traditional function of the superstructure and es- 
tablish a new relation between ideology and reality. 

If we apply the traditional Marxian conception schemat- 
ically to Soviet society, the base consists of the prevailing 
"productive forces" in the prevailing production rela- 
tions," The "producers" are wage earners and salaried em- 
ployees of the state, and members of the collective farms. In 
the property relation of the producers to the basic means of 
production, there are no class distinctions between the 
groups making up Soviet society (intelligentsia, workers, 
peasants) — although, of course, vast distinctions exist in 
terms of control and living conditions. The superstructure 
consists of the system of administrative, legal, and cultural 
institutions, and of the official ideology promulgated by 
them and transmitted to the various fields of private and 
public life. As in the classical Marxian scheme, the base 
determines the superstructure, that is, the latter is shaped 

' The controversy as to whether or not Stalin's definition in Marxism and 
Linguistic Problems excludes the productive forces from the base is without 
relevance here. In Marxian theory, the productive forces constitute per se a 
more fundamental level than the production relations although they operate 
only within specific production relations. For the whole controversy see the 
report on the Conference of the Communist Academy of Social Sciences, 
February 25 to March 1, 1952, "Nauchnaia sessiia, posviashchennaia trudam 
I. V. Stalina i ikh znacheniiu v razvitii obshchestvennykh nauk" (Scientific 
Session Devoted to the Works of J. V. Stalin and to Their Significance in 
the Development of the Social Sciences), Voprosy Filosofii (Problems of 
Philosophy), 1952, No. 3, pp. 240-61. 



124 Political Tenets 

by the requirements of the productive apparatus. But the 
apparatus is nationalized, and these requirements are cen- 
trally planned and controlled. This introduces significant 
changes into the traditional scheme: the state becomes, 
without intermediary factors, the direct political organiza- 
tion of the productive apparatus, the general manager of 
the nationalized economy, and the hypostatized collective 
interest. The functional differences between base and su- 
perstructure therefore tend to be obliterated: the latter is 
methodically and systematically assimilated with the base 
by depriving the superstructure of those functions which 
are transcendent and antagonistic to the base. This process, 
which establishes new foundations for social control, alters 
the very substance of ideology. The tension between idea 
and reality, between culture and civilization, between intel- 
lectual and material culture — a tension which was one of 
the driving forces behind Western civilization — is not 
solved but methodically reduced. 

For Marx and Engels, ideology is an illusion (Schein), 
but a necessary illusion, arising from a social organization 
of production which appears to man as a system of inde- 
pendent, objective laws and forces. As a "reflection" of the 
actual social basis, the ideology partakes of the truth, but 
the latter is expressed in false form. The ideas of the ruling 
class become the ruling ideas and claim universal validity, 
but the claim is founded on "false consciousness" — false 
because the real connection of the ideas with their eco- 
nomic basis and therefore their actual limitations and nega- 
tions do not enter consciousness.^ A specific historical con- 

* Engels, Letter to Mehring, July 14. 1893, in Marx and Engels, Selected 
Works, II, 451. 



Reality and Ideology 125 

tent appears as universally valid and serves to provide a 
prop for a specific social system. However, the function of 
ideology goes far beyond such service. Into the ideology 
has entered material which — transmitted from generation 
to generation — contains the perpetual hopes, aspirations, 
and sufferings of man, his suppressed potentialities, the 
images of integral justice, happiness, and freedom. They 
find their ideological expressions chiefly in religion, phi- 
losophy, and art, but also in the juristic and political con- 
cepts of liberty, equality, and security. 

The Marxian notion of ideology here implies a dynamic 
which leads to a change in the function and weight of ideol- 
ogy relative to the base. The more the base encroaches upon 
the ideology, manipulating and coordinating it with the es- 
tablished order, the more the ideological sphere which is 
remotest from the reality (art, philosophy), precisely be- 
cause of its remoteness, becomes the last refuge for the 
opposition to this order. When Marx began to elaborate his 
theory, he was motivated by the conviction that history had 
at last reached the stage where Reason and Freedom could 
be transubstantiated from philosophical ideas into politi- 
cal objectives. Philosophy (which Marx considered as 
the most advanced ideology) was to find its fulfillment in 
the action of the proletariat,^ a fulfillment which was at the 
same time the end, the "loss" of philosophy. The prole- 
tariat, which provides the "material weapons" for philoso- 
phy, finds in philosophy its "conceptual weapons." Philoso- 

®Marx, "Zur Kritik der Hegelschen Rechtsphilosophie: Einleitung," in 
Marx and Engels, Historisch-Kritische Gesamtausgabe, ed. by D. Rjazonov 
(Frankfurt, Marx-Engels Archiv Verlagsgesellschaft, 1927), Div. I, I, Pt. 1, 
pp. 620 f. 



126 Political Tenets 

pliy had elaborated the idea of the liberty and dignity of 
man, of his inalienable rights, his autonomy, his mastery 
of his life, his potentialities, and his happiness. While class 
society had rendered these contents ideological, the action 
of the proletariat, in abolishing class society, would make 
them reality. 

However, the same development which precluded the so- 
cialist revolution in the advanced industrial countries viti- 
ated the Marxian notion of the transition from ideology to 
reality, from philosophy to revolutionary practice. If the 
proletariat no longer acts as the revolutionary class repre- 
senting the "absolute negation" of the established order, it 
no longer furnishes the "material weapons" for philoso- 
phy. The situation thus reverts: repelled by reality. Reason 
and Freedom become again the concern of philosophy. The 
"essence of man," his "total liberation" is again "experi- 
enced [only] in thought" {in Gedanken erlebt)}^ Theory 
— by virtue of its historical position Marxian theory is in 
its very substance philosophy — again not only anticipates 
political practice, runs ahead of it, but also upholds the 
objectives of liberation in the face of a failing practice. In 
this function, theory becomes again ideology — not as false 
consciousness, but as conscious distance and dissociation 
from, even opposition to, the repressive reality. And by the 
same token, it becomes a political factor of utmost signifi- 
cance. The struggle on the "ideological front" is, for the 
Soviet state, a struggle for survival. 

We have seen ^^ how, in this struggle, base and super- 
structure change their relation. According to Soviet Marx- 

'" Ibid. " See above, pp. 121 f. 



Reality and Ideology 127 

ism, whereas formerly progress to higher stages of social 
development necessitated the revolutionary alteration of 
the established basis, the Soviet state can achieve the transi- 
tion on the already existing basis, by planful and "scientific 
direction." The process eliminates previously dominant 
ideological elements in so far as even the most blatant con- 
tradictions and illusions, even nonsense and falsehood, 
enter into consciousness and are consciously utilized. But 
this does not take care of the whole content of ideology. 
The conflict between the growth of productive forces and 
the repressive production relations to which the entire 
population is subjected sustains among the population the 
need for ideological transcendence beyond the repressive 
reality. According to Marxian theory, this need will disap- 
pear "as soon as it is no longer necessaiy to represent a 
particular interest as general or the 'general interest' as 
ruling." ^^ In the Soviet system, the "general interest" is 
hypostatized in the state — an entity separate from the in- 
dividual interests. To the extent that the latter are still un- 
fulfilled and repelled by reality, they strive for ideological 
expression; and their force is the more explosive to the 
regime the more the new economic basis is propagandized 
as insuring the total liberation of man under communism. 
The fight against ideological transcendence thus becomes a 
life-and-death struggle for the regime. Within the ideolog- 
ical sphere, the center of gravity shifts from philosophy to 
literature and art. The danger zone of philosophical tran- 
scendence has been brought under control through the ab- 

'^ Marx and Engels, The German Ideology (New York, International Pub- 
lishers, 1939), p. 41. 



128 Political Tenets 

sorption of philosophy into the official theory. Metaphysics, 
traditionally the chief refuge for the still unrealized ideas of 
human freedom and fulfillment, is declared to be totally 
superseded by dialectical materialism and by the emergence 
of a rational society in socialism. Ethical philosophy, trans- 
formed into a pragmatic system of rules and standards of 
behavior, has become an integral part of state policy. ^^ 
What remains of these branches of philosophy is their 
methodical negation. The fight against Western philoso- 
phy, "bourgeois objectivism," idealism, and so forth 
(strikingly exemplified by the Aleksandrov controversy 
in 1946), aims at discrediting philosophical trends and 
categories which, by virtue of their transcendence, seemed 
to endanger the "closed" political and ideological system. 
(As a theoretical task, the aim seems to be self-defeating in 
view of the fact that the Marxian conception has cancelled 
but preserved [aufgehoben] the tabooed "bourgeois" ele- 
ments. It is not surprising, therefore, that the controversy 
nowhere moves at the level of a substantive critique of 
"bourgeois philosophy.") ^^ With this negation of phi- 
losophy,^'' the main ideological struggle then is directed 
against the transcendence in art. Soviet art must be "realis- 
tic." 

"The second part of this study will discuss the transformation. 

'* The taboo on philosophy affects even those Marxist contributions which 
marked a milestone in the development of post-Marxian theory, most notably 
Georg Lukacs's Geschichte and Klassenbeivusstsein (Berlin, Der Malik- 
Verlag, 1923), while the same author's Die Zerstorung der Vernunft (Berlin, 
Aufbau-Verlag, 1954) may serve as an example of the deterioration of the 
Marxist critique. 

^^ For the reasons indicated above, a substantive discussion of Soviet 
philosophy lies outside the scope of this study. The best and most compre- 
hensive survey is in Gustav A. Wetter, Der dialektische Materialismus; seine 
Geschichte und sein System in der Soviet-Union (Freiburg, Herder, 1952). 



Reality and Ideology 129 

Realism can be — and has been — a highly critical and 
progressive form of art; confronting reality "as it is" with 
its ideological and idealized representations, realism up- 
holds the truth against concealment and falsification. In 
this sense realism shows the ideal of human freedom in its 
actual negation and betrayal and thus preserves the tran- 
scendence without which art itself is cancelled. In contrast, 
Soviet realism conforms to the pattern of a repressive state. 
The conscious and controlled implementation of state pol- 
icies through the medium of literature, music, painting, 
and so forth, is by itself not incompatible with art (exam- 
ples could be cited from Greek art to Bert Brecht). How- 
ever, Soviet realism goes beyond the artistic implementa- 
tion of political norms by accepting the established social 
reality as the final framework for the artistic content, tran- 
scending it neither in style nor in substance. Certain short- 
comings, blunders, and lags in this reality are criticized, 
but neither the individual nor his society are referred to a 
sphere of fulfillment other than that prescribed by and 
enclosed in the prevailing system. To be sure, they are re- 
ferred to the communist future, but the latter is presented 
as evolving from the present without "exploding" the exist- 
ing contradictions. The future is said to be nonantagonistic 
to the present; repression will gradually and through obe- 
dient effort engender freedom and happiness — no catastro- 
phe separates history from prehistory, the negation from 
its negation. But it is precisely the catastrophic element 
inherent in the conflict between man's essence and his exist- 
ence that has been the center toward which art has gravi- 
tated since its secession from ritual. The artistic images 



130 Political Tenets 

have preserved the determinate negation of the established 
reality — ultimate freedom. When Soviet aesthetics attacks 
the notion of the "unsurmountable antagonism between es- 
sence and existence" as the theoretical principle of "for- 
malism," ^* it thereby attacks the principle of art itself. In 
Marxian theory, this antagonism is a historical fact, and is 
to be resolved in a society which reconciles the existence 
of man with his essence by providing the material condi- 
tions for the free development of all humane faculties. If 
and when this has been achieved, the traditional basis of 
art would have been undermined — through the realization 
of the content of art. Prior to this historical event, art re- 
tains its critical cognitive function: to represent the still 
transcendental truth, to sustain the image of freedom 
against a denying reality. With the realization of freedom, 
art would no longer be a vessel of the truth.^^ Hegel, who 
saw this realization as the task of his own period, already 
proclaimed that art had become a thing of the past, had lost 
its substance. He attributed this obsolescence of art to 
the new scientific-philosophical spirit, which demanded a 
stricter formulation of the truth than that accessible to 
art.^^ Marxian theory retained the historical link between 
social progress and the obsolescence of art: the develop- 
ment of the productive forces renders possible the material 
fulfillment of the promesse du honheur expressed in art; 
political action — the revolution — is to translate this possi- 
bility into reality. 

"V. A. Razumnyi, "0 sushchnosti realisticheskogo khudozhestvennogo 
obraza" (On the Essence of a Realistic Artistic Form), Voprosy Filosofii 
(Problems of Philosophy), 1952, No. 6, p. 101. 

" Hegel, "Vorlesungen iiber die Aesthetik," in Sdmtliche Werke, ed. by 
H. Glockner (26 vols.; Stuttgart, F. Fromman, 1927^10), XII, 215. 

^Ubid., pp. 30, 32. 



Reality and Ideology 131 

Soviet Marxism claims that the Bolshevik Revolution has 
created the basis for this translation. What then remains as 
the function and content of art? Soviet aesthetics answers: 
Reflection of the reality in the form of artistic images. ^^ 
"The law of our aesthetics is that the more realistic our 
literature is the more romantic it becomes." '" In other 
words, once the reality itself embodies the ideal (though 
not yet in its pure form), art must necessarily reflect the 
reality, that is, if it is to retain its essential function, it must 
be "realism." The promesse du bonheur which, being be- 
yond reality, constituted the "romantic" element in art, 
now appears as the realistic concern of the policy makers 
— realism and romanticism converge. But this convergence, 
if it were genuine, would make art superfluous. The reality 
of freedom would repel the ideology of freedom in its ar- 
tistic transcendence. Hegel saw in the obsolescence of art a 
token of progress. As the development of Reason conquers 
transcendence ("takes it back" into reality) art turns into 
its own negation. Soviet aesthetics rejects this idea and in- 
sists on art, while outlawing the transcendence of art. It 
wants art that is not art, and it gets what it asks for. 

However, the Soviet treatment of art is not simply an 
outburst of boundless authoritarianism; its historical sig- 
nificance goes beyond that of political and national re- 
quirements for regimentation. The most shocking notions 
of Soviet aesthetics testify to a keen awareness of the social 
function of art. They are chiefly derived from the strong 
emphasis placed on the cognitive function of art. Accord- 

" Razumnyi, "0 sushchnosti realisticheskogo khudozhestvennogo obraza" 
(On the Essence of a Realistic Artistic Form), Voprosy Filosofii (Problems 
of Philosophy), 1952, No. 6, p. 99. 

^ Literaturnaia Gazeta (Literary Gazette), November 17, 1948. 



132 Political Tenets 

ing to Soviet aesthetics, there is no essential contradiction 
and opposition between art and science; the artistic and the 
logical notions are inseparable.^^ In "much the same way 
as science," art expresses the "objective truth." ^" Still, art 
is a specific presentation of truth — a presentation which is 
incommensurate with scientific as well as common-lan- 
guage communication. The reasons for this incommensura- 
bility are manifold; they seem to pertain to the fact that 
art reveals and at the same time consecrates the (subjec- 
tively and objectively) unmastered forces in man and his 
world, the "danger zones" beneath and beyond social con- 
trol. Viewed from the position of a repressive society, ulti- 
mate freedom resides in these danger zones. On its deepest 
level, art is a protest against that which is. By that very 
token, art is a "political" matter: if left to itself, it may 
endanger law and order. Plato's treatment of art and his 
system of rigid censorship which fuses aesthetic, political, 
and epistemological criteria, does more justice to the na- 
ture and function of art than does its evaluation as "free" 
intellectual, emotional, or educational entertainment. 

But art as a political force is art only in so far as it 
preserves the images of liberation; in a society which is 
in its totality the negation of these images, art can preserve 
them only by total refusal, that is, by not succumbing to 
the standards of the unfree reality, either in style, or in 
form, or in substance. The more totalitarian these stand- 

^ Razumnyi, "0 sushchnosti realisticheskogo khudozhestvennogo obraza" 
(On the Essence of a Realistic Artistic Form), Voprosy Filosofii (Problems 
of Philosophy) , 1952, No. 6, pp. 99 and 107. 

"P. Trofimov and others, "Printsipy marksistsko-leninskoi estetiki" (Prin- 
ciples of Marxist-Leninist Aesthetics), Kommunist (Communist), 1954, No. 
16 (November), p. 95. 



Reality and Ideology 133 

ards become, the more reality controls all language and all 
communication, the more irrealistic and surrealistic will 
art tend to be, the more will it be driven from the concrete 
to the abstract, from harmony to dissonance, from content 
to form. Art is thus the refusal of everything that has been 
made part and parcel of reality. The works of the great 
"bourgeois" antirealists and "formalists" are far deeper 
committed to the idea of freedom than is socialist and So- 
viet realism. The irreality of their art expresses the ir- 
reality of freedom: art is as transcendental as its object. 
The Soviet state by administrative decree prohibits the 
transcendence of art; it thus eliminates even the ideologi- 
cal reflex of freedom in an unfree society. Soviet realistic 
art, complying with the decree, becomes an instrument of 
social control in the last still nonconformist dimension of 
the human existence. Cut off from its historical base, so- 
cialized without a socialist reality, art reverts to its ancient 
prehistorical function: it assumes magical character. Thus, 
it becomes a decisive element in the pragmatic rationality 
of behaviorism. 

"Art teaches ... a definite relation toward reality." ^^ 
The relation is exemplified by the "typical" images of the 
Soviet hero and patriot, in his struggle against hostile and 
obsolete forces. Soviet art aims at creating and establish- 
ing such a relation in reality, and is to effectuate this rela- 
tion as art, that is, through the artistic image, through the 
artistic illusion. But this is the principle of magic: To 
"enact in fantasy the fulfillment of the desired reality," 
"an illusory technique supplementary to the real tech- 
"^Ibid., pp. 107-8. 



134 Political Tenets 

nique." ^* The illusion, of course, cannot have a direct ef- 
fect on reality, but in so far as it changes the "subjective 
attitude to reality," indirectly it changes reality. The re- 
gression of the cognitive function of art from the artistic 
to the magical comes out in the most reactionary feature 
of Soviet aesthetics: the rejection of "formalism" and of 
all "abstract" and "dissonant" structures. The progressive 
elements in modern "bourgeois art" were precisely in 
those structures which preserved the "shock" character of 
art,"" that is, those expressing the catastrophic conflict. 
They represented the desperate attempt to break through 
the social standardization and falsification which had made 
the traditional artistic structures unusable for expressing 
the artistic content. The harmonious forms, in their real- 
istic as well as classical and romantic development, had 
lost their transcendental, critical force; they stood no 
longer antagonistic to reality, but appeared as part and 
adornment of it — as instruments of adjustment. Communi- 
cated through the mass media, they became welcome tunes 
accompanying daily work and leisure, nourishment for 
recreation and relaxation periods. Under these circum- 
stances, only their determinate negation could restore their 
content. Conversely, through the reinstatement of harmony 
by administrative decree, the banning of dissonance, dis- 
cord, and atonality, the cognitive function of art is 
"brought in line," and conformity is enforced in the per 
se nonconformistic artistic imagination. 

^ George Thomson, Studies in Ancient Greek Society (New York, Inter- 
national Publishers, 1949), p. 440. See above, pp. 88 f. 

^ T. W. Adorno, "Die gegangelte Musik," in Dissonanzen (Gottingen, 
Vandenhoeck und Ruprecht, 1956), pp. 46 ff. 



Reality and Ideology 135 

It is interesting to note that, with its denunciation of dis- 
sonant art, Soviet aesthetics reverts to Plato's dictum, 
which permits only beautiful, simple, and harmonious 
forms. Only these forms "mix" with the Good and the 
Truth: "And now the power of the good has returned into 
the region of the beautiful ; for measure and symmetry are 
beauty and virtue all the world over" and "we said that 
truth was to form an element in this mixture." ^ Plato's 
theory of art refers to a state in which the philosopher 
kings guard the standards for the good, the true, and the 
beautiful — a state antagonistic to reality. Pressed into the 
service of reality, the mixture destroys its own components. 
Within the general framework of the political controls 
over art, a wide range of policy modifications is possible. 
Relaxation and tightening, alteration of artistic standards 
and styles, depend on the internal and international con- 
stellations. Naturally, with the transition from terroristic 
to normal modes of societal regimentation, the claim for 
more artistic freedom will be heard and perhaps fulfilled. 
The rigidity of "Soviet realism" may well be loosened; 
realism and romanticism, in any case, have ceased to be 
opposites, and even "formalistic" and "abstract" elements 
may still become reconcilable with conformist enjoyment. 
In its societal function, art shares the growing impotence 
of individual autonomy and cognition. 
''Philebus 64. 



7. Dialectic and Its Vicissitudes 



PERHAPS NOTHING is more revealing in the development of 
Soviet Marxism than its treatment of dialectic. Dialectical 
logic is the cornerstone of Marxian theory; it guides the 
analysis of the prerevolutionary as well as of the revolu- 
tionary development, and this analysis in turn is supposed 
to guide the strategy in both periods. Any fundamental 
"revision" of dialectical logic that goes beyond the Marx- 
ist application of dialectic to a new historical situation 
would indicate not only a "deviation" from Marxian 
theory (which is only of dogmatic interest) but also a 
theoretical justification for a change in the basic trend. 
Interpreters of Soviet theory have therefore correctly 
drawn attention to events in this sphere. They have con- 
cluded that Soviet Marxism has tuned down and arrested 
the dialectic in the interest of the ideological justification 
and protection of a regime which, according to dialectical 
logic, must appear as subject to being surpassed by the 
historical development. Chief support of this conclusion is 
seen in the emasculation of the transition from quantity to 
quality, the denial of explosive changes under socialism 
(the notion of "nonantagonistic contradictions"), in the 
reintroduction of formal logic, and in the disappearance 



Dialectic and Its Vicissitudes 137 

from the dialectical vocabulary of the "negation of the 
negation." ^ In point of fact, however, Soviet Marxism is 
nowhere more "orthodox" than in its painful elaboration 
of the dialectical method; we shall see that not one of the 
above mentioned innovations in itself runs counter to the 
Marxian (and even Hegelian) dialectical logic. 

But while not a single of the basic dialectical concepts 
has been revised or rejected in Soviet Marxism, the func- 
tion of dialectic itself has undergone a significant change: 
it has been transformed from a mode of critical thought 
into a universal "world outlook" and universal method 
with rigidly fixed rules and regulations, and this trans- 
formation destroys the dialectic more thoroughly than any 
revision. The change corresponds to that of Marxism itself 
from theory to ideology; dialectic is vested with the magi- 
cal qualities of official thought and communication. As 
Marxian theory ceases to be the organon of revolutionary 
consciousness and practice and enters the superstructure 
of an established system of domination, the movement of 
dialectical thought is codified into a philosophical system. 
The more problematic the relation between dialectical and 
formal logic becomes, the more dialectic itself becomes 
formal logic. The difficulties of Soviet Marxism in produc- 
ing an adequate "textbook" on dialectic and logic are not 
only of a political nature, but the very essence of dialec- 
tics rebels against such codification. This holds true for 
idealistic as well as materialist dialectics, for neither He- 
gel nor Marx developed dialectic as a general methodologi- 

^ See A. Philipov, Logic and Dialectic in the Soviet Union (New York, Re- 
search Program on the USSR, 1952) , pp. 37 f. 



138 Political Tenets 

cal scheme. The first step in this direction was made by 
Engels in his Dialectics of Nature (which he did not pub- 
lish), and his notes have provided the skeleton for the 
Soviet Marxist codification. 

Marx elaborated his dialectic as a conceptual tool for 
comprehending an inherently antagonistic society. The 
dissolution of the fixed and stable notions of philosophy, 
political economy, and sociology into their contradictory- 
components was to "reflect" the actual structure and move- 
ment of history; dialectic was to reproduce in theory the 
essence of reality. And in order to reproduce it adequately? 
in order to provide an adequate theory of history, the tradi- 
tional categories had to be redefined because they con- 
cealed rather than revealed what happened. However, the 
dialectical relation between the structure of thought and 
that of reality is more than reflection and correspondence. 
If Hegel consistently transgressed the clearly established 
distinction between thought and its object, if he talked of 
"contradictions" (a "logical" term) in reality, of the 
"movement" of concepts, of quantity "turning" into qual- 
ity, he indeed stipulated not only correspondence but a 
specific "identity" between thought and its object — he as- 
similated the one with the other. But it may be assumed 
that the wisdom of his critics, who note that Hegel confused 
two essentially different realms, was not beyond the reaches 
of his intelligence and awareness. According to Hegel, the 
traditional distinction between thought and its object is 
"abstract" and falsifies the real relation. Thought and its 
object have a common denominator, which, itself "real," 
constitutes the substance of thought as well as of its object. 



Dialectic and Its Vicissitudes 139 

This common denominator is the inherent structure and 
the telos of all being, i.e., Reason. It is for Hegel the struc- 
ture according to which all modes of being, subjective as 
well as objective, are modes of self-realization in an ever 
more conscious form — from the "blind" process of unor- 
ganic nature to the free realization of man in history. Rea- 
son is subjective as well as objective — the Logos of all be- 
ing. It is dialectical in so far as the realization takes place 
through the development and solution of contradictions 
which define the various modes and conditions of being. 
Being is in its essence a process of "comprehending" — 
the process in which an object becomes what it is through 
constituting itself (as this particular object) in and against 
the various conditions and relations of its existence. By 
virtue of this process, existence becomes comprehending, 
the object becomes "subject," and comprehending, the "no 
tion" (Begriff), becomes the essential "reality" of being 
Self-conscious thinking is only the highest mode of an ex 
istence common to all being, and the movement of though 
is only the highest and most general mode of the movemen 
of all being. Hegel speaks of one notion turning into an 
other, meaning that a notion, thought through, reveals con 
tents which at first seem alien and even opposed to this no 
tion. What happens is not that in the thought process one 
notion is replaced by another, by one more adequate to 
reality, but that the same notion unfolds its own content — 
a dynamic which is that of the reality comprehended in the 
notion. The reality has (or rather is) its own Logos and 
logic is ontology. Behind this apparent play with the equi- 
vocation of words lies the very idea which has been con- 



140 Political Tenets 

stitutive of Western philosophy since the Greeks — the idea 
of the Logos as the essence of being, which in turn deter- 
mines the logical structure of "definition" and makes 
"logic" into an instrument for finding and communicating 
the truth. No matter how inadequate the translation of 
Logos as "reason" may be, it elucidates the decisive impli- 
cation of this idea, namely, that the order of the cosmos 
(nature as well as society, physics as well as history) is at 
one and the same time a logical and ontological, a com- 
prehending and comprehended [begreifende and begrif- 
fene) order. Thus the cognitive relation is constitutive of 
reality, is subjective and objective. However, the unity of 
the subjective and objective world is not a fact, not a given 
condition, but one that is to be attained in the struggle 
against adverse, denying conditions. Once this struggle 
becomes the self-conscious mode of existence, namely, in 
the human being, the dialectical process becomes the his- 
torical process — theory and practice in one. It comes to 
fruition in a "state of the world" where the conflict is re- 
solved in the transparent harmony of subject and object, 
individual and universal. This is the inner logic of philoso- 
phy as well as reality. The dialectical logic may thus be 
called a logic of freedom, or rather, to be more exact, a 
logic of liberation, for the process is that of an alienated 
world, whose "substance" can become "subject" (as the 
Phenomenology of the Spirit formulates the thesis of He- 
gel's philosophy) only through shattering and surpassing 
the conditions which "contradict" its realization. Then, 
however, Hegel's dialectic surpasses the historical process 
itself and makes it into a part of a metaphysical system 



Dialectic and Its Vicissitudes 141 

in which ultimate freedom is only the freedom of the Idea. 

The Marxian "inversion" of Hegel's dialectic remains 
committed to history. The driving forces behind the his- 
torical process are not mere conflicts but contradictions 
because they constitute the very Logos of history as the 
history of alienation. Thus, according to Marx, (the Logos 
of) capitalist society speaks against itself: Its economy 
functions normally only through periodic crises; growing 
productivity of labor sustains scarcity and toil; increas- 
ing wealth perpetuates poverty; progress is dehumaniza- 
tion. Specifically, as Marx claims to show in Capital, it is 
the free wage contract and the just exchange of equivalents 
which generate exploitation and inequality; it is the capi- 
talist realization of freedom, equality, and justice which 
turns them into their opposite.^ The rationality of the sys- 
tem is self-contradictory: the very laws which govern it 
lead to its destruction. As in Hegel's conception, the proc- 
ess of liberation appears not as an extraneous scheme 
superimposed upon reality but as its objective dynamic, 
and the latter is the realization of the free "subject," which 
now finds its historical form and task — that of the prole- 
tariat. Moreover, the Marxian dialectic also is, as a politi- 
cal-historical process, a cognitive one: the true conscious- 
ness (class consciousness) of the proletariat is a constitu- 
tive factor in the objective dynamic of liberation. 

These brief comments on the structure of dialectic may 
illustrate the fate it underwent in Soviet Marxism. The 
Logos of dialectic is no longer that of liberation — neither 
in Hegel's ontological nor in Marx's historical sense. This 

* Capital, I, Chap. 4, conclusion. 



142 Political Tenets 

is inevitable once dialectic is no longer focused on the 
contradictions of class society but extended beyond them. 
As Marxian theory is transformed into a general scientific 
"world outlook," dialectic becomes an abstract "theory of 
knowledge." Although it is to pertain to the proletariat 
and the Communist Party,^ the connection is no longer 
transparent. Now Marxian theory may perhaps be called 
a "world outlook," but then its world is that of "pre- 
history," class society, and, specifically, capitalist society. 
Marxian theory analyzes and criticizes this world in all its 
manifestations, in its material and intellectual culture. 
There is no Marxian theory which may be meaningfully 
called a "world outlook" for postcapitalist societies — 
whether they be socialist or not. There is no Marxian theory 
of socialism because the antagonistic-dialectical laws 
which govern presocialist history are not applicable to 
the history of free mankind, and theory cannot predeter- 
mine the laws of freedom. Nor does Marxian theory 
"prophesy" beyond demonstrable trends in capitalist so- 
ciety. The essentially historical character of Marxian the- 
ory precludes unhistorical generalizations. Although En- 
gels defined dialectic as the "science of the general laws of 
motion and development of nature, human society, and 
thought," ^ he noted that nature as well as society are 
"phases of historical development," and that the l^ws of 
dialectic are "abstracted" from their history.^ In such ab- 

' See the report on the results of the discussion of logic in Voprosy 
Filosofii (Problems of Philosophy), 1951, No. 6, pp. 143-49. 

* "Anti-Diihring," in A Handbook of Marxism, ed. by E. Bums (New York, 
International Publishers, 1935), p. 266. 

^Dialectics of Nature, trans, by Clemens Dutt (New York, International 
Publishers, 1940), p. 26. 



Dialectic and Its Vicissitudes 143 

straction, they can be presented as a series of general as- 
sumptions, categories, and conclusions — but the general 
scheme immediately cancels itself, for its categories come 
to life only in their historical concretion. 

Consequently, in trying to present dialectic "as such," 
Soviet Marxists can do nothing but distill from the con- 
crete dialectical analysis of the "classics" certain princi- 
ples, illustrate them, and confront them with "undialecti- 
cal" thought. The principles are those enumerated in 
Stalin's "Dialectical and Historical Materialism," which, 
in turn, are only a paraphrase of Engels's propositions in 
his Dialectics of Nature.^ In terms of Hegel's and Marx's 
dialectic, they are neither true nor false — they are empty 
shells. Hegel could develop the principles of dialectic in 
the medium of universality, as a "science of logic," be- 
cause to him the structure and movement of being was that 
of the "notion" and attained its truth in the Absolute Idea ; 
Marxian theory, however, which rejects Hegel's interpreta- 
tion of being in terms of the Idea, can no longer unfold 
the dialectic as logic: its Logos is the historical reality, 
and its universality is that of history. 

The problem as to whether or not the Marxian dialectic 
is applicable to nature must here at least be mentioned be- •^ 
cause the emphasis on the dialectic of nature is a distin- 
guishing feature of Soviet Marxism — in contrast to Marx 
and even to Lenin. If the Marxian dialectic is in its con- 
ceptual structure a dialectic of the historical reality, then 
it includes nature in so far as the latter is itself part of the 

" Ibid. For the "omission" of the "negation of the negation" see below, pp. 
153 f. 



144 Political Tenets 

historical reality (in the interaction [Stoffwechsel] be- 
tween man and nature, the domination and exploitation of 
nature, nature as ideology, etc.). But precisely in so far 
as nature is investigated in abstraction from these histori- 
cal relations, as in the natural sciences, it seems to lie out- 
side the realm of dialectic. It is no accident that in Engels's 
"Dialectics of Nature" the dialectical concepts appear as 
mere analogies, figurative and superimposed upon the con- 
tent — strikingly empty or commonplace compared with the 
exact concreteness of the dialectical concepts in the eco- 
nomic and socio-historical writings. And it is the Dialectics 
of Nature which has become the constantly quoted authori- 
tative source for the exposition of dialectic in Soviet Marx- 
ism. Inevitably so, for if "dialectic reigns everywhere," ' 
if it is the science of the "general laws of the material 
world and of knowledge," * and therefore the only true 
"scientific world outlook," then the dialectical concepts 
must first and foremost be validated in the most scientific 
of all sciences — that of nature. The consequence is a de- 
emphasis of history. 

The Soviet Marxist hypostatization of dialectic into a 
universal scientific world outlook entails the division of 
Marxian theory into dialectical and historical materialism, 
the latter being the "extension" and "application" of the 
former to the "study of society and its history." ^ The divi- 

'K. S. Bakradze, "K voprosu o sootnoshenii logiki i dialektiki" (On the 
Relationship Between Logic and Dialectic), Voprosy Filosofii (Problems of 
Philosophy), 1950, No. 2, p. 200. 

* V. S. Molodtsov, "Ob oshibkakh v ponimanii predmeta dialekticheskogo 
materializma" (On False Conceptions of the Subject of Dialectical Material- 
ism), Voprosy Filosofii (Problems of Philosophy), 1956, No. 1, p. 188. 

® Stalin, "Dialectical and Historical Materialism," in History of the Com- 
munist Party of the Soviet Union (New York, International Publishers, 
1939), p. 105. 



Dialectic and Its Vicissitudes 145 

sion would have been meaningless to Marx, for wliom dia- 
lectical materialism was synonymous with historical ma- 
terialism. In Soviet Marxism, historical materialism be- 
comes one particular branch of the general scientific and 
philosophical system of Marxism which, codified into an 
ideology and interpreted by the officials of the Party, justi- 
fies policy and practice. History, which in Marxian theory 
is the determining and validating dimension of dialectic, 
is in Soviet Marxism a special field in which historical as 
well as suprahistorical laws assert themselves. The latter, 
arranged into a system of propositions, are presented as 
the ultimately determining forces in history as well as 
nature. The dialectical process thus interpreted is no longer 
in a strict sense a historical process — it is rather that his- 
tory is reified into a second nature. Soviet developments 
thereby obtain the dignity of the objective natural laws 
by which they are allegedly governed and which, if cor- 
rectly understood and taken into consciousness, will even- 
tually right all wrongs and lead to final victory over the 
opposing forces. 

But while the objective, determinist character of dialec- 
tical laws is thus strengthened, Soviet Marxism in reality 
appears as defying determinism and practicing volun- 
tarism. The shift in emphasis from the former to the latter 
seems to be a feature of Leninism and seems to culminate 
in Stalinism. A straight road seems to lead from Lenin's 
"consciousness from without" and his notion of the cen- 
tralized authoritarian party to Stalin's personal dictator- 
ship — a road on which "scientific determinism" gives way 
(in practice, if not in ideology) to decisions on the ground 
of shifting political and even personal objectives and in- 



146 Political Tenets 

terests. Subjective factors prevail over the objective fac- 
tors and laws. However, closer analysis shows that the 
abstract opposition of determinism and voluntarism is un- 
tenable; their interrelation is more complex and requires 
discussion to the extent that it sheds light on the socio- 
historical changes reflected in Soviet Marxism. 

The two elements are present from the beginning in the 
Marxian doctrine; their relative weight depends on the 
historical conditions under which Marxism operates.^" In 
periods of acute class struggles, when the revolution is "on 
the agenda" and when a mature, class-conscious proletariat 
is in political action, Marxism appears as little more than 
the conscious manifestation of objective factors. In so far 
as the latter tend "by themselves" toward revolution, in 
so far as the capitalist structure is shaken by economic 
crises and political upheavals, Marxism can interpret the 
situation chiefly in terms of the harmony of the subjective 
and objective factors. The function of the Marxist parties 
and of their leadership and international organization then 
is to comprehend and explain the objective constellation 
of political forces and to direct the action of the proletariat 
in accordance with it. This function is a subjective factor: 
itself cognition and volition, it appeals to cognition and 
volition. However, as a subjective factor, it is only the 
formulation of the objective factors, which, directing the 
political action, becomes an integral part and aspect of 
them. In contrast, when the revolutionary potential is weak- 
ened, absorbed, or defeated, then the cognitive and volun- 
tarist element is not embodied in the objective situation. 

'" For the following see above, pp. 17 f. 



Dialectic and Its Vicissitudes 147 

The consciousness and action of the proletariat then are 
largely determined by the "blind laws" of the capitalist 
process instead of having broken through this determinism. 
Consequently, the party, or rather the party leadership, 
appears as the historical repository of the "true" interests 
of the proletariat and above the proletariat, working by 
dictum and decree, and the proletariat becomes the object 
of these decisions. The subjective and objective factors are 
torn asunder — in reality, and this development appears in 
theory as the tension and antagonism between voluntarism 
and determinism. 

It has often been noted that Marxian theory underwent 
a significant change after 1848. The philosophic humanism 
of the earlier writings, in which socialism is defined in 
terms of human aspirations and potentialities, gave way to 
a "scientific socialism governed by inexorable objective 
laws." ^^ The transformation reflects the actual situation 
of the proletariat. The determinist elements in Marxian 
theory pertain to the structure of class society and par- 
ticularly to capitalism, where men are subordinated to un- 
mastered forces, operating "behind the back of the indi- 
viduals" as inexorable laws. The abortive revolutions of 
1848 and the ensuing consolidation of bourgeois society 
reasserted the "validity" of these laws, to which the bulk 
of the proletariat also succumbed. While Marxian theory 
reflects this extended determinism by increasing emphasis 
on the scientific character of the dialectic toward social- 
ism, the "voluntarist" element comes to reside in a separate 

" See Leonard Krieger, "Marx and Engels as Historians," Journal of the 
History of Ideas. XIV, No. 3 (June, 1953), 396 ff. 



148 Political Tenets 

historical agency or agent, that is, in the leadership. The 
"true" consciousness is that which has not succumbed to 
the "false" determinism. But no matter how great the dis- 
tance may be between the consciousness of the leadership 
and that of the proletariat, the former, in its theory and 
practice, must retain or reestablish the demonstrable con- 
nection between the "immediate" and the "real" interest 
of the proletariat. This relation between a highly central- 
ized leadership and the proletariat which remains its de- 
termining base is illustrated in the period of the First 
International. At that time, the ideas, objectives, and atti- 
tudes of the leadership were remote from those of the 
proletariat and certainly not shared or even understood 
by the great majority of the latter. Still, the Inaugural Ad- 
dress, the analyses of the Paris Commune, and the com- 
munications of the leadership testify to the extent to which 
the factual attitude and actions of the proletariat deter- 
mined the leadership's theory and strategy. 

Subsequently, as ever larger strata of the industrial pro- 
letariat were installed in the capitalist system and par- 
took of its benefits, the "natural laws" governing the 
system also seemed to engulf its negation. Revisionist 
Marxism affirmed this process. Dialectic was discarded. 
Eduard Bernstein's doctrine implied a determinism far 
more rigid than that of Marx and Engels. The subjective 
factor was objectified at the expense of its revolutionary 
content and intent: the proletariat moved — with the whole 
of society — under objective laws toward socialism, and the 
leadership operated under the same laws. We have tried to 
show above how Leninism attempted to restore the true 



Dialectic and Its Vicissitudes 149 

relation between the subjective and objective factors by 
establishing the authority of the centralized revolutionary 
party over and above the proletariat. Again, the strength- 
ening of the voluntarist element was accompanied by a 
strengthening of the determinist character of Marxian the- 
ory: Lenin's Materialism and Empirio-criticism replaced 
the dialectical notion of truth by a primitive naturalistic 
realism, which has become canonical in Soviet Marxism. 
However, in Leninism, the two factors remained closely 
related: during the Revolution, it became apparent to what 
degree Lenin had succeeded in basing his strategy on the 
actual class interests and aspirations of the workers and 
peasants. At the same time, the dialectic was reactivated 
and provided the conceptual tools for Lenin's guiding 
analyses of the historical situation. Then, from 1923 on, 
the decisions of the leadership have been increasingly dis- 
sociated from the class interests of the proletariat. The 
former no longer presuppose the proletariat as a revolu- 
tionary agent but rather are imposed upon the proletariat 
and the rest of the underlying population. The authori- 
tarian voluntarism which characterized the Stalinist lead- 
ership responds to the objective determinant, the reduction 
of the revolutionary potential in the capitalist countries. 
And as the will of the leadership acts upon the proletariat 
from above, the theory pronounced by the leadership or 
endorsed by it assumes rigid determinist forms. The di- 
alectic is petrified into a universal system in which the 
historical process appears as a "natural" process and in 
which objective laws over and above the individuals govern 
not only the capitalist but also the socialist society. The 



150 Political Tenets 

fate of the dialectic reveals the historical substance of So- 
viet society: it is not the negation of capitalism, but it par- 
takes, in a decisive aspect, of the function of capitalism, 
namely, in the industrial development of the productive 
forces under separation of the control of production from 
the "immediate producers." Soviet theory here expresses 
what the ideology denies: that the Bolshevik Revolution 
did "not yet" entail a socialist revolution, that the "first 
phase" is not yet socialism. But while Soviet society thus 
partakes of the function of capitalism, it does so on an eco- 
nomic foundation — total nationalization — which makes for 
an essentially different developmental tendency beyond 
the present framework, in a direction which we shall sub- 
sequently try to identify. Now, we shall briefly illustrate 
the petrification of the dialectic and the points at which 
the future trend seems to become manifest. 

The exposition of the dialectic in the representative text- 
books is focussed on the determinist character of the dialec- 
tical process. For example, in Rozental's Marksistskii 
Dialekticheskii Metod (Marxist Dialectical Method), the 
capitalist development, the transition to socialism, and the 
subsequent development of Soviet society through its vari- 
ous phases is presented as the unfolding of a system of 
objective forces that could not have unfolded otherwise. 
To be sure, strong and constant emphasis is placed on the 
guiding role of the Communist Party and its leaders, and 
on the patriotic heroism of the Soviet people, but their 
action and its success was made possible only by their un- 
derstanding of and obedience to the inexorable laws of 
dialectic. The subjective factor no longer appears as an in- 



Dialectic and Its Vicissitudes 151 

tegral element and stage of the objective dialectic, but 
rather as the mere vessel, recipient, or executor of the lat- 
ter. This notion has remained obligatory during and after 
the Stalinist era. The Party and the Party leadership are 
the sole authority for the interpretation of dialectic — but 
this independence is qualified: the leaders themselves are 
subject to the objective laws which they interpret and im- 
plement. 

The particular role of ideology in socialist society is determined 
by the nature of the development of this society, which differs es- 
sentially from the nature of the development of previous [social] 
formations. Under socialism, too, the lav^s of the social develop- 
ment are objective ones, operating independently from the con- 
sciousness and will of human beings, but under socialism, the party, 
the state, and society as a whole have the opportunity, unknown 
in past history, of comprehending these laws, consciously apply- 
ing them in their activities, and, by this very token, accelerating 
the course of societal development.^^ 

The Soviet Marxist interpretation of the relation between 
the subjective and objective factor transforms the dialec- 
tical process into a mechanistic one. This becomes particu- 
larly clear in the discussion of the relation between neces- 
sity and freedom. It is the key problem in the Hegelian as 
well as the Marxian dialectic, and we have seen that it is 
also a key problem in the idea of socialism itself. Soviet 
Marxism defines freedom as "recognized necessity." ^"^ 

"M. T. lovchuk, "Rol' sotsialisticheskoi ideologii v bor'be s perezhitkami 
kapitalizma" (The Role of Socialist Ideology in the Struggle with Survivals 
of Capitalism), Voprosy Filosofii (Problems of Philosophy), 1955, No. 1, 
p. 4 (italics added). Emphasis on the subordination of the Soviet state to 
the objective laws of the historical process is one of the essential points in 
Stalin's last article; see above, p. 121. 

"For example, M. D. Kammari, "0 novom vydaiushchemsia vklade I. V. 



152 Political Tenets 

The formula follows Engels's restatement of Hegel's defi- 
nition according to which freedom is "insight into neces- 
sity." ^'^ But for Hegel, freedom is not merely "insight" 
into necessity, but is comprehended (begriffene) necessity, 
which implies a change in the actual conditions. Mere "in- 
sight" can never change necessity into freedom; Hegel's 
"comprehended" necessity is "not merely the freedom of 
abstract negation, but rather concrete and positive freedom" 
— only thus is it the "truth" of necessity. The transition 
from necessity to freedom is that into a fundamentally 
different dimension of "being," and Hegel calls it the 
"hardest" of all dialectical transitions.^^ 

Soviet Marxism minimizes this transition and assimi- 
lates freedom to necessity — in ideology as well as in real- 
ity. This assimilation is expressed in the Soviet Marxist 
interpretation of dialectical change, that is, of the develop- 
ment from one stage of class society to another. In Marx- 
ian theory, this development is (a) catastrophic (the un- 
folding contradictions of class society can be resolved only 
by explosion), and (6) as catastrophic development it is 
progressive (the stage initiated by the revolution is a 
higher stage of civilization). However, both these elements 
are themselves subjective as well as objective factors. The 
"explosion" is not automatic but presupposes the action 
and the consciousness of the revolutionaiy class; and 



Stalina v marksistsko-leninskuiu filosofiiu" (On the Distinguished New Con- 
tribution by J. V. Stalin to Marxist-Leninist Philosophy), Voprosy Filosofii 
(Problems of Philosophy), 1952, No. 6, p. 32. 

" "Anti-Diihring," in Handbook of Marxism, pp. 255 f. 

'^ Encyclopddie der philosophischen Wissenschaften im Grundrisse, I, par. 
158 and 159; Science of Logic, Book II, Sect. 3, Chap. 3, C. 



Dialectic and Its Vicissitudes 153 

"progress" denotes only the development of the productive 
forces and continues to involve exploitation and enslave- 
ment until the proletariat has become the historical agent. ^^ 
Into this conception, Soviet Marxism introduces the 
distinction between antagonistic and nonantagonistic con- 
tradictions ("conflicts" and "contradictions") : ^' the for- 
mer irreconcilable and "soluble" only through a catastro- 
phic explosion; the latter subject to gradual solution 
through political control; the former characteristic of class 
society, the latter characteristic of socialist society. Soviet 
Marxism claims that the change from the explosive to the 
gradual dialectical transition has been rendered possible 
in the USSR with the establishment of the Soviet state. In 
line with this conception, and following Stalin's example 
of 1938, the "law of the negation of the negation" disap- 
peared from the list of the fundamental dialectical laws. 
Quite obviously, the Soviet Marxist conception of dialectic 
is most suitable to serve the ideological stabilization of the 
established state: it assigns to the state the historical task 
of solving the "nonantagonistic contradictions" and pre- 

^^ See for example, Marx to Ruge, September, 1843, in "Deutsch-Franzo- 
sische Jahrbiicher I," in Marx and Engels, Historisch-Kritlsche Gesamtaus- 
gabe, ed. by D. Rjazonov (Frankfurt, Marx-Engels Archiv Verlagsgesell- 
schaft, 1927), Div. I, I, Pt. 1, 575; and Marx and Engels, The German 
Ideology (New York, International Publishers, 1939), p. 7. 

"See for example M. M. Rozental, Markslstskii dialekticheshii metod 
(Marxist Dialectical Method) (Moscow, Gospolitizdat, 1951), passim; S. P. 
Dudel, "K voprosy o edinstve i bor'be protivepolonovsti : kak vnutrennem 
soderzhanii protsessa razvitia" (On the question of the Unity and Struggle 
of Opposites as the Content of the Process of Development), in Voprosy 
Dialekticheskogo M aterializma (Questions of Dialectical Materialism) (Mos- 
cow, Akademia Nauk SSSR, 1951) pp. 73 ff. The Soviet Marxist doctrine of 
dialectical contradictions look final shape after Zhdanov's speech against 
G. F. Aleksandrov, June 1947, printed in BoVshevik (Bolshevik), 1947, No. 
16 (August 30) pp. 7-23. 



154 Political Tenets 

eludes theoretically the necessity of another revolution on 
the way to communism. It should be noted, however, that 
the Soviet Marxist revision is theoretically consistent with 
the Marxian conception. According to Marx, the "cata- 
strophic" character of the transition from quantity to qual- 
ity belongs to the realm of blindly operating, uncontrolled 
socio-economic forces; with the establishment of socialism, 
these forces come under the rational control of society as 
a whole, which self-consciously regulates its struggle with 
nature and with its own contradictions. Moreover, the 
change in the mode of transition from one stage to another 
is already stipulated in Hegel's system: once the level of 
free and self-conscious rationality has been reached 
("being-in-and-for-itself"), such rationality also governs 
the further transitions at this level. Similarly, Marx ap- 
plied the notion of the "negation of the negation" specifi- 
cally to the capitalist development. It is tlie "capitalist 
production" which, with the necessity of a "law of nature" 
engenders its own negation: socialism is this "negation of 
the negation." ^* The dialectical method does not stipulate 
the schematic repetition of this concept, and Hegel warns 
explicitly against the formalistic interpretation and appli- 
cation of the "triad." ^^ The Soviet Marxist "revision" is 
"orthodox." Since Soviet Marxists maintain that Soviet 
society is a socialist society, they consistently invest it with 
the corresponding dialectical characteristics. What is in- 
volved is not so much a revision of dialectic as the claim of 
socialism for a nonsocialist society. Dialectic itself is used 
for substantiating this claim. 

" Capital, I, Chap. 24. " Science of Logic, Book III, Sect. 3, Chap. 3. 



Dialectic and Its Vicissitudes 155 

All this seems to confirm that the Soviet Marxist treat- 
ment of dialectic merely serves to protect and justify the 
established regime by eliminating or minimizing all those 
elements of dialectic which would indicate progress of the 
socio-historical development beyond this regime, that is, 
toward a qualitatively different higher stage of socialism. 
In other words, Soviet Marxism would represent the "ar- 
resting" of dialectic in the interest of the prevailing state 
of affairs — the ideology would follow the arresting of so- 
cialism in reality. 

However, the situation is more complicated. We have 
noted at the beginning that Soviet ideology and reality are 
subject to a dynamic which the regime cannot arrest with- 
out undermining its own foundations. We have suggested 
that the international development tends to force the Soviet 
regime to direct its efforts toward the "second phase" of 
socialism — a trend which would also tend to alter the 
"superstructure." In line with the assimilation of ideology 
to reality, the trend would not only be noticeable but per- 
haps even anticipated in ideology. Recent developments 
in the Soviet Marxist treatment of dialectic seem to cor- 
roborate this assumption. Even during the last period of 
Stalinism, it appeared that ideological preparations were 
being made for rendering the regime more flexible, for 
"normalizing" it and for orienting Soviet society toward 
a long period of economic as well as political "coexist- 
ence" — a period required for the further internal growth 
of the Soviet system. The Soviet Marxist discussion of dia- 
lectic seems designed to adjust the ideology to the new 
period. 



156 Political Tenets 

We have mentioned Stalin's reiterated emphasis on the 
"active" role of the superstructure in developing its base; 
this is not merely the ideological justification and stabiliza- 
tion of a prevailing form and stage of the state but also 
the ideological commitment of the state to introduce 
changes in conformity with the growth of the productive 
forces. As such, Stalin's statement of 1950 pointed toward 
his "Economic Problems of Socialism" ^'^ of 1952, with 
the stress on the contradictions between productive forces 
and production relations in the USSR, to be solved "gradu- 
ally" under the guidance of the state. Similarly, the dis- 
cussion of logic and dialectic in 1950-1951 seems not so 
much an ideological defence of the status quo against po- 
tential change, a protection from historical progress, as 
a preparation for intended changes. The discussion of the 
relation between formal and dialectical logic was linked 
throughout with Stalin's pronouncements in "Marxism and 
Linguistic Problems." ^^ There Stalin had pointed out that 
it is "un-Marxist" and incorrect to talk of the "class con- 
ditioning" of language and to envisage a specifically "so- 
cialist language." He had maintained that language "dif- 
fers in principle from a superstructure" in that it does not 
change with the base but outlives this or that base; it is 
created by and "serves," not certain classes, but society 
as a whole over the course of centuries. By the same token, 
Soviet Marxism declared, it is incorrect to treat for- 
mal logic as "class conditioned" and to envisage a specific 

^ In Current Soviet Policies, ed. by Leo Gruliow (New York, F. A. Praeger, 
1953), pp. 1-20. 

^ See Stalin, Marksizm i voprosy iazykoznaniia (Marxism and Linguistic 
Problems) (Moscow, Gospolitizdat, 1950). 



Dialectic and Its Vicissitudes 157 

"Soviet logic" corresponding to the new basis of Soviet 
society.^^ The report on the results of the discussion on 
logic sums up: 

The logical forms and laws of thought are no superstructure over 
and above the base. . . . Formal logic is the science of the ele- 
mentary laws and forms of correct thinking. . . . There are not 
two logics: an old metaphysical, and a new, dialectical logic. . . . 
There is only one formal logic, which is universally valid. -^ 

Dialectical logic does not deny, cancel, or contradict the 
validity of formal logic; the former belongs to a different 
dimension of knowledge and is related to the latter as 
higher to elementary mathematics. 

We are not concerned here with the course and conclu- 
sions of the discussion."^ Significantly, the changing trend 
announces itself in a return to Marxian orthodoxy after 
the leftist "Marrist deviations." In terms of Marxian the- 
ory, neither language nor logic as such belong to the super- 
structure; they belong rather to the preconditions of the 
basic societal relationships themselves: as instruments of 
communication and knowledge, they are indispensable for 
establishing and sustaining these relationships. Only cer- 
tain manifestations of language and thought are super- 
structure, as for example, in art, philosophy, religion. Fol- 
lowing the Marxian conception, the Soviet discussion dis- 

**V. I. Cherkesov, "0 logike i marksistskoi dialektike" (On Logic and 
Marxist Dialectic), Voprosy Filosofii (Problems of Philosophy), 1950, No. 
2, p. 211. 

'^Voprosy Filosofii (Problems of Philosophy), 1951, No. 6, pp. 145, 146. 

^They are summarized, in ibid., pp. 143-49, and in Gustav Wetter, Der 
Dialektische Materialismus (Freiburg. Herder, 1952), pp. 544 ff. For the post- 
Stalin development see George L. Kline, "Recent Soviet Philosophy," in 
American Academy of Political Science, Annals, CCCIII (January, 1956), 
126-38. 



158 Political Tenets 

tinguished between logic itself and the sciences of logic. As 
a specific interpretation of logic, some of the latter must 
be classified as ideological.^^ Neither the Hegelian nor the 
Marxian dialectic denied the validity of formal logic; 
rather they preserved and validated its truth by unfolding 
its content in the dialectical conception which reveals the 
necessary abstractness of "common" as well as "scientific" 
sense. 

Compared with this tradition of dialectic, "Marrist" ^^ 
linguistic and logic (which stressed to the extreme the class 
character of both) must indeed appear as a gross "leftist 
deviation," as an "infantile disease" of communism in its 
age of immaturity. It seemed to be an ideological by- 
product of the first phase of the Stalinist construction of 
socialism in one country. The violent struggle to overcome 
the technological and industrial backwardness of the coun- 
try, imposed by terror upon a largely passive and even 
hostile population, found its ideological compensation in 
the various doctrines of the uniqueness and superiority of 
Soviet man, deriving from his "possession" of Marxism 
as the only true and progressive "world outlook." But 
Marxian tlieory is in its very substance international. 
Within its framework, nationalism is progressive only as 
a stage in the historical process — a stage which, according 
to Marx and Engels, had already been surpassed by the 
advanced Western world. Soviet Marxism has never suc- 

^I. I. Osmakov, "0 zakone myshleniia i o nauke logiki" (On the Law of 
Thinking and on the Science of Logic), Voprosy Filosofii (Problems of 
Philosophy), 1950, No. 3, pp. 318 ff. 

^ Only the Stalinist evaluation of Marr's doctrines is here discussed, not 
the doctrines themselves. 



Dialectic and Its Vicissitudes 159 

ceeded in reconciling the contradiction between its own 
nationalism and Marxian internationalism — either in its 
strategy or in its ideology, as is demonstrated by the pain- 
ful distinctions between "bourgeois cosmopolitanism" and 
genuine internationalism, between chauvinism and "So- 
viet patriotism." Moreover, the emphasis on a special So- 
viet mentality, logic, linguistic, and so forth, was bound 
to impair the appeal to international solidarity in the ulti- 
mate revolutionary objective as well as the appeal for 
peaceful coexistence, which the doctrine of socialism or 
communism in one country could not discard altogether. 
The "Marrist" theories may have fulfilled a useful func- 
tion in the "magical" utilization of Marxian theory, but 
with the technological and industrial progress of Soviet 
society, with the growing political and strategic power of 
the Soviet state, they came into conflict with more funda- 
mental objectives. As Soviet policy began to be oriented 
to the transition to the "second phase," the Marrist doc- 
trines had to give way to more universalist, "normal," and 
internationalist conceptions. Far from signifying the "ar- 
rest" of dialectic in the interest of the stabilization of the 
attained level of development, the reiteration of the com- 
mon human function and content of language and logic 
seems to be aimed at bringing the ideology in line with the 
drive toward the "next higher stage" of the development, 
that is, the second phase of socialism, and with the policy 
of "normalizing" East-West relations involved in this 
transition. 



8. The Transition from Socialism to Communism 



THE ENTIRE Soviet Marxist interpretation of dialectic is, 
as all ideological efforts since the last period of Stalinism 
are, focused on the transition from socialism to commu- 
nism (or from the first to the second phase of communist 
society — the two formulations are used interchangeably). 
The idea of this transition has been an essential element of 
Soviet Marxism ever since the consolidation of the Soviet 
state after the first Five- Year Plan. As early as 1935, in 
his speech to the First AU-Union Conference of Stakhano- 
vites, Stalin hailed the Stakhanov movement as "preparing 
the conditions for the transition from Socialism to Com- 
munism," "the first beginnings — still feeble, it is true, but 
nevertheless the beginnings" of that "rise in the cultural 
and technical level of the workingclass of our country" 
which is the prerequisite for the "second phase." ^ But 
while the idea of this transition (without which Soviet 
Marxism could not even claim to be Marxism) has ac- 
companied the construction of socialism in one country 
from the beginning, the transition is now presented as be- 
ing in process, as the next objective of Soviet domestic pol- 
icy. This is the gist of Stalin's last publication "Economic 

^Leninism (New York, International Publishers, 1942), pp. 367 and 369. 



Transition from Socialism to Communism 161 

Problems of Socialism in the USSR," which was then ap- 
praised by Soviet Marxism as the first authoritative Marx- 
ist theory of the concrete forms of this transition. The arti- 
cle retains its significance in spite of the critique to which 
it was subjected at the Twentieth Congress. 

Implied is a "normal" development, that is, no war with 
the West. In accord with this presupposition, Stalin insisted 
on the precedence of interimperialist conflicts over the 
conflict between the capitalist and the socialist orbit. A 
whole section is devoted to the affirmation of the "inevita- 
bility" of wars among capitalist countries.^ Apparently 
for the first time, Stalin cited publicly a Soviet Marxist 
analysis (referred to as that of "some comrades") of con- 
temporary capitalism, which holds that the intercontinen- 
tal integration of capitalism after the Second World War 
is not merely an extraneous political constellation, but is 
founded on a basis which makes wars among the capitalist 
countries no longer inevitable. This notion, which amounts 
to a denial of the Marxist-Leninist theory of imperialism, 
is cited only to be rejected. In his rejection, Stalin insisted 
on the reactivation of the economic conflicts between the 
United States on the one side, and the "subservient" capi- 
talist countries on the other (Britain and France primarily; 
but also Germany and Japan). On the other hand, war be- 
tween the imperialist and the Soviet camp is not inevitable. 

The modification of the thesis on the "inevitability of 
war" is highly ambiguous. First of all, in traditional Marx- 
ist usage, it refers primarily to wars among capitalist 

' "Economic Problems of Socialism in the USSR," in Current Soviet Poli- 
cies, ed. by Leo Gruliow (New York, F. A. Praeger, 1953), pp. 7 f . For the 
following discussion see above, pp. 66 ff. 



162 Political Tenets 

countries. As such, the thesis is in the center of the doc- 
trine of imperialism. Conversely, the "correction" of the 
thesis refers primarily to wars between the imperialist 
and the Soviet camps: the war that is no longer inevitable 
is this East- West war. Once this ambiguity is cleared up, 
there appears to be a strange consistency in the Stalinist 
and post-Stalinist conception. The statements on the sharp- 
ening of the intracapitalist contradictions made at the 
Twentieth Congress ^ are substantively (and sometimes 
even literally) in line with the Stalinist formulas! The con- 
sistency is explained by the main point at which post- 
Stalinist policy continues and strengthens late Stalinist 
policy, namely, by the reliance on "normal" capitalist de- 
velopment, stabilization of East-West relations, internal 
growth of Soviet society, and economic-political competi- 
tion. The war whose evitability is now so strongly empha- 
sized is first of all the war between capitalist and socialist 
countries. It can be prevented by virtue of the increased 
power of the socialist camp and the latter's impact upon 
the "peace-loving" populations in the capitalist countries. 
However, these very same factors in turn would tend to 
counteract war in general — therefore, even war between 
capitalist countries would seem no longer "inevitable." 

The shift in the Soviet Marxist position on the inevita- 
bility of war thus seems thoroughly consistent. As com- 
pared with the period when Lenin asserted the inevitability 

'See the statements by Mikoyan and Khrushchev at the Twentieth Party 
Congress, in XX S"ezd Kommunisticheskoi Partii Sovetskogo Soiuza; Steno- 
graficheskii otchet (The Twentieth Congress of the Communist Party of the 
Soviet Union; Stenographic Account) (2 vols.; Moscow, Gospolitizdat, 
1956),!. 14-20.319-21. 



Transition from Socialism to Communism 163 

of imperialist wars, the internal and international situa- 
tions have changed fundamentally, and a "balance of 
power" has been established (i.e., the strength of the 
Soviet camp), which serves as a deterrent against an East- 
West war. But this same deterring force has also reduced 
the possibility of military conflicts within the imperialist 
camp (from which the Soviet camp would emerge as bene- 
ficiary), while aggravating the economic and political 
difficulties in the capitalist world. 

We have seen that this thesis on the aggravating capi- 
talist contradictions belongs to the hard core of Soviet 
Marxism. However, the context in which Stalin repeated it 
in his last article gave it a special significance. The propo- 
sition introduces the discussion of the transition from so- 
cialism to communism as the next phase in the development 
of Soviet society. In this context, the proposition serves to 
reiterate the priority of domestic over foreign policy. In 
the first representative article on Soviet foreign policy 
after Stalin's death, Kommunist recalled that, according 
to Marxism-Leninism, "the foreign policy of any state is a 
continuation of its domestic policy and is governed by 
it." ^ For the USSR, this "normal" Marxist-Leninist con- 
stellation was interrupted by the Second World War, the 
subsequent strategic adjustments, and the period of restora- 
tion. The Nineteenth Party Congress seems to herald the 
return to the normal supremacy of domestic policy and to 
initiate its new phase. We have stressed that the discussion 
of Stalin's article in Voprosy Ekonomiki (Problems of 

* 1953, No. 7, translated in Current Digest of the Soviet Press, V, No. 20 
(June 27, 1953), 3. 



164 Political Tenets 

Economics) explicitly states that "in actuality," the inter- 
imperialist conflicts supersede the conflict between the im- 
perialist and the Soviet camp.^ This portion of Stalin's 
article has remained mandatory for the party line: the con- 
flicts among the imperialist powers and within the im- 
perialist countries make for a "peaceful" internal reduc- 
tion of capitalist strength. 

The aggressive foreign policy of the USA sharpens the contradic- 
tions in the very camp of imperialism. . . . Soviet foreign policy 
. . . cannot refuse to take into account both the presence of con- 
siderable contradictions between individual capitalist countries 
and the presence of contradictions within these countries and even 
within individual parties adhering to capitalist classes and groups. 
It is our task to utilize these contradictions for the sake of preserv- 
ing and solidifying peace and weakening the aggressive, anti- 
democratic forces.^ 

The imperialist policy of strength is now opposed — so the 
argument runs — not only by the broad masses of the peo- 
ple but also by a part of the "well-to-do classes." ' While 
one should not underestimate the danger that a small 
"handful of exploiters" may unleash war out of sheer 
desperation, "it would be a still greater mistake to over- 
estimate imperialism's forces." ^ 

While the reevaluation of the interimperialist situation 
suggests a new trend in foreign policy, the discussion of 

^ See above, p. 65. 

" "Za uprochenie mira mezhdu narodami" (For the Consolidation of 
Peace Between Peoples), Kommunist (Communist), 1955, No. 4 (March), 
p. 12. 

^ "Sud'by mira i tsivilizatsii reshaiut narody" (The Peoples Decide the 
Fates of Peace and of Civilization), Kommunist (Communist), 1955, No. 4 
(March), p. 12. 

Ubid., p. 18. 



Transition from Socialism to Communism 165 

the economic problems of socialism indicates the internal 
basis (and perhaps also the reason) for this trend. The re- 
orientation in foreign policy seems to have been necessi- 
tated by a domestic reorientation. The attainment of the 
international objectives — chiefly the weakening of West- 
ern society from within — ultimately depends on the attain- 
ment of a higher level of Soviet society (in Marxist lan- 
guage, the second stage of socialism).^ Stalin's political 
testament reformulated Lenin's in terms of this transition: 
it stipulated the need for a new prolonged "respite" as the 
prerequisite for the further development of Soviet society. 

In the "Economic Problems of Socialism," Stalin's 
proposition on the inevitability of interimperialist conflicts 
is followed by his definition of the "basic economic law of 
present-day capitalism," that is, the "need to obtain maxi- 
mum profit." Stalin contrasts this "law" with the "law of 
the average profit norm" that was valid for the preceding 
stages of the capitalist development. Marxist interpreters 
of this passage have been troubled by the question of 
orthodoxy involved here: in Marxian terms, the need for 
maximum profit is inherent in the capitalist mode of pro- 
duction itself and cannot be contrasted with the "law of 
the average profit norm" because either it is subject to 
the latter law or it remains an exception — pertaining only 
to "privileged" groups of enterprises. Soviet commentators 
have disregarded this difficulty and taken Stalin's formula- 
tion as a cue for redefining the situation of present-day 
capitalism. 

The notion of the "second phase" of the general crisis 

' See above, pp. 76 f . 



166 Political Tenets 

of capitalism,^" as formulated by this redefinition, serves 
as the contrasting background for the transition to the "sec- 
ond phase" of socialism. The crisis provides the favor- 
able international environment for concentrating domestic 
Soviet policy on this transition. In its discussion, there is 
a striking emphasis on the need for changes within the So- 
viet system — changes which are to transform the system 
itself into the "higher" second phase. A large part of Sta- 
lin's article is devoted to the refutation of the statements of 
those who maintain that under socialism (that is to say, 
in the present Soviet system) the correspondence between 
productive forces and production relations is such as to 
exclude contradictions. Against this view, Stalin maintains 
that there is no "full conformity" between the elements of 
the economic basis. The productive forces "run ahead" of 
the production relations also under socialism — this, ac- 
cording to Stalin, is the matrix of progress — and the pro- 
duction relations are bound to turn into a fetter of social 
development. However, while under conditions of private 
appropriation and control these contradictions must lead 
to a conflict which can be resolved only through an "ex- 
plosion," under socialism, society is able to bring the lag- 
ging production relations into conformity with the charac- 
ter of the productive forces in good time and without 
"exploding" the social order. At a certain stage of the de- 
velopment, the growth of productivity will render possible 
a "distribution of labor among the branches of production 
. . . regulated not by the law of value . . . but by the 
growth of society's need for goods." ^^ This is the basic fea- 

^° See above, pp. 58 f. 

" "Economic Problems of Socialism," in Current Soviet Policies, p. 5. The 
contradictions existing in socialist society are again emphasized in Khrush- 



Transition from Socialism to Communism 167 

ture of the "second phase of socialism" ("communism"). 
Stalin refers to Engels: "Socially planned regulation of pro- 
duction in accordance with the needs both of society as a 
whole and of each individual." ^^ The underscored words 
in the Engels quotation (which did not occur in Stalin's 
own formulation above) are decisive: they preclude the 
authoritarian identification of society's need for goods with 
the needs of all its individual members. According to Marx 
and Engels, communism prevails only if and when society's 
needs are really the individual needs, and when their de- 
velopment and satisfaction determines the social division 
of labor. But nothing in Stalin's own characterization of the 
second phase suggests the abandonment of the administra- 
tive authoritarian identification of society's needs with 
those of its members. According to his conception, since the 
growth of the productive forces is no longer coimteracted 
by antagonistic private interests, the adjustment of produc- 
tion relations to this growth can be undertaken by the "di- 
recting agencies" of the Soviet state." The transition from 
socialism to communism is their work; "communism" will 
be introduced as an administrative measure. 

As to the timing in terms of years, Soviet theoreticians 
still take as the basis the figure of three five-year plans, 
given by Stalin in his speech of February 9, 1946. Con- 
sidering the adjustments that were made recently, this 
would locate the transition to the second phase between 
1960 and 1965 at the latest.^^ More important is the timing 

chev's speech of November 6, 1957 (as broadcast by Moscow Home Service, 
p. A-23). 

" "Anti-Diihring," in A Handbook of Maxrism, ed. by E. Burns (New 
York, International Publishers, 1935), p. 294. Italics added. 

""Economic Problems of Socialism," in Current Soviet Policies, p. 15. 

"Ts. A. Stepanian, "Usloviia i puti perekhoda ot sotsializma k kommu- 



168 Political Tenets 

in terms of objective conditions. Stalin listed three "basic 
preliminary conditions": (1) Constant growth of all social 
production, with preponderant growth of the means of pro- 
duction," (2) the "raising of collective farm property to 
the level of property of the public as a whole," (3) "a cul- 
tural development of society as would ensure to all its 
members comprehensive development of their physical and 
mental abilities." ^^ Stalin emphasized as the first necessary 
step for the attainment of the last condition the reduction 
of the working day "at least to six and then to five hours." 
As basic measures of economic policy during this period he 
considered the raising of real wages by at least 100 percent 
(through both an increase in money wages and a systematic 
reduction in prices of the goods of mass consumption),^^ 
and a gradual extension of the system of "product ex- 
change" at the expense of the sphere of "commodity turn- 
over" (especially by including the surplus collective-farm 
production in the sphere of product exchange) .^^ 

This outline of the transition to the second phase reiter- 
ates the traditional Marxist conception, derived chiefly 
from Engels's remarks in the third part of Anti-Diihring. 
But within the context of Stalin's statement, the standard 
propositions obtained the weight of a policy directive and 
were as such accepted by Stalin's anti-Stalinist successors. 

The first fact to be noted is that the present post-Stalinist 



nizmu" (The Conditions and the Paths of the Transition from Socialism to 
Communism), in O sovetskom sotsialisticheskom obshchestve (On Soviet 
Socialist Society), ed. by F. Konstantinov (Moscow, Gospolitizdat, 1948), 
pp. 540-42. 

^^ Stalin, "Economic Problems of Socialism," in Current Soviet Policies, 
pp. 14 f. 

^"Ibid., p. 14. ^'Ibid., p. 19. 



Transition from Socialism to Communism 169 

and anti-Stalinist trend continues the main line of late Sta- 
linist policy with respect to the problems of "transition." 
We have tried to show this in the case of the evaluation of 
capitalist development/^ The same holds true with regard 
to the principal objectives of Soviet policy. The resolution 
adopted by the Twentieth Congress reasserts "the main 
economic task," namely, "to catch up with and to outstrip 
the most developed capitalist countries in production per 
capita." For the attainment of the goals, the Resolution re- 
asserts the priority of heavy industry, together with a need 
for "rapid development" in the production of consumer 
goods. Like Stalin, Khrushchev rejected "utopian views" of 
the transition. Following Stalin's statement of the "basic 
preliminary conditions" for progress, the Resolution pro- 
vides for the reduction of the working day in the course of 
the Sixth Five-Year Plan to seven hours for all workers and 
to six hours for those in the coal- and ore-mining industries. 
The same consistency prevails in the emphasis on techno- 
logical education, the training of "specialists," and tlie 
"ties of the country's scientific establishments with produc- 
tion." '' 

The continuity between Stalinism and post-Stalinism 
might still be that of basic propaganda requirements, were 
it not for the possibility that it may reflect a dynamic in- 
herent in the Soviet social system itself. 

We have proposed that the Soviet construction of social- 
ism, while progressing, develops a dialectic of its own. On 
the one hand, the totalitarian administration strengthens 

^'^ See above, pp. 65 ff. 

^^ XX S"ezd Kommunisticheskoi Partii Sovetskogo Soiuza (The Twentieth 
Congress of the Communist Party of the Soviet Union), II, 434, 475, 480. 



170 Political Tenets 

itself and the very forces against which it acts (thereby 
creating a stronger consolidation of Western society) ; in 
doing so, it perpetuates the repressive economic and politi- 
cal features of the Soviet system. On the other hand, the 
administration depends, for the attainment of its main ob- 
jective ("to catch up with and outstrip") on the all-out 
development of the productive forces at its disposal. This 
development — under the impact of an international compe- 
tition which Soviet Marxism regards as a struggle for sur- 
vival — drives the growing productivity, with the most 
streamlined weapons of modem technology and science, 
toward a level at which it will tend to "overflow" into pro- 
duction for individual needs. Given conditions under which 
the growing production can be sustained at full capacity, 
and under which this capacity is not to an increasing degree 
utilized for wasteful and destructive purposes, production 
is likely to generate the material and cultural wealth that 
would permit the stipulated features of the second phase. 
(They are modest enough.) This seems to be the case even 
if in their development the productive forces also sustain a 
large and greatly privileged bureaucracy. Productivity 
may be expected to run ahead of privileges and effectuate 
a gradual but qualitative change in the circumstances of 
the underprivileged population and, correspondingly, in 
the political institutions — as it did at preceding stages of 
an expanding civilization. 

The totalitarian administration has, of course, sufficient 
power to counteract this trend, and it must be expected to 
do so if the administration operates under an interest an- 
tagonistic to the growth of productivity and its use for the 



Transition from Socialism to Communism 171 

satisfaction of individual needs, or if it considers counter- 
action necessary for the existence of the Soviet state. We 
have tried to show ^" that the first condition does not pre- 
vail. The "class interest" of the bureaucracy (that is, the 
common denominator of the special interests of the various 
branches of the bureaucracy) is linked to the intensified 
development of the productive forces, and administrative 
progress into a "higher stage of socialism" would most 
effectively secure the cohesion of Soviet society. On the 
other hand, the Soviet state has consistently diverted a very 
large sector of the productive forces (human and mate- 
rial) to the business of external and internal militariza- 
tion. Does this policy forestall the transition to the "second 
phase"? The compatibility of an armament economy with 
a rising standard of living is more than a technical eco- 
nomic problem. The maintenance of a vast military es- 
tablishment (armed forces and secret police) with its 
educational, political and psychological controls perpetu- 
ates authoritarian institutions, attitudes, and behavior pat- 
terns which counteract a qualitative change in the repres- 
sive production relations. Inasmuch as the bureaucracy is a 
separate class with special privileges and powers, it has an 
interest in self-perpetuation and, consequently, in perpetu- 
ating repressive production (and political) relations. How- 
ever, the question is whether the repressive economic and 
political relations on which this bureaucracy was founded 
are not increasingly contradicting the more fundamental 
and general interests and objectives in the development of 
the Soviet state. 

* Pages 116 ff. above. 



172 Political Tenets 

If our analysis of Soviet Marxism is correct, the answer 
must be affirmative. The fundamental Soviet objective in 
the present period is the breaking of the consolidation of 
the Western world which neutralizes the "interimperialist 
conflicts" on whose eff^ectiveness the final victory of social- 
ism depends. The same forces which make for and preserve 
this consolidation also endanger and delay the attainment 
of the goal "to catch up with and surpass" the capabilities 
of advanced capitalism. In the Soviet Marxist analysis, 
Western consolidation is based on a "permanent war econ- 
omy," which, taking advantage of the head start of capital- 
ism, sustains the rapid development of productivity in the 
capitalist countries and the integration of the majority of or- 
ganized labor within the capitalist system. Thus it continues 
to delay the revolution in the capitalist world which even 
Stalin considered as ultimately indispensable for the tri- 
umph of socialism.^^ The capitalist war economy is in turn 
sustained by the "hard" Soviet policy, which also stands in 
the way of Soviet progress to the second phase where it 
can effectively compete with capitalist capabilities. Conse- 
quently, the first step must be the relaxation of the "hard" 
policy. This, however, is a matter of internal as well as 
foreign reorientation, of shifting the emphasis from mili- 
tary and political to more effective economic competition, 
and of liberalizing the Stalinist bureaucracy. The shift 
presupposes a high level of industrialization. Soviet suc- 
cess in the utilization of atomic energy may have been one 
of the significant events which has convinced the Soviet 

^ Soviet Marxism considers the socioeconomic rather than the military po- 
tentialities of the international constellation: the internal strength of Western 
society, most conspicuously expressed in the higher standard of living and in 
"class collaboration" is, in Marxian terms, a greater long-range threat to the 
"final victory of socialism" than is Western military power. 



Transition from Socialism to Communism 173 

leadership that the adequate competitive level of industri- 
alization has been reached. 

We believe that these factors are behind recent Soviet 
developments. If this is the case, the shift is part of a long- 
range trend, originating in an objective historical situation 
and pertaining to the very structure of Soviet society. The 
objective historical situation (i.e., the interrelation be- 
tween Stalinist power politics and capitalist consolidation) 
drove the Soviet state to a reconsideration of its basic strat- 
egy, a "relaxation" which, if successful, tends toward an 
increasing use of the growing productivity for consumers' 
needs. The basic economic trend would generate a corre- 
sponding political trend, that is, liberalization of the re- 
pressive totalitarian regime. 

In Soviet policy toward the Western world, evidence for 
the new trend had been cumulative from the end of the 
Korean war to the upheavals in Eastern Europe in 1956. 
Corresponding developments had also taken place in inter- 
communist relations: the Soviet- Yugoslav rapprochement; 
the commitment of the Indian and the Japanese parties to 
a "legal-democratic" program; continuation (and even 
intensification) of the "soft" strategy of the Western Com- 
munist parties, especially of the united front policy — de- 
Stalinization. It was this de-Stalinization which stimulated 
the events in Poland and Hungary. The Soviet leadership 
reacted in accordance with the underlying policy concep- 
tion. Soviet Marxism has never acknowledged a genuine 
third alternative to socialism or capitalism, and the former 
is defined, for the period of coexistence, in terms of a firm 
alliance with the Soviet Union. A break in the "protective 
belt" of Eastern European states is, in the Soviet interpre- 



174 Political Tenets 

tation, therefore tantamount to an ascent of capitalist influ- 
ence and to a change of the international balance of power 
at a vital point in favor of the capitalist world. Moreover, 
while the liberalization in the Soviet Union rested on a firm 
basis of industrialization and collectivization, this was not 
the case in the Eastern European countries. Industrializa- 
tion was still at a very backward stage, and the peasantry 
was not yet effectively coordinated with the nationalized 
economy and its political institutions. The movement to- 
ward "national communism" was therefore considered as 
objectively premature and antisocialist regardless of the 
sincere subjective intentions of the national leadership and 
their followers among the working classes and the intelli- 
gentsia. 

The Eastern European events were likely to slow down 
and perhaps even reverse de-Stalinization in some fields; 
particularly in international strategy, a considerable "hard- 
ening" has become apparent. However, if our analysis is 
correct, the fundamental trend will continue and reassert it- 
self throughout such reversals. With respect to internal 
Soviet developments, this means at present continuation of 
"collective leadership," decline in the power of tlie secret 
police, decentralization, legal reforms, relaxation in cen- 
sorship, liberalization in cultural life. The relation of this 
policy to the long-range socio-economic trend may be illus- 
trated by the continued preferential development of heavy 
industry as against the development of consumers' goods 
industries. The "Malenkov line" interpreted Stalin's state- 
ment on the prevailing conflict between productive forces 
and production relations as necessitating a change in the 



Transition from Socialism to Communism 175 

relation between the two main divisions of production in 
favor of the second division, namely, that of consumers' 
goods industries ^^ — in spite of Stalin's injunction that the 
"predominant growth" of the first division must remain the 
basis of socialist planning. Although the theory of shifting 
the priority to the second division was not officially re- 
jected until January, 1955, opposition to it was already 
outspoken in 1954 under the Malenkov regime: 

There must be no place in Soviet science for discussion with vul- 
garizers and falsifiers of Marxism, Some economists ... at- 
tempted to revise one of the fundamental principles of economic 
teaching of Marxism, i.e., the thesis that enlarged reproduction, 
especially under socialism, requires preferential development of 
Subdivision I (production of means of production) as against Sub- 
division II (production of means of consumption) .^^ 
Distorting the substance of the action carried out by the party 
and the Soviet government steeply to raise agriculture and in- 
crease production of products for popular consumption, some 
economists started asserting that under socialism enlarged repro- 
duction to become effective does not necessarily require a more 
rapid development of the production of the means of production 
as compared to production of consumers' goods.-* 

Priority for the development of heavy industry is con- 
sidered essential for the transition to communism not only 

^See for example A. N. Maslin, "Printsip materiarnoi zainteresovannosti 
pri sotsializme" (The Principle of Material Interest under Socialism), 
Voprosy Filosofii (Problems of Philosophy), 1954, No. 4, pp. 3-14; 1955, 
No. 1, p. 15. 

^ M. T. lovchuk, "Rol' sotsialisticheskoi ideologii v bor'be s perezhitkami 
kapitalizma" (The Role of Socialist Ideology in the Struggle with Survivals 
of Capitalism), Voprosy Filosofii (Problems of Pliilosophy), 1955, No. 1, 
p. 15. 

''* I. Doroshev and A. Rumiantsev, "Protiv izvrashcheniia marksistskoi teorii 
vosproizvodstva" (Against the Distortion of the Marxist Theory of Reproduc- 
tion), Kommunist (Communist). 1955, No. 2 (January), p. 14. 



176 Political Tenets 

in terms of the internal growth of the social product but 
also in terms of the international implications — in other 
words, the military as well as economic position of the 
USSR must be strengthened: 

Having fulfilled the industrialization program devised by the party 
in the prewar Five- Year Plans, the Soviet people established a solid 
economic basis for an active defense of the country. A mightly 
heavy industry proved the foundation of the USSR's indestructible 
defensive power, ^° 

Under the conditions of coexistence with the capitalist 
world, the party and the government are thus committed to 
maintain the policy of preferential development of heavy 
industry for the communist as well as socialist construction 
of Soviet society. 

To be sure, behind the doctrinal controversy probably 
lies a struggle between the top bureaucracies for their 
share in power. Unquestionably, a decisive shift in produc- 
tion priority would involve a corresponding shift in polit- 
ical weight: the influence of the managerial strata in heavy 
industry would be boimd to decline. However, the political 
struggle has a more basic content; Soviet society seems to 
have reached another turning point in its development. The 
Soviet leadership itself has defined this turning point: a 
level of growth has been reached where progress no longer 
requires the alternative of either increasing heavy industry 
or the standard of living, but where the latter can be 
achieved as a result of the former. Reduced to its funda- 

'^ E. Frolov, "Tiazhelaia industriia — osnova ekonomicheskogo mogiish- 
chestva SSSR" (Heavy Industry — The Basis of the Economic Might of the 
USSR), Kommunist (Communist), 1955, No. 3 (February), pp. 29 f. See 
also the second editorial in the same number, p. 22. 



Transition from Socialism to Communism 177 

mental contention, the idea now is: not competitive prepar- 
edness for war or competitive satisfaction of popular needs, 
but both. The alternative was that of the Stalinist era; it is 
now held surpassed by the success of this era. 

On this Malenkov and his opponents seem to have 
been in agreement. When Molotov was called upon in 
October, 1955, to retract his "erroneous" statement (of 
February, 1955) that merely the "foundations" of a so- 
cialist society had been laid, and instead to confirm that a 
socialist society itself had been built, he was called upon 
to acknowledge the completion of a whole period (with 
which he himself has been identified) and the beginning 
of a new one. But it was Khrushchev who stated most suc- 
cinctly the socio-economic reasons for the superseding of 
the Stalinist alternative. In his report on the agricultural 
program, delivered in September, 1953, he said: 

The Communist Party has steadily maintained a course of overall 
development in heavy industry as essential to the successful devel- 
opment of all branches of the national economy, and it has achieved 
great success on this road. Chief attention was turned to solving 
this immediate national economic problem, and basic forces and 
means were diverted to it. Our best cadres were occupied with 
the work of industrializing the country. We did not have the means 
for high-speed, simultaneous development of heavy industry, agri- 
culture, and light industry. For this it was necessary to provide 
needed prerequisites. Now these prerequisites exist. We have a 
mighty industrial base, strengthened collective farms and cadres 
trained in all branches of economic construction.^'' 

This is the internal reason for the new trend: the Leninist 
program of "civilization" "^ has been fulfilled in the first 

^ Current Digest of the Soviet Press, V, No. 39 (November 7, 1953) , 11 f . 
" See pp. 46 f . above. 



178 Political Tenets 

phase; through the Stalinist construction, an industrial 
base has been created sufficiently strong to meet interna- 
tional "emergencies" and to raise the consumption level in 
the USSR. What could not have been done "simultane- 
ously" before can now be undertaken: the "forced develop- 
ment" of heavy industiy can continue while allowing an 
increasing proportion of the social product to flow into the 
satisfaction of individual consumers' needs. 

But if the decision to accelerate and enlarge the produc- 
tion of consumer goods while continuing the preferential 
development of heavy industry indicates the measure of 
progress beyond the Stalinist period, it also indicates that 
progress will be kept within the framework of "nonantago- 
nistic" contradictions and administrative adjustments. In 
other words, any expectation of a qualitative change which 
would amount to an explosive "negation" of the past stage 
is rigidly opposed. Improvement and liberalization will 
be conditional upon the relentless struggle for higher pro- 
ductivity of labor, upon socialist competition, and upon 
total mobilization of the people for work and for train- 
ing. Again, such continuity in the "spirit" of socialism 
cannot simply be explained by the "power drive" of the 
Soviet leadership — it is rather rooted in the objective con- 
ditions under which the Soviet state operates, in the "anom- 
aly" of capitalist and socialist coexistence which Lenin's 
political testament epitomized. The notion of socialism in 
a "capitalist environment" precludes abandonment of the 
total mobilization of the people; it also precludes a funda- 
mental change in the value system which subordinates so- 
cialist freedom to toil and discipline. It is the Soviet gov- 



Transition from Socialism to Communism 179 

ernment and the party which will raise the level of popular 
consumption. This constantly repeated formula expresses 
the basic policy that progress and liberalization, the effect 
of the "basic law of socialism," will not be the result of 
freedom and initiative "from below" but rather of the uti- 
lization of an expanding economy, regulated by the state in 
accordance with the political requirements (national and 
international). The resolution to maintain this policy is 
demonstrated by the manner in which political and cul- 
tural liberalization remains fused with improvement in a 
repressive morality, private and public, in work and in 
leisure. 

We shall analyze the social function of Soviet morality 
in the second part of this study. Here, the question arises 
whether the "spirit" of socialist construction as institution- 
alized during the Stalinist period will also be fundamen- 
tally affected by the new trend. Even a most tentative an- 
swer would have to discuss two chief factors: the attained 
stage of the economic-political development, and the inner 
dynamic of the established behavior pattern and value sys- 
tem, which, though planned and controlled, have their own 
exigencies and aims. Only a tentative answer with respect 
to the economic-political factor can be sketched at this 
point. 

We have seen that, in the Stalinist conception, the dis- 
appearance of the state as repressive machinery is made 
conditional on the strengthening of the socialist state, and 
that the latter is to continue into the second phase. There 
are no indications that this conception has been altered 
since Stalin's death. Although Stalin's "erroneous for- 



180 Political Tenets 

mula" on the aggravating class struggle during the prog- 
ress of socialism is rejected,^^ although a considerable 
"democratization" of the state, decentralization, and 
self-government is proclaimed and even implemented, the 
continued strengthening of the state and of the party agen- 
cies remains on the agenda.^^ Nor — and this is far more 
important — are there any objective factors or tendencies 
which would allow such alteration. The reorientation in 
international strategy, and the corresponding domestic re- 
orientation, especially in the field of agriculture, confront 
the regime with problems of such a magnitude that intense 
regimentation from above seems to be required for the 
very success of the new efforts. Relaxation no less than 
hardening of the system necessitates planned control. The 
gulf, in terms of privileges and of power, between the 
bureaucracy and the underlying population is still great 
enough to make for the self-perpetuation of the former. 
Moreover, education and training of the people are geared 
to a well-functioning mass of competitive subjects of ad- 
ministration. According to the doctrine itself, the very na- 
ture of the state as an independent power over and above 
the individuals must sustain the separation of the "im- 
mediate producers" from control over the means of pro- 
duction: social unfreedom reproduces political unfreedom. 
The trend we have suggested is toward alleviating the 

^ Resolution of the Central Committee of the Communist Party of the 
Soviet Union, June 30, 1956, in The Anti-Stalin Campaign and International 
Communism, ed. by Russian Institute, Columbia University (New York, 
Columbia University Press, 1956), p. 290. 

"' Khrushchev at the Twentieth Congress of the Communist Party of the 
Soviet Union, XX S"ezd Kommunisticheskoi Partii Sovetskogo Soiuza (The 
Twentieth Congress of the Communist Party of the Soviet Union), I, 91 ff. 



Transition from Socialism to Communism 181 

latter; but only if it affects the former, or, in Stalin's ter- 
minology, only if the contradictions between the growing 
productive forces and the production relations have really 
been solved, would the entire structure change. This solu- 
tion is reserved for tlie "final victory of socialism," and 
the "final" victory of socialism is still linked to the inter- 
national revolution. In this respect, the initiative in the 
turn toward the "withering away" of the state is not with 
the Soviet leadership — the turn depends on the break in 
the "capitalist environment" and its effects on Soviet so- 
ciety. 

The sustained power of the state sustains the controls 
over the ideological sphere. The relaxation might be con- 
siderable; individual liberties are likely to increase with 
increasing economic benefits — but quantity will not turn 
into quality unless the economic benefits have themselves 
become political ones, that is to say, have led to the control 
of production by the "immediate producers," or, according 
to the progress of automation, by the "immediate consum- 
ers." As long as this is not the case, the post-Stalinist wel- 
fare state will remain the direct heir of the Stalinist state. 
And for just as long, the basic "spirit" of socialism will re- 
main the same. Soviet society in this case pays tribute to 
the dialectic of ideology and reality, consciousness and 
societal relations. According to this dialectic, a genuinely 
socialist base is reflected in an ideology which is free in a 
strict sense. The mental development in all its manifesta- 
tions is freed from the blind determination by the "realm 
of necessity" and tends toward a free play of humane indi- 
vidual faculties. Materialism is canceled through its reali- 



182 Political Tenets 

zation; as the economy is brought under the control of the 
associated individuals whose material needs are fulfilled, 
their mental development is released from control. The ra- 
tional regulation of the necessities, of the struggle for ex- 
istence and the struggle with nature, enables society to dis- 
pense with the regulation of the instinctual and intellectual 
life of its members. Reason appears as individual free- 
dom. In Soviet society, however, the progressing control of 
the base continues to be accompanied by a progressing con- 
trol of the ideology, and by the regulation of the realm of 
freedom gained by conquest of the necessity. In the very 
passage where Stalin calls for the reduction of the work- 
ing day "at least to six and then to five hours" (a meas- 
ure in which Marx saw the basic prerequisite for freedom), 
he states that this reduction is necessary "in order that 
members of society may receive the leisure time necessary 
for a thorough education." Thus the time saved will not be 
free time — it will have to be spent in education. 

To be sure, education is the prerequisite for liberation: 
only the freedom to learn and to know the whole truth, to 
grasp the arrested, violated, and destroyed potentialities 
of man and nature can guide the building of a free society. 
What kind of education did Stalin envisage? He demanded 
the introduction of "universal, compulsory, polytechnical 
education, so that a member of society may be able to make 
a free choice of occupation and not be shackled for life to 
any one occupation." ^'^ Following up this program, the 
Twentieth Congress again places all emphasis on "train- 
ing" — the training of "specialists on the basis of a close 

^ "Economic Problems of Socialism," in Current Soviet Policies, p. 14. 



Transition from Socialism to Communism 183 

cooperation between studies and production" and calls for 
"strengthening the ties of the country's scientific establish- 
ments with production, with the concrete demands of the 
national economy." ^^ The exchangeability of functions, the 
elimination of the institutionalized division of labor,^^ is 
indeed in Marxian theoiy the characteristic of a socialist 
society — as a precondition for the all-sided development 
of the genuinely human faculties outside the process of 
material production. But in Stalin's context the Marxian 
idea appears as that of a society in which all men are tech- 
nicians and engineers. For Marx and Engels, the goal of 
communism was the "abolition of labor," ^^ in the Soviet 
Marxist conception, all will be laborers of the one commu- 
nist society.^* With the free time transfomied into educa- 
tion time for polytechnical training, with the work morale 
anchored in the instinctual structure of man, administra- 
tive control is secured, and the past is safely transferred 
into the future. Stalin could thus quote without danger 
Engels's statement that labor will change from a burden 
into enjoyment. The enjoyment, however, will not be quali- 
tatively different from that permitted under repression. 
The ideological perspective parallels the political per- 

*' Resolution as broadcast by Tass, February 25, 1956; XX S"ezd Kommu- 
nistichesJcoi Partii Sovetskogo Soiuza (The Twentieth Congress of the Com- 
munist Party of the Soviet Union), II, 480. 

^ Not the division of labor as such — only that mode of division which 
chains the laborer for life to one specialized performance and function. 

^^ Marx and Engels, The German Ideology (New York, International Pub- 
lishers, 1939), pp. 49, 69. 

^ Stepanian, "Usloviia i puti perekhoda ot sotsializma k kommunizmu" 
(The Conditions and the Paths of the Transition from Socialism to Com- 
munism), in sovetskom sotsialisticheskom obshchestve (On Soviet Socialist 
Society), pp. 486 f. 



184 Political Tenets 

spective. The state will continue into the period of com- 
munism — as will the "capitalist environment." For the 
state is the "collective subject" of the national economy 
which organizes the whole of society, and this organization 
has become the objectified representative of society over 
and above the individuals. Since societal production is sys- 
tematically directed by the state and since the basic de- 
cisions are imposed upon the society by the state, progress 
itself, that is to say, the use of the growing productivity for 
the needs and aspirations of the individuals, must pass 
through the agencies of the state. The continuity of the 
administration thus bridges the gap between necessity and 
freedom, and assimilates the first and the second phase, 
socialism and communism. And the administration, as we 
have tried to show, depends on the ever more effective 
growth and utilization of the productivity of labor: it tends 
to drive society to a higher stage. Industrialization and 
rationalization, carried through according to standards of 
competitive efficiency at the national and international 
level, and developing human beings as ever better function- 
ing instruments of material and intellectual labor, are 
likely to bear economic as well as political fruits — over- 
ruling the diverging interests and intentions of particular 
groups and individuals. 

The reward will not be the end of domination of man by 
man; administration of things is not likely to replace the 
administration of men in any foreseeable future. Marx 
stressed the essentially "neutral" character of technology: 
although the windmill may give you a feudal society, and 
the steammill an industrial capitalist society, the latter 



Transition from Socialism to Communism 185 

may just as well give you another form of industrial soci- 
ety. Modern machinery is susceptible to capitalist as well 
as socialist utilization. This amounts to saying that mature 
capitalism and socialism have the same technical base, and 
that the historical decision as to how this base is to be used 
is a political decision. During the period of coexistence, the 
economic factors are political factors; it is the period of 
political economy with respect not only to the state's role in 
the economy, but also to the political implications of 
the development of consciousness. The consciousness of 
the underlying population, permeated with the power of 
ever growing productivity, with the efficiency of an ever 
better mechanized and coordinated apparatus, and with 
the rewards of an ever more indispensable compliance, 
does not attain any other political level than that of the ap- 
paratus itself. Thus it is barred from developing the polit- 
ical consciousness which may serve as a guide to political 
change. 

The two antagonistic social systems here join in the gen- 
eral trend of technical progress. It has been noted (and we 
shall attempt to demonstrate this notion by the example of 
Soviet ethical philosophy in the second part of this study) 
how much the present "communist spirit" resembles the 
"capitalist spirit" which Max Weber attributed to the ris- 
ing capitalist civilization. The Soviet state seems to foster 
the disciplining, self-propelling, competitive-productive 
elements of this spirit in a streamlined and politically con- 
trolled form. "Businesslike management," directorial ini- 
tiative and responsibility, and scientific rationalization of 
the human and material resources have remained the con- 



186 Political Tenets 

sistently imposed demands throughout both the Stalinist 
and post-Stalinist period,^^ in times of both "hard" and 
"soft" policy, of both personal and collective leadership. 
And "businesslike management" has also been applied to 
grand international strategy, to the conduct of foreign af- 
fairs. The change in the type of leader, from the profes- 
sional revolutionary to die manager (a change which began 
as early as 1922, with the development of the New Eco- 
nomic Policy), now seems to be consummated. In 1922 
Lenin proclaimed preference for the merchant, the trader, 
the administrator over the loyal revolutionary communist 
who did not know how to trade, how to sell, how to do busi- 
ness. He went further than that: "We are not afraid to say 
that the character of our work has changed. Our worst in- 
ternal enemy is the Communist who occupies a responsible 
(or not responsible) Soviet post and enjoys universal re- 
spect as a conscientious man." ^^ 

However, the spirit of businesslike politics and com- 
petitive efficiency in the twentieth century is no longer that 
described by Max Weber. Developed industrial society 
requires a different organization and a different behavior. 
Soviet society, in the position of a "latecomer" telescoping 
entire phases of growth, meets its antagonist in a common 
situation. At the "atomic" stage of the mastery of man and 

^ See for example Bulganin's report to the Central Committee of the Com- 
munist Party, July, 1955, in Current Digest of the Soviet Press, VII, No. 28 
(August 24, 1955), 3-20, and Zverev's speech at the session of the Supreme 
Soviet, February 1955, in ibid., VII, No. 6 (March 23, 1955), 19-20, and No. 
7 (March 30, 1955), 8. 

^ "Report at the All-Russian Congress of the Metal Workers' Union," in 
Selected Works (12 vols.; New York, International Publishers, 1937-38), IX, 
318, see also p. 326. 



Transition from Socialism to Communism 187 

nature, societal productivity surpasses the traditional 
forms of control and utilization. The cohesion of society 
is no longer left to the free play of economic forces and 
their individual evaluation and calculation; they have to 
be supplemented by more powerful regulation. The fusion 
between economic, cultural, and political controls is an 
international phenomenon, cutting across differences in 
economic, cultural, and political institutions. In the Soviet 
Union, this fusion is an avowed ideological as well as eco- 
nomic goal: at the very time when Soviet industry is again 
to be revamped in accordance with the standards of busi- 
ness efficiency, the government emphasized that this pro- 
gram is to be implemented by strengthening the "industrial 
leadership" of the Communist Party! ^^ 

There is no prospect tliat this fusion of economic and 
political controls in a self-perpetuating state will dissolve; 
it is doubly grounded, in the nationalized but not social- 
ized Soviet economy, and in the international situation of 
large-scale industry. This framework of the state leaves 
room for many changes within the administration: the top 
rule may pass from one group to the other, from party to 
army predominance, from "committee rule" back to per- 
sonal rule, and so forth. However, these changes would not 
fundamentally alter the basis of Soviet society, nor the 
basic direction in which this society is moving. Unless 
another world war or similar catastrophe occurs which 
would change the situation, the direction is toward a grow- 
ing welfare state. Rising standards of living up to a prac- 

" See Bulganin's report to the Central Committee of the Communist Party, 
July, 1955, in Current Digest of the Soviet Press, VII, No. 28 (August 24, 
1955), 18 fl. 



188 Political Tenets 

tically free distribution of basic goods and services, stead- 
ily extending mechanization of labor, exchangeability of 
technical functions, expanding popular culture — these de- 
velopments constitute the probable trend. It is likely to lead 
to the gradual assimilation of urban and agricultural, in- 
tellectual and physical labor — brought under the common 
denominator of technology. Technical progress will over- 
take the repressive restrictions imposed at earlier stages — 
they will become technically obsolete. This will lead to fur- 
ther changes in the political structure: it will make for a 
spread of the bureaucracy and its privileges, for a reduc- 
tion of the gap between the top strata and the underlying 
population, for the transformation of political into tech- 
nological controls. Personal rule will increasingly be re- 
placed by collective administration, even if a new dictator 
should concentrate the leadership at the top. Social mo- 
bility within the system will grow. But these changes them- 
selves will take place within the framework of universal 
control, universal administration. Whether or not the 
growth of the welfare state will ultimately bring the ad- 
ministration under direct popular control, that is to say, 
whether or not the Soviet state will develop into a socialist 
or communist democracy, is a question for which the pre- 
vailing facts and tendencies do not provide a workable hy- 
pothesis. Negatively, it seems that nothing in the structure 
of Soviet society would exclude such a long-range develop- 
ment, and that it would depend neither on a "decision" of 
the Soviet leadership nor on the internal situation of the 
Soviet orbit alone. From our analysis, it follows that the 
emergence of a socialist democracy in the USSR would be 



Transition from Socialism to Communism 189 

conditional upon two main prerequisites, which in turn are 
interrelated: (1) a level of social wealth which would make 
possible the organization of production according to in- 
dividual needs and thus cancel the prerogatives of privi- 
leged powers; and (2) an international situation in which 
the conflict between the two social systems would no longer 
define their economy and their policy. 

We have suggested that such qualitative change is no 
longer an economic but a political problem: ^^ the technical- 
economic basis for the change is there. It is not the still 
terrifying scarcity and poverty which prevents "socialist 
democracy," that is, the control of production and distri- 
bution "from below." In Marxist terms, distribution of 
scarcity and the concerted struggle for its abolition pertain 
to the content of socialism from the very beginning — even 
during the first phase.^^ On the basis of the nationalized 
economy, establishment of this control remains a political 
act. As such, it involves the abolition of the repressive 
state and its repressive machinery — which does not neces- 
sarily mean violent overthrow in civil war. However, the 
political act itself seems to be dependent on the second 
prerequisite. The rising welfare state may render life 
more comfortable and more secure, but as long as the East- 
West conflict remains a determining economic and political 
factor, it precludes the decisive transformation, for it serves 
to justify — subjectively and objectively — repressive com- 
petition and competitive mobilization on a totalitarian 
scale. The history of Soviet society seems to be fatefully 
linked to that of its antagonist. Over and above the con- 
•^ Page 185 above. ^ Page 20 above. 



190 Political Tenets 

struction of socialism or communism in one country and 
in one orbit, the essentially international element of social- 
ism seems to prevail. 

But in this constellation, the prospective development of 
the Soviet state stands under the dialectical law which it 
invokes. The qualitative change can never be envisaged as 
an automatic one. No matter how high the level of tech- 
nical progress and material culture, of labor productivity 
and efficiency, the change from socialist necessity to so- 
cialist freedom can only be the result of conscious effort 
and decision. The maintenance of repressive production 
relations enables the Soviet state, with the instrumentalities 
of universal control, to regiment the consciousness of the 
underlying population. We have suggested that the bu- 
reaucracy may not have a vested interest in perpetuating 
the repressive state machinery.^" However, this does not 
dispose of the question as to whether or not the "spirit" 
of Soviet socialist construction, the specific "rationality" 
of the system, tends to perpetuate repression by and in 
the underlying population itself — in other words, whether 
repression from above does not meet repression from be- 
low. The Soviet system would then repeat and reproduce 
that determinism which Marx attributed to the basic proc- 
esses of capitalist society. There, Marxian theory and prac- 
tice themselves were to be the lever which would break 
this determinism and free the subjective factor, that is, 
the class consciousness of the proletariat. We have tried 
to show that, in Soviet society, Marxism no longer has this 
function. Left without a conceptual level for the "deter- 

*" See pp. 109 ff. above. 



Transition from Socialism to Communism 191 

minate negation" of the established system, for compre- 
hending and realizing its arrested potentialities, the ruled 
tend not only to submit to the rulers but also to reproduce 
in themselves their subordination. Again, this process is not 
specific to Soviet society. The means and rewards of highly 
advanced industrial society, the work and leisure attitudes 
called forth by its organization of production and distribu- 
tion, establish a human existence which makes for a change 
in basic values — for a transformation of freedom into se- 
curity. Such a transformation in turn would counteract the 
development of a "negative" political consciousness and 
thus counteract qualitative political change. The basic 
value system, the prevalent "spirit" of the society, would 
then assume the role of an active factor determining the 
direction of tlie societal development. As a partial contribu- 
tion to the analysis of this factor, the second part of this 
study will examine the main structure of Soviet ethical 
philosophy. 



PART II: ETHICAL TENETS 



9. Western and Soviet Ethics: 

Their Historical Relation 



IN THE FIRST part of this study we have analyzed certain 
basic trends of Soviet Marxism in their relation to the de- 
velopment of Soviet society. The analysis led to the conclu- 
sion that the specific conditions and objectives of industri- 
alization, carried out in antagonistic competition with the 
Western world, determined even the most theoretical fea- 
tures of Soviet Marxism. At the same time, it appeared that 
in some significant aspects the two antagonistic systems 
showed a parallel tendency: total industrialization seemed 
to exact patterns of attitude and organization which cut 
across the essential political and ideological differences. 
Efficient, "businesslike management," highly rationalized 
and centralized, and working on equally rationalized and 
coordinated human and technical material, tends to pro- 
mote political and cultural centralization and coordination. 
In the West, this trend has led to a corrosion of the human- 
istic liberal ethics which was centered on the idea of the 
autonomous individual and his inalienable rights. But the 
system of values derived from an earlier stage has by 
and large been maintained (after the liquidation of the 
Fascist and Nazi states which subverted it) — though in 
increasingly overt contradiction to the prevailing practice. 



196 Ethical Tenets 

In the Soviet state, total industrialization occurred under 
conditions incompatible with liberal ethics; therefore, the 
revolutionary and postrevolutionary state created its own 
system of values and indoctrinated the population accord- 
ingly. However, contemporary total industrialization with 
contemporary technics and methods of work provide a com- 
mon denominator which makes the abstract contrast be- 
tween Western and Soviet ethics questionable. 

Neither centralization nor coordination militate by them- 
selves against progress in freedom and humanity (they 
have more than once been effective weapons in the struggle 
against oppression and reaction). Nor is there anything in 
the technics and economics of total industrialization that 
would necessarily encroach upon human freedom. On the 
contrary, if there is anything common to the Marxian and 
anti-Marxian evaluation of industrial society in nineteenth- 
century philosophy, it is the insistence that increasing in- 
dustrialization is the prerequisite for progress in the ethical 
as well as the material sense. The protest against the "alien- 
ation" of man, which materialist and idealist philosophy 
express, is in both cases directed against the political or- 
ganization ^ of industry — not against industry as such. In 
Marxian (but certainly not in Soviet-Marxist) terms it 
would be easy to identify the common element in the polit- 
ical organization of industry which militates against prog- 

^ "Political" as distinguished from "social" refers to an organization and 
utilization of industry which is not determined by the faculties and needs of 
the individuals but by particular interests conflicting with the free develop- 
ment of individual faculties and needs. Under this condition too, production 
fulfills a "social need," but the latter is superimposed upon the individual 
needs and shapes them in accordance with the predominant specific inter- 
ests. 



Western and Soviet Ethics 197 

ress in freedom, namely, the enslavement of man by the 
means of his labor, his subordination to his own "objecti- 
fied" (vergegenstdndlichte) labor. Still, in history, such 
subordination had very different functions: it may initiate 
a new stage in the development of the productive forces or 
prolong an old one; it may promote or arrest the develop- 
ment. The political organization of industry can by itself 
not explain the specific content of Soviet ethics and its rela- 
tion to Western ethics. 

We propose to approach the problem through a brief 
comparison between the representative ideas of Western 
and Soviet ethics. Such a comparison asumes that there is 
on both sides an identifiable body of ethical theory suffi- 
ciently homogeneous to be treated as a whole. The assump- 
tion seems plausible in the case of Soviet ethics: throughout 
all changes to which Soviet ethical theories have been sub- 
jected since the Bolshevik Revolution, they have been gov- 
erned by one unifying principle, namely, the formulation 
and evaluation of ethical standards in accordance with the 
objectives of the Soviet state. And in so far as these objec- 
tives themselves have been determined by the long-range 
policy of socialism under conditions of coexistence," a strik- 
ing continuity and consistency have been preserved notwith- 
standing all adaptations to the changing situation. But can a 
similar case be made for the contrasting homogeneity of 
Western ethics? The case seems to be legitimate a con- 
trario. If we look at the ethical standards and ideas on 
which the Soviet discussion of Western ethics is centered 
and which are criticized and reinterpreted, we discover 

*See Chapter 4 of this study. 



198 Ethical Tenets 

certain general features which appear as characteristic of 
Western ethics. They are as follows: 

1. The notion of freedom obtains; according to this the 
essential condition of man is that he be sufficiently free 
from external determination to become free for self- 
responsible action and behavior. 

2. This essential freedom validates the proposition of 
universally binding ethical norms, to be observed regard- 
less of the individual's accidental situation and objectives. 

3. The ethically legitimate aims of the individual are 
those which involve the best possible development and sat- 
isfaction of his faculties, but individual self-realization is 
subordinated to (a) the universally valid norms of Chris- 
tian ethics and their humanistic secularization; (6) the 
more specific norms of the social and political community 
in which the individual lives. 

4. The two sets of norms are sanctioned (a) by God 
and/or "the nature of man"; and (6) by the requirements 
of sustaining and improving the social and national com- 
munity. 

5. But regardless of the ultimate sanction of morality, 
the supposition is that there is no fundamental conflict ^ 
between individual morality on the one hand, and com- 
munal (social and political) morality on the other; that is 
to say, in the countries of Western (industrial) civilization, 
the basic social and political relations are held to be organ- 
ized in such a way that the objectives of the individual 
(Point 3 above) and his "essence" (Points 1—2 above) can 

' Although there certainly is (and ought to be) factual tension and differ- 
ence. 



Western and Soviet Ethics 199 

be attained or at least reasonably aspired to within the in- 
stitutions of the established society. These institutions can 
and must be improved, and their improvement may even 
imply large-scale changes; however, such changes are gen- 
erally envisaged, not as the negation of the established so- 
ciety but as its expansion and growth. 

The last proposition states the hidden historical denom- 
inator of Western ethics: it presupposes that civilization 
has finally established the institutions and relationships 
within whose framework man can realize his "nature," that 
is to say, unfold his potentialities and fulfill his needs. This 
presupposition is common to both idealistic and pragmatist- 
positivistic ethics, to the theories expounded by the French 
rationalists, the English utilitarians, the German ideal- 
ists, and by Saint-Simon and his followers. But the political 
and industrial revolutions of the eighteenth and nineteenth 
centuries are not its only source. Its moral substance is 
deeply rooted in the Christian tradition. Ever since Chris- 
tian ethics ceased to be an "oppositional" ethics, since its 
adoption by the state, the representative ethical philoso- 
phies have condemned as heresy a morality which main- 
tained that the established civilization was in irreconcilable 
conflict with the potentialities of man. To be sure, man's 
salvation and redemption are not of this world; but this 
world does not only not preclude his salvation, his moral 
behavior in it is also a necessary precondition for his salva- 
tion.^ All philosophy which does not accept this presupposi- 
tion is, from the point of view of representative Western 

*Calvinist doctrine is no exception. "Good works" and merits are not 
identical with moral behavior in the Christian sense. 



200 Ethical Tenets 

ethics, in a strict sense not only heretic but also amoral if 
not immoral. For such nonacceptance implies rejection of 
the fundamental assumption on which the universal valid- 
ity of the moral principles rests, namely, the possibility of 
their realization. 

However, the "heretic" philosophies have survived in 
many forms — from the Gnostic schools of the first Chris- 
tian centuries, the Cathari and other radical spiritual sects, 
to the revolutionary social philosophies of the modem era. 
Common to all of them is their commitment to a qualita- 
tively new history — a history which must shatter the estab- 
lished institutions so that the real destiny of man may be 
fulfilled. Common to all of them is their attraction among 
the underprivileged and "marginal" strata of the popula- 
tion (and their acceptance by various political and intel- 
lectual "elites"). Their morality has a different historical 
denominator and therefore appears as the negation of the 
prevailing morality. But at the same time, the heretics 
claim to preserve and even fulfill the principles and prom- 
ises maintained by their orthodox adversaries: the medie- 
val Cathari claimed to be the true Christians; the radical 
sects of the Reformation represented themselves as the true 
Protestants. During the modem period, the opposition, in- 
creasingly secular, continues within the humanist tradition. 
The great materialists and skeptics of the sixteenth cen- 
tury, the extreme left wing of the Enlightenment and its 
socialist-communist heirs justify their "subversive" phi- 
losophy in terms of the humanist ideal. Marxism is an 
integral part of the same tradition. It was more than a man- 
ner of speaking when Marx and Engels considered them- 



Western and Soviet Ethics 201 

selves as heirs of the Enlightenment, the French Revolu- 
tion, and German idealistic philosophy. Liberty, Equality, 
and Justice are key terms in Marx's Capital, and its 
economic theory is in a more than chronological sense pre- 
ceded by and completes the humanist philosophy of the 
German Ideology (1846) and the Economic-Philosophical 
Manuscripts (1844).^ 

This outline, though oversimplified, may help to clarify 
the historical relation between Western and Soviet ethics. 
The main impact of Soviet ethical philosophy is not that of 
an external force operating from outside and against West- 
ern civilization. Nor does the challenge come from the 
specific content of Soviet ethics — from the ideals of "com- 
munist morality." Soviet ethics bases its claim to represent 
a "higher" morality on the historical mission of Marxian 
theory, and Marxian theory has no independent ethics but 
claims to demonstrate the realization of humanistic ethics. 
According to Marx, the capitalist economy is the fate and 
the denial of this code of ethics, and its abolition the pre- 
requisite for the development of ethics. The historical roots 
of Soviet philosophy are not alien to the West (no matter 
how closely they have been fused with the Eastern tradi- 
tion and adapted to the national and international interests 
of the Soviet Union). Nor are they primarily defined by 
the requirements of power and propaganda. They derive 

°No complete English translation of the latter is available. The full text 
was first published in Division 1, Vol. Ill of the Marx-Engels Gesamtausgabe 
(Berlin, Marx-Engels Verlag, 1932). Also not available in English is Marx's 
Grundrisse der Kritik der Politischen Oekonomie, written 1857-58 (Berlin, 
Dietz, 1953). This is the most important of IMarx's manuscripts, which shows 
to what extent the humanist philosophy is fulfilled and formulated in the 
economic theory of Capital. 



202 Ethical Tenets 

(1) from the revolutionary formulation of the humanist 
ideal in the theory of "scientific socialism," and (2) from 
its use for establishing a new society opposed to and com- 
peting with capitalist society. No matter how much the 
former contradicts the latter (the first part of this study 
tries to show how much it does), the connection is close 
enough to render possible the employment of the ideal in 
defense of the reality. The forces and circumstances which 
led to the abuse and violation of the ideal appear as more 
objective than those of mere power politics — objective to 
such an extent that they may easily be presented as the 
working of Historical Reason, Within this framework, So- 
viet ethical philosophy is an internally consistent, rational 
system of values, sufficiently separable from political ex- 
pediencies to attract the self-interest of large populations 
outside the Soviet dominion. 

This attraction seems to rest to a great extent on an argu- 
ment which implies that Marxism has rescued humanistic 
ethics from capitalist distortion. It may be summarized as 
follows: 

The people in the Western world have been educated in 
the spirit of Christian-humanistic ethics. Their societal re- 
lations are supposed to conform essentially to this spirit 
and to render possible its ever more adequate and uni- 
versal realization — especially the liberty and equality of 
man, and the development of his human potentialities. 
Western civilization at its industrial stage has indeed as- 
sembled all the material and cultural resources necessary 
for implementing this idea. However, the existing societal 
institutions prevent its implementation because they sus- 



Western and Soviet Ethics 203 

tain injustice, exploitation, and repression. Consequently, 
they must be destroyed in order to fulfill the promises of 
Western civilization. 

This argument, which has been publicized in very popu- 
lar formulations and on various levels of sophistication, 
persuasion, and evidence, has had a lasting influence. The 
mainsprings of this influence may be defined as follows: 
The argument (1) derives the pervasive discontent in 
civilization from one tangible and easily identifiable cause, 
namely, the capitalist organization of society; (2) it criti- 
cizes this society, not by any extraneous and transcenden- 
tal standards, but by those promulgated and accepted by 
Western society (i.e., the "humanistic values") ; (3) it thus 
explains and justifies discontent and protest not only on 
material but also on ethical grounds; (4) it off"ers an al- 
ternative which, again, is presented, not as an extraneous 
abstract possibility, but as the fulfillment of the very 
promises and capabilities of the existing society. 

The last point indicates what seems to be the main force 
of the appeal — the combination of ethical maxims with 
scientific objectivity. Working with Marxist theory, Soviet 
ethics claims to unite, on a scientific basis, values and facts, 
ideal and reality, the particular interest of the individual 
and the general interest of society, even of mankind, as a 
whole. Moreover, Soviet ethical philosophy claims to be 
capable of demonstrating the attitude, behavior, and prac- 
tice which alone will bring about freedom and a humane 
existence for all. And this practice is individual as well as 
social, that is to say, it is to unite the individual with a 
social group on the ground of a common cause by virtue of 



204 Ethical Tenets 

which the specific concerns of the individual are taken over 
by the entire group. 

Soviet ethics thus claims to weld together ideas and 
spheres of life that appear as torn asunder in Western 
ethics. According to the latter, man was to come into his 
own in a natural and social environment which was com- 
patible with a free and moral existence — at least it did 
not preclude the attainment of this end. In reality, how- 
ever, the conditions of life turned out to be rather limiting 
and hostile, and the environment was experienced, rather, 
as adverse to the development of an ethical personality. 
The experience therefore, had to be devaluated and re- 
interpreted: the "inner man" was separated from his ex- 
ternal existence, and the ethical personality was defined 
in such a way that it included — and even necessitated — 
renunciation, suffering, and repression. The tension which 
motivates Western ethics expresses — and at the same time 
justifies — the experienced contrast between the ever-grow- 
ing material and intellectual resources and their avail- 
ability for individual needs, between the demand for self- 
determination and the limits imposed upon it in reality, 
between essential equality and the still prevailing inhu- 
manity of man against man, between the ideal of justice 
and unjust practices. These factual restrictions of the 
morally sanctioned and professed ideal seem to whittle 
down the central notions of Western ethics ; moreover, they 
seem to confront human existence with a welter of conflict- 
ing loyalties and values (divine versus human, or natural 
versus positive, law; individual versus commonwealth; 
private versus public values; family versus social stand- 



Western and Soviet Ethics 205 

ards). In contrast, Soviet ethics seems to represent the ef- 
fective solution of these contradictions — an integration of 
moral with practical values which Western ethics cannot 
accomplish and does not want to accomplish because it 
considers the tension between the two spheres as a precon- 
dition of moral behavior. The contrast between Western 
and Soviet ethics may now be illustrated by the different 
weight given to the values of freedom and security. 

The Western idea of freedom is realized through eco- 
nomic and political institutions which are to enable the 
individual to be the self-responsible architect of his fate. 
His existence is to be the result of his own activity, that is, 
his own performance in free competition with other indi- 
viduals who are about equally equipped. In accordance 
with this philosophy, the institutionalized safeguards of 
freedom (the rule of law; civil rights; property guaran- 
tees) necessarily leave the individual to his own devices 
in large areas of his existence. These areas tend to become 
areas of insecurity as the economic process becomes com- 
plex and incalculable, beyond the control of the average 
individual, and dependent on a whole array of supraindi- 
vidual forces and processes. Freedom in the economic 
sphere then is canceled by the factual "closing" of whole 
categories of employment, by the rigidity of prescribed 
behavior patterns, by the standardization of required work 
performances, or it involves a risk which the majority of 
the people cannot afford to take (risk of unemployment, 
of "falling behind," of becoming an outsider, and so 
forth). The encroachments on freedom appear as rational 
and technical processes — nobody's fault and doing, but 



206 Ethical Tenets 

the by-product (or perhaps even the condition) of the divi- 
sion of labor in late industrial society and, as such, tokens 
of efficiency and progress. The value itself of freedom 
seems to become questionable. In reality (though not nec- 
essarily in ideology) freedom is being redefined. It no 
longer means being the self-responsible architect of one's 
life, of one's own potentialities and their realization. In- 
stead, freedom becomes that which the representative po- 
litical philosophy of ascending individualistic society has 
always meant it to be, namely, the surrender of the "nat- 
ural" liberty of the individual to the civil liberty of being 
able to do what is not prohibited by law or not accessible 
to law, or, the recognition of legitimate unfreedom. But 
this is security. The standards of freedom are shifted from 
the autonomous individual to the laws governing the so- 
ciety which governs the individual. They merge with the 
laws governing the economy, the commonwealth, the na- 
tion, the alliance of nations. However, while the individual 
is supposed to be made secure within this overwhelming 
political and economic cosmos, his "true" freedom is still 
to derive from and even to consist of the "inner" being 
(freedom of conscience, thought, religion, and so forth). 
Thus, while in the factual existence the striving for security 
prevails upon the value of freedom and is desired even at 
the expense of freedom, freedom and security come into 
conflict with each other — a conflict which can be mini- 
mized only by reducing the elements of independence and 
autonomy, that is to say, by sacrificing them to the value of 
security. However, the entire ideological tradition of West- 
ern ethics, with its image of man as free master and law- 



Western and Soviet Ethics 207 

giver, militates against this trend; and where the latter 
asserts itself against all tradition, under the impact of eco- 
nomic necessity, it only throws in sharper relief the differ- 
ence between ideology and reality. The ideology is still 
strong enough to block the sanctioning of the surrender of 
individual freedom and to counteract total coordination; 
the conflict between freedom and security still remains an 
avowed condition of existence, and the mastery of the con- 
flict an ethical task. But the task becomes ever more un- 
realistic. 

Soviet ethics promises to solve the conflict by support- 
ing the Soviet state in its elimination of the "negative" 
aspects of freedom, namely, those areas in which the indi- 
vidual was still left to his own devices, although his de- 
vices were grossly inadequate for the great majority of 
the people. The choice of education, training, and occupa- 
tion; the liberty to provide for one's own care and old 
age; the right to read and write and listen to diff^erent and 
conflicting opinions were reduced or abolished, and Soviet 
ethics justified this policy. The traditional liberties in these 
areas succumbed to the regimentation of employment, 
control of movement, health insurance, censorship, and so 
forth. The realm of legitimate unfreedom was vastly ex- 
tended, and the surrender of the "natural" liberty of the 
individual was openly and methodically enforced in 
spheres of the human existence which remained sacrosanct 
in the West. But within the context of Soviet ideology and 
Soviet objectives, the suppression of traditional liberties 
assumes a "positive" function which Soviet ethical philoso- 
phy interprets as the preparation of true freedom. The tra- 



208 Ethical Tenets 

ditional liberties can be safely devaluated in Soviet ethics, 
for, from the Soviet point of view, they are merely ideo- 
logical or even illusory for the great majority of the 
population until and unless they are substantiated in eco- 
nomic security, that is, freedom from want. 

This independence from want will, according to Marx, 
only prevail if and when man is no longer enslaved by his 
labor — in other words, political and intellectual freedom 
presuppose freedom from the daily struggle for the neces- 
sities of life, which in turn presupposes the existence of a 
classless society. The Marxian conception implies that man 
ceases to be an economic subject precisely to the degree 
to which the economy ceases to be his "fate," that is to 
say, is no longer a determining factor but is itself deter- 
mined, namely, brought under rational control exercised 
by the associated individuals. In so far as economic free- 
dom is free competition in the incessant struggle for "earn- 
ing one's life" (i.e., making a living), it is, to Marx, the 
negation of true freedom because it compels man to spend 
practically all his time and energy in procuring the neces- 
sities of life — in "alienated labor." And in so far as the 
notion of the free individual involves the free economic 
subject, it is itself the notion of unfreedom. For the "econ- 
omy," that is, the entire realm of necessity in which the 
competitive struggle for existence takes place, cannot be 
the realm of individual freedom as long as it is the realm 
of alienated labor. To the degree to which this realm comes 
under the rational, collective control of the associated in- 
dividuals, the "economic subject" ceases to be essential to 
the free individual, as do those liberties which are instru- 



Western and Soviet Ethics 209 

ments and supplements of economic freedom. A large and 
decisive segment of what belonged, previously, to the rights 
of the private individual then becomes the concern of so- 
ciety. And if the realm of necessity is brought under the 
rational control, not of the associated individuals but of 
the state superimposed upon the individuals, the rights of 
the individual in this sphere become the concern of the state. 
As the individual changes his social function, so does 
the idea of freedom itself. Where the "free economy" no 
longer exists, the Western individual is no longer a real- 
ity or even ideology — he is reshaped and redefined to- 
gether with his freedom. It is then incumbent upon society 
to organize and direct the production and distribution of 
the necessities which are the prerequisites for freedom. 
And as long as these necessities are not available to all, and 
all are free, the state, as an independent power, is likely 
to arrogate to itself this organization and direction, and 
with it legislation over the private as well as public exist- 
ence of the individual. For no matter how protected it is, 
the private remains the "negative" of the public existence, 
and die individual part of the universal. The state which, as 
an independent power, controls the realm of necessity, also 
controls the personal aspirations, objectives, and values of 
the individual. The systematic reduction of the antagonism 
between the internal and external, between private and 
public existence (an antagonism which has become the life 
element of Western ethics) has been one of the basic func- 
tions of Soviet society as well as Soviet ethical philosophy. 
The inner and private values are externalized, that is to 
say, man is to be in all his manifestations a social and po- 
litical being. 



10. Soviet Ethics — The Externalizaiion of Values 



THE EXTERNALIZATION of values is a Universal feature of 
Soviet ethics. It is the concomitant and corollary of na- 
tionalization and shares its function and content. Although 
the abolition of private property is confined to ownership 
of the means of production, it also affects private property 
as an existential category.^ If private property is no longer 

* The ideology according to which private property is essential to the 
realization of the "free person" is epitomized in Hegel's Philosophy of Right, 
paragraphs 41 ff., especially paragraph 46. However, the extent to which 
otherwise most fundamentally different thinkers agree on the essential con- 
nection between the human person and private property is truly remarkable. 
We may be permitted to recall just a few of the best known statements to this 
effect : 

Thomas Aquinas (Summa Theologica, n.ii.qu.66a.l,2) : It is not only "law- 
ful" but "necessary" that man should possess property. As regards the use 
of things, "man has a natural dominion over external things, because by 
means of his reason and will he can make use of them for his own purpose, 
as though they were made for him" (trans. Dominican Fathers of the English 
Province) . 

John Locke {Of Civil Government, Second Treatise, Chap. HI, par. 26) : 
Every "man has a 'property' in his own 'person'. . . . The 'labour' of his 
body and the 'work' of his hands, we may say, are properly his. Whatsoever, 
then, he removes out of the state that Nature hath provided and left it in, he 
has mixed his labour with, and joined to it something that is his own, and 
thereby makes it his property." 

Hegel (Philosophy of Right, par. 41) : "In order that a person be a fully 
developed and independent organism, it is necessary that he find or make 
some external sphere for his freedom. . . . The rationality of property does 
not lie in its satisfaction of wants, but in its abrogation of the mere subjec- 
tivity of personality. It is in property that person primarily exists as reason" 
(trans. J. M. Sterrett and Carl J. Friedrich). 



Soviet Externa lization of Values 211 

regarded as the instrument through which the individual 
asserts himself, as the expression and embodiment of his 
self against other selves, then the whole area of individual 
privacy, which has traditionally been permeated with the 
values of private property, becomes externalized — it be- 
comes the legitimate concern of society. To Western ethics, 
the effects of tliis externalization are particularly abhorrent 
in those two spheres which are regarded as the sanctuary 
and reservoir of the individual per se, namely, the privacy 
of thought and conscience, and the privacy of the family. 
In these two spheres perhaps more than in any other, free- 
dom, according to the Western conception, is a function of 
privacy, and privacy is linked to property — as the institu- 
tion through which the person is legally constituted as hav- 
ing a realm of his own. Freedom of thought and conscience 
requires freedom from interference with matters which be- 
long to the individual and not to the state and society. 
The thoughts and feelings of the individual and their ex- 
pression are to be "his own"; ^ he is to utilize and direct 
them according to "his own" faculties and conscience; he 
is not merely to obey the universal standards but rather 
to "appropriate" tliem and make them his own (moral) 
legislation. 

Here again, the historical denominator of the Western 
conception comes to the fore. The free privacy of thought 
has assumed the dignity of an unconditional right during 
that period of modern society when the ideas held to be 
true for the human existence have appeared as antagonistic 

"A "natural person" is one "whose words or actions are considered as his 
owne." (Hobbes, Leviathan, Chap. XVI.) 



212 Ethical Tenets 

to the truths promulgated or represented by the public au- 
thorities, especially by the state, by whom those ideas 
were not held valid and self-evident. It is sufficient to recall 
the fact that "freedom of thought" emerged as a moral 
and political right in the struggle against feudal and cleri- 
cal despotism. Even today, where this right has been firmly 
institutionalized in the Western democracies, its value is 
activated only in emergency situations in which authori- 
tarian groups and policies encroach upon privacy. Con- 
versely, where there is no real conflict between private 
thought and public ideology or between private conscience 
and public morals, freedom of thought and conscience does 
not seem to be experienced as an essential value on which 
the individual existence depends — nor does it seem to have 
an essential content. In the most extreme case, the con- 
flict between private and public values is "resolved" in 
complete coordination: the individual thinks and feels and 
values privately what is thought and felt and valued in 
"public opinion" and expressed in public policies and 
pronouncements (not necessarily by the government, but 
by leaders of public opinion, "heroes" and models of as- 
pirations, in general education, and by the predominant 
forms of entertainment). Such coordination can be estab- 
lished by terror, by the standardizing trends of "mass cul- 
ture," or by a combination of both. The costs for the indi- 
vidual and for society are incomparably greater if it is 
accomplished by terror, and the diff^erence may well be 
that between life and death. However, at the end of the 
coordinating process, if and when conformity has been 
successfully established, the effect on the hierarchy of 



Soviet Externalization of Values 213 

values tends to be the same: individual freedom of thought 
and conscience appears to be losing its independent and 
unconditional value and to be submerging in the unifica- 
tion of private and public existence. In the course of a few 
generations, if the ejfifectiveness of the regime is sustained, 
repressiveness may be reduced by spreading over the 
whole of society, extending to all parts of the material and 
intellectual culture. When privacy and inner freedom no 
longer have a definable experiential content, their aboli- 
tion no longer has the quality of oppression which is still at- 
tached to it in the Western hierarchy of values. 

With the "socialization" of privacy, the locus of free- 
dom is shifted from the individual as a private person to 
the individual as a member of society. Society as a whole,^ 
represented by the Soviet state, defines not only the value 
of freedom, but also its scope, in other words, freedom be- 
comes an instrument for political objectives. 

The instrumentalization of Soviet ethics does not ex- 
clude the consideration of motives and does not cancel the 
moral concept of "character." On the contrary, we shall 
see that motives and character themselves become subject 
to objective societal evaluation: the concrete historical 
situation of Soviet society and the goals which it is to at- 
tain "call for" and define specific motives and a specific 
character as moral. The same shift occurs with respect to 
all other ethical values: they are all referred to a new 
general denominator, and it is this new common denomi- 

'In Part I of this study, we have emphasized that, in Soviet Marxism, 
"society" is made into an independent or at least separate power over and 
above its individual members. In speaking here of "society" as the new 
denominator for all ethical values, we refer to this "reification" of society, 
which makes it practically coextensive with "the state." 



214 Ethical Tenets 

nator which gives Soviet ethics rational inner consistency 
and coherence. The individual acts and thinks "morally" 
in so far as he promotes, in his actions and thoughts, the 
objectives and values set by society. Ethical value is in this 
sense "external" to any specific individual action or 
thought, the latter being instruments for attaining an ethi- 
cal goal which is that of society. However, while Soviet 
ethics is essentially instrumentalistic, it is grounded in a 
new historical position which defines the specific function 
of communist morality as surpassing instrumentalism. 

The function of communist morality was authoritatively 
defined in Lenin's address to the Third All-Russian Con- 
gress of the Communist Youth in 1920,^ as (1) the nega- 
tion of the traditional (bourgeois and prebourgeois) mor- 
ality, that is, the rejection of all ethical values and princi- 
ples based on transcendental (religious) sanction and /or 
"idealistic" propositions (Lenin makes no substantive dis- 
tinction between these two ethics) ; and (2) the affirmation 
of a new "communist" morality, which is in its entirety 
subordinated to the interests of the proletarian class strug- 
gle. The principles of this morality are to be derived from 
the requirements and objectives of this struggle. It must 
be noted that this exposition of communist morality does 
not preclude the "taking over" of "bourgeois" ethical 
values if and when they coincide with the needs of the re- 
spective stage of the class struggle. It must also be noted 
that the avowedly "instrumentalist" character of commu- 
nist morality (to serve the interests of the proletariat in the 

* Sochineniia (Works) (3d ed., 30 vols.; Moscow, Institut Lenina, 1928- 
37), XXX, 403-17. 



Soviet Externalization of Values 215 

class struggle) is, according to Lenin, directed toward a 
goal which would surpass tlie pragmatist level: the pur- 
pose of morality is "to raise human society to a higher 
stage and to liberate it from exploitation." 

As to the specific content of communist morality: "For 
the communist, the entire morality consists in the firm 
solidarity and discipline [of the class struggle] and in the 
conscious struggle of the masses against the exploiters." ^ 
Lenin's definition points up the absence of all specifically 
ethical values apart from and outside the class struggle 
(a necessary result of the historical position of communist 
morality), and, at the same time, indicates the direction in 
which these values will subsequently be concretized. 
"Solidarity and discipline" focus communist ethics on the 
rigid work morale of the Stalinist period, while the empha- 
sis on the conscious struggle (reiterated throughout Lenin's 
address) reveals the strongly "intellectualist" character 
of Soviet ethics — learning, training, the systematic and 
methodical appropriation of the technical and cultural 
knowledge accumulated in civilization is made one of the 
foremost prerequisites for the building of communism. In 
this respect, too, Soviet ethical philosophy claims to be 
the heir of the Western rationalist tradition: the attain- 
ment of freedom, in other words, the realization of man, is 
to be based on knowledge and reason. 

Lenin's primitive and brutal definition of communist 

morality presupposes a complex historical dialectic which 

is to raise these ethics from the realm of relative to that of 

absolute validity. The "higher stage of human society" 

"Ibid., XXX, 413. 



216 Ethical Tenets 

(the stage of total and universal liberation) would cancel 
the specific character of communist morality and make the 
instrument an end in itself. 

The instrumentalistic character of Soviet ethics has been 
made the main target of Western criticism, and this criti- 
cism has been focused on the principle that "the end justi- 
fies the means" — a principle which is considered as un- 
ethical in itself. However, Soviet ethics aims beyond instru- 
mentalism, and the critique in terms of the means-end 
relation misses the target. The suprapragmatic tendencies 
of Soviet ethics derive from the specific features of Soviet 
instrumentalism. 

The society which provides the general denominator 
for Soviet ethics is, according to Soviet philosophy, de- 
fined by two essential characteristics (they were more 
fully discussed in Part I): (1) It is supposed to be or- 
ganized in such a way that it has established the precondi- 
tions for the free development and fulfillment of all hu- 
mane faculties for all its members (by the abolition of 
private control over the means of production and, thereby, 
of exploitation and class justice). (2) Owing to the par- 
ticular circumstances of "backwardness" and "capitalist 
environment," these conditions for freedom have not yet 
been fully utilized for the immediate benefit of the indi- 
viduals. Repression, scarcity, and unproductive use of the 
productive forces (production of armaments) still prevail 
(marks of the lower stage of socialism as distinguished 
from the higher stage of communism). The conditions of 
freedom are thus still preconditions; their realization de- 



Soviet Externalization of Values 217 

pends on the continued exertion of the still unfree individ- 
uals. 

The interrelation of these two conceptions of society 
gives Soviet instrumentalism its specific dynamic. The first 
(affirmative) conception furnishes a set of objective ethi- 
cal standards, that is to say, those pertaining to a fully 
developed classless society ("communism"). These stand- 
ards recapture the traditional ideal of Western civilization 
— freedom, justice, and the all-round development of the 
individual — condensed in the formula: "From each ac- 
cording to his abilities; to each according to his needs." 
The formula reestablishes the individual as the ultimate 
point of reference for ethical norms: what furthers the 
free development of the individual is good. The extreme 
relativism inherent in this norm is supposedly freed from 
harmful connotations by the socialist institutions: the gen- 
eral will is to coincide with the will of all individuals; the 
inequality of needs and faculties becomes an absolute 
value if and when it no longer involves the development of 
one individual at the expense of others. The prospective 
end result of socialist morality thus bestows upon Soviet 
ethics the dignity of universally valid and objective 
norms, culminating in the principle of solidarity and co- 
operation. Instrumentalism terminates in ethical absolut- 
ism; partisanship and class morality are proclaimed as 
mere vehicles (although the only historical vehicles) for 
the realization of humanitas. These standards of the fu- 
ture are then related to the actual situation of Soviet so- 
ciety, but they retain their "transcendental" connotation, 



218 Ethical Tenets 

that is, the image of a future which will compensate the in- 
dividuals for their present sufferings and frustrations. So- 
viet ethics here contains a "safety valve": the image of 
the future seems to perform a function corresponding to 
that of the transcendental elements of Western ethics — in 
this image we seem to have a real Soviet substitute for re- 
ligion. However, there is an essential difference from 
which Soviet ethics derives much of its appeal. The trans- 
cendental goal in Soviet ethics is a historical one, and the 
road to its attainment a historical process — the result of a 
concrete social and political development. Final human 
fulfillment and gratification are not oriented on the "inner 
self" or the hereafter, but on the "next stage" of the actual 
development of society. And the truth of this conception 
is to be, not a matter of faith, but a matter of scientific 
analysis and reason — of necessity.^ 

Unquestionably, this official argument for Soviet ethics 
serves well to justify a repressive regime which may use it 
only as an ideological veil for the perpetuation of the 
present state. However, what holds true for the Soviet 
use of Marxism in general ^ may also be applied to its 

' To be sure, the ideology of progress, which rationalizes the present 
deprivation, suffering, and repression as preconditions of their eventual 
disappearance, is also inherent in the Western bourgeois tradition — as a 
matter of fact, it is even "taken over" from this tradition. However, two 
facts constitute the decisive difference: (1) The religion of technical- 
scientific progress has never been sanctioned as the avowed goal and ex- 
pression of humanist development. The schools of thought which came 
closest to this philosophy (for example, that of Saint-Simon) were always 
considered as suspect and "heretic". (2) By the same token. Western ethics 
refused to accept the straight correspondence between (technical) progress 
and ethics. Here too, the tension (and even conflict) between these two 
remained itself a mainspring of morality. 

" See Part I of this study. 



Soviet Externalization of Values 219 

ethical philosophy: once it has become an essential part of 
the psychical and behavioral structure of the individuals, 
once it has become a factor of social cohesion and integra- 
tion, it assumes a momentum of its own and moves under 
its own weight. Only as such a factor, not as an objective 
of the Soviet leadership, is Soviet ethics considered in the 
context of this study. The claim that it is founded on ob- 
jective historical necessity gives Soviet ethics an extreme 
rigidity but also a greatly increased scope and intensity. 
Precisely because it is relative to an absolute end, in this 
sense "outside" any specific individual action and posi- 
tion, Soviet ethics regards as immoral all actions and posi- 
tions which run counter to or retard the alleged historical 
necessity. Many areas of human existence, which, in the 
Western tradition, are morally "neutral," thus become 
subject to moral evaluation, for example, the area of sci- 
entific and artistic pursuits. A scientific theory, though it 
may be scientifically corroborated, may be condemned if 
it is deemed to be detrimental to communist morality. The 
epistemological notion of truth (theoretical reason) and 
the moral notion of good (practical reason) tend to con- 
verge — just as, in the sphere of art and literature, aesthetic 
truth tends to converge with epistemological truth. ^ They 
converge in the medium of politics which coordinates the 
traditionally separated spheres of human existence as well 
as the values reflecting this separation. Moreover, the new 
historical basis of Soviet ethics also necessitates the ap- 
plication of moral judgments to "neutral" areas in the 
private sphere — again through the medium of politics. A 

' See pp. 132 f. above. 



220 Ethical Tenets 

love relationship with a "class enemy" is morally con- 
demnable because it is politically "wrong" — particularly 
if it is a true love relationship. For then it engages the en- 
tire existence of the individual and not only the "private" 
part of his existence, and thus it affects his relationship to 
others, to work, and to the state. Consequently, in so far as 
ethical standards apply to it at all, the same standards as 
the political ones apply — there is no dual morality. Soviet 
ethics is political instrumentalism — but so that the politi- 
cal sphere is not one among others, but rather that it is 
the sphere of human realization. 

Politicalization of ethics stands at the beginning and at 
the end of Western philosophy. In both, Plato and Hegel, 
the autonomy of ethics succumbs to (or rather is trans- 
formed into) the autonomy of the res publica, the state. 
And in both, not relativistic pragmatism but absolutism is 
the result. If the "idea of the good" demands the Polls for 
its realization or approximation, then the good is attainable 
only in the bios politicos; and the Polis embodies the 
absolute ethical standards. It embodies them — which 
means that it is not the ultimate good itself. However, for 
the realization of human existence, the moral good pre- 
supposes the political good; and the latter is defined in 
terms of the resources, institutions, and relationships 
which allow the best possible realization of man (of his 
essence as a "rational being"). According to this concep- 
tion, the ethical conflict is, not between the (moral) indi- 
vidual and the (amoral) Polis, not between two antago- 
nistic moralities, but between moral and immoral behavior 
in the Polis. Socrates represents, not the right of the indi- 



Soviet Externalization of Values 221 

vidual against that of the Polis, but the right against the 
wrong Polis. It is not private freedom of thought and con- 
science that is at stake, but political thought and con- 
science, that is, the Polis, which is accepted by both Socra- 
tes and his judges. Ethical and political philosophy, ethics 
and politics, have a common epistemological basis: truth 
in ethics and politics derives from knowledge of the ob- 
jectively true order in nature and society. Ethical truth is 
thus political truth, and political truth is absolute truth. 
Essentially the same conception survives in Marxian the- 
ory, especially in the treatment of ideology. We have noted 
that Soviet statements on intellectual culture recall, even 
in their formulation, Plato's Republic and Laws.^ 

In order to understand the full implications of the So- 
viet conception, it is advisable to identify its deep roots in 
the very civilization which it challenges. The usage of the 
word "totalitarianism" as a catchall for the Platonic, He- 
gelian, Fascist, and Marxian philosophies readily serves to 
cover up the historical link between totalitarianism and its 
opposite, and the historical reasons which caused classical 
humanism to turn into its negation. 

As long as the humanistic values, and particularly free- 
dom, are not translated into reality, their very content re- 
mains subject to the conditions under which they can be 
translated into reality. This translation is a political one 
because it involves society as a whole and not only the 
private individual. The realization of freedom is thus an 
objective process in a twofold sense: (1) it implies the 
transformation of an established society, and (2) this 

* See p. 132 above. 



222 Ethical Tenets 

transformation depends on the respective historical condi- 
tions. On both grounds, the realization of freedom presup- 
poses thought and action (theory and practice) in accord- 
ance with the historical truth, that is, with objective reason. 
Then this theory and practice, and not the preservation of 
isolated individual freedom, appears as the primary ethi- 
cal task and ethical value. The verification of the "right" 
theory and practice, the validation of objective reason, 
may be sought in idealistic ontology or in dialectical ma- 
terialism — the two systems are on opposite philosophical 
poles, but they both imply the transitional absorption of 
freedom into historical and political necessity, that is, into 
objective reason. 

The common ground is laid in Hegel's philosophy. We 
have pointed out that the Soviet Marxist notion of free- 
dom restates Engels's paraphrase of Hegel's conception: 
freedom is "recognition of necessity" and action in ac- 
cordance with recognized necessity.^*^ It is more than ques- 
tionable whether this paraphrase gives the real meaning 
of Hegel's notion; still, it is true that, in Hegel's system, 
the private sphere of freedom is dissolved into the public 
sphere of State and Law, and subjective rights are dis- 
solved into objective truths. It has often been remarked 
that there is no special discipline of "ethics" in the other- 
wise all-embracing Hegelian system. The power which 
makes for this "disappearance" of independent ethical 
philosophy and for the dissolution of private ethical values 
is History. 

This is the point where the politicalization of ethics, 

^ See p. 152 above. 



Soviet Externalization of Values 223 

which grew out of the Western tradition, consolidated into 
a new system of thought claiming to be the heir as well as 
the adversary, the fulfillment as well as the negation, of 
this tradition. The progress of Western civilization itself 
placed on the agenda the translation of internal values 
into external conditions, of subjective ideas into objective 
reality, and of ethics into politics. If Hegel interpreted 
Reason in terms of history, he anticipated, in an idealistic 
formulation, the Marxian transition from theory to prac- 
tice. The historical process has created the preconditions, 
both material and intellectual, for the realization of Rea- 
son (Hegel) in the organization of society (Marx), for 
the convergence of freedom and necessity. However, free- 
dom which converges with (or is even absorbed by) neces- 
sity is not the final form of freedom. At this ultimate point, 
Hegel and Marx again agree. The realm of true freedom 
is beyond the realm of necessity. Freedom as well as neces- 
sity are redefined. For Hegel, ultimate freedom resides in 
the realm of the Absolute Spirit. For Marx, the realm of 
necessity is to be mastered by a society whose reproduction 
has been subjected to the control of the individuals, and 
freedom is the free play of individual faculties outside the 
realm of necessary labor. Freedom is "confined" to free 
time — but free time is, quantitatively and qualitatively, 
the very content of life. Moreover, according to Marx, the 
historical process, governed by objective laws, generates 
socialism as the rational organization of the conditions 
for freedom through the political activity of the prole- 
tariat. Historical necessity thus turns ethics into politics, 
and insight into historical necessity anchors politics on 



224 Ethical Tenets 

"scientific" grounds and gives politics an objective charac- 
ter. On such ground, Soviet ethical philosophy presents 
itself as the very opposite of "bourgeois" opportunism, 
pragmatism, and irrationalism — as the protagonist of Rea- 
son against the destroyers of Reason. The attack on bour- 
geois ethical philosophy is waged on behalf of the "be- 
trayed" rationalistic tradition. 

The struggle against bourgeois ethics becomes the more 
vital for Soviet social philosophy the more the two seem 
to have certain features in common. The progressive, criti- 
cal trends in bourgeois philosophy become the chief target 
of the attack, and the chief indictment leveled against them 
is that of the defamation of Reason. Nietzsche and Freud, 
Schopenhauer and Dewey, pragmatism, existentialism, and 
logical positivism are branded as irrationalistic, antiintel- 
lectualistic — and by this token "reactionary," "immoral," 
and "imperialistic." According to Soviet interpretation, 
they are necessarily so — in their objective historical func- 
tion — no matter what the personal intentions and convic- 
tions of the respective philosophers may have been. For 
any compromise with the historically surpassed values 
of bourgeois society, any attempt to deny the objective 
validity of the historically defined direction of progress 
and of man's capacity to grasp it, appears to this concep- 
tion as justification of an obsolescent social system. 

It is not necessary here to follow the course of this criti- 
cism: we shall merely attempt to show the method which 
it applies. (It is largely the same that prevails in the Marx- 
ist critique of capitalism and that gives this critique its 
rational appeal). One of the main elements of this method 



Soviet Externalization of Values 225 

is to assume the validity of the adversary's ideas and ob- 
jectives, to accept them, as it were, and then to show that 
they are unrealizable within the theoretical and societal 
framework in which the adversary operates. Consequently, 
they are being betrayed, vitiated, or made illusory by 
bourgeois philosophy and its society. In the case of ethical 
philosophy, the two chief targets of Soviet criticism are: 
{a) the effort of contemporary Western ethics to come to 
grips with the concrete existential situation of the individ- 
ual and to derive from this situation the conceptual and 
practical tools for progress in freedom and reason; and 
(6) the attempt to give ethics a scientific (logical or ex- 
perimental) basis. These objectives, according to the So- 
viet critique, not only cannot be attained by bourgeois 
ethical theorists, but, in the effort to attain them they are 
being turned into their opposite. In so far as progressive 
bourgeois ethics works with the institutions and ideologies 
of capitalist society, it sustains the very forces which pre- 
vent progress. Thus denying the higher historical stage of 
reason and freedom which implies the elimination of capi- 
talism, this philosophy is irrational and abstract where it 
claims to be rational and concrete: it retains an obsolete 
definition of reason, and it disregards (abstracts from) 
the concrete historical conditions of freedom. By virtue 
of this position, progressive bourgeois ethics is regressive 
even where it is critical of the established society. More- 
over, Soviet theory rejects Western philosophy the more 
violently the more the latter is critical, because, in the 
Soviet view, the bourgeois critique of present-day society, 
while pointing up its repressive features, at the same time 



226 Ethical Tenets 

diverts the struggle against the causes of repression. The 
scientific devices and paraphernalia of this philosophy are 
alleged to be spurious and to fulfill the function of ob- 
scuring and withdrawing attention from the real issues, 
that is, the stagnation and the destructiveness of the capi- 
talist system. We shall illustrate this interpretation by the 
Soviet treatment of Dewey's pragmatism. 

There seems to be a close affinity between Marx's and 
Dewey's reorientation of theory on practice. However, the 
Soviet critique emphasizes that Marxism and pragmatism 
are not only essentially different but opposed to each other. 
As formulated by Shariia, according to the Marxist thesis, 
"not that which is useful is true, but that which is true is 
useful." ^^ The formulation refers to Lenin's Materialism 
and Empiriocriticism. There, Lenin had stated that to the 
Marxist, practice is the criterion of truth only in so far as 
it is itself derived from true knowledge and cognition,^^ 
and in so far as it is the practice of that social group which 
is alone capable of recognizing and fulfilling the truth, 
namely, the class-conscious proletariat. The Marxian unity 
of theory and practice presupposes the existence of an ob- 
jective, even "absolute" truth, to be demonstrated by dia- 
lectical materialism (for example, the truth about the po- 
tentialities and prospects of a society, and thus the truth 
about the potentialities and prospects of freedom and 
"growth"). The content of this truth is historical, and so is 
its accessibility and its realization, but these relative ele- 

" P. Shariia, nekotorykh voprosakh kommunisticheskoi morali (On 
Several Problems of Communist Morality) (Moscow, Gospolitizdat, 1951), 
p. 220. 

"^ Sochineniia (Works), XIII, 112-17. 



Soviet Externalization of Values 227 

merits are the characteristics of the objective reality and of 
the objective truth about this reality. According to Lenin, 
dialectics "includes" relativism, but does not "reduce it- 
self" to relativism; relative are only the historical condi- 
tions for the "approach" to and for the realization of the 
objective truth/^ Applied to morality, this position permits 
not only the rejection of certain supposedly unconditional 
moral principles as ideological distortions of the objective 
truth, but also the acceptance of certain "elementally prin- 
ciples" of human morality independent of class content.^* 
Since the rejection of the moral libertinism of the early 
twenties, Soviet ethical philosophy places increasing em- 
phasis on the fact that the Marxian thesis, according to 
which the societal existence of man determines his con- 
sciousness, does not vitiate the validity of general ethical 
norms. For no matter how different the historical modes 
of societal existence are, certain basic relationships and 
behavior patterns are common to all forms of civilized so- 
ciety, and they are expressed in certain general "rules of 
ethical conduct" which are valid for all men, regardless 
of class. The Soviet Marxist insistence on the general 
validity of ethical principles closely parallels the Soviet 
Marxist position on language and logic; it was this same 
argument that was applied in the defense of formal logic 
against the attempts to dissolve the latter into dialectical 
logic,^^ and also against the class doctrine of language. 
These ideological trends express the development by 

''Ibid., XIII, 107-12. 

" Shariia, O nekotorykh voprosakh kommunisticheskoi morali, chap. VIII. 
See also pp. 63 f. 

^^ In the logic discussion of 1950-51 ; see Part I of this study, pp. 148 f. 
above. 



228 Ethical Tenets 

virtue of which the Soviet state loses its unique revolution- 
ary position and partakes of the organizational and be- 
havioral pattern characteristic of contemporary industrial 
civilization. At this stage, long-range rationalization, effi- 
ciency, and calculability become primary economic and 
political requirements. The stress on objective truths in 
ethics belongs to the recent efforts to bring the ideology 
in line with the new stage of Soviet society. But the latter 
also requires insistence on the claim that the Soviet so- 
ciety alone is on the right historical road toward the real- 
ization of these truths. The objective principles of Soviet 
ethics are thus of a twofold character: they claim (1) to 
refer to the moral principles valid for any form of civilized 
society, and (2) to pertain to the socialist society which 
alone can realize genuine freedom and justice. From the 
first position Soviet moral philosophy assails all bourgeois 
ethics labeled prefascist or fascist which deny universal 
moral principles in favor of such amoral forces as Life, 
Will to Power, Eros, and so forth. The second position is 
the center of the attack against Dewey. 

The assault against "bourgeois irrationalism" is par- 
ticularly illuminating because it reveals the traits common 
to the Soviet and Western rationality, namely, the prev- 
alence of technological elements over humanistic ones. 
Schopenhauer and Nietzsche, the various schools of "vi- 
talism" (Lebensphilosophie) , existentialism, and depth 
psychology differ and even conflict in most essential as- 
pects ; however, they are akin in that they explode the tech- 
nological rationality of modern civilization. They do so by 
pointing up the psychical and biological forces beneath this 



Soviet Externalization of Values 229 

rationality and the unredeemable sacrifices which it exacts 
from man. The result is a transvaluation of values which 
shatters the ideology of progress — not by romanticist and 
sentimental regression, but by breaking into tabooed 
dimensions of bouregois society itself. This transvaluation 
acts upon precisely those values which Soviet society must 
protect at all cost: the ethical value of competitive per- 
formance, socially necessary labor, self-perpetuating work 
discipline, postponed and repressed happiness. Thus, So- 
viet Marxism, in its fight against "bourgeois values," can- 
not recognize and accept the most destructive critique of 
these values in the "bourgeois camp" itself; instead, it has 
to deny these critics by isolating and ridiculing the (ob- 
viously) regressive aspects of their philosophy. 

The attack against Dewey takes a different direction. 
Since his pragmatism does not recognize any objective 
evaluation which condemns bourgeois society as histori- 
cally obsolescent, his effort to overcome the ideological 
limits of bourgeois ethics must necessarily end in con- 
formistic relativism. Dewey opposes to the unscientific 
absolutism of the ethical idealists the infinite plurality of 
existential situations, experiences, and aspirations, each 
with its own potentialities of "growth" and therefore with 
its own values. However, such a plurality, according to So- 
viet criticism, is not per se a ground for positive ethical 
evaluation. It can provide such a ground only where the 
society which integrates the plurality of situations and 
goals affords the real possibility of free "growth." Now 
Marxism maintains that precisely such a possibility can- 
not exist in the "declining" bourgeois society — except in 



230 Ethical Tenets 

marginal cases and at the expense of others. The refusal 
to transcend beyond this society into its "objective" his- 
torical future therefore vitiates Dewey's efforts to over- 
come a conformistic ethical relativism. To be sure, Dewey's 
pragmatism does not exclude social change and reform: 
they are to be promoted by education for true and full 
knowledge, and this knowledge in turn is to guide gradual 
reform. However, this program is self-contradictory, ac- 
cording to the Soviet critics; society cannot grant the edu- 
cational facilities and rights to a knowledge which would 
make for the destruction of this society. This situation 
compels Dewey's philosophy to accept implicitly (and per- 
haps even against the intentions of Dewey himself) the 
standards and goals prevalent in the established society. 
Moreover, it also condemns Dewey's attempt to found eth- 
ics on a scientific basis. The frame of reference within 
which Dewey's propositions are to be verified is the institu- 
tional and ideological system of bourgeois society, which is 
itself in need of "verification." Short of such transcending 
verification (which would show that the framework is 
faulty), Dewey's "science of conduct" amounts simply to a 
description (and even justification) of socially prevalent 
conduct. The refusal to extend the scientific method into the 
historical future, which is accessible to science through the 
analysis of the fundamental trends in the present society, 
confines pragmatism to a mere description of what is.^^ 

^'Shariia, O nekotorykh voprosakh kommunisticheskoi morali (On Several 
Problems of Communist Morality), pp. 24, 85 f., 223. 



11. The Principles of Communist Morality 



ACCORDING TO the Soviet interpretation of its ethical posi- 
tion, we should expect two levels of moral philosophy: one 
defining the "elementary principles of human morality in- 
dependent of class content," and another showing the ex- 
pression of these principles, and their specific realization 
in "communist morality." However, we are confronted 
with the problem that there seems to be no systematic expo- 
sition of the former which could adequately provide rep- 
resentative material for analysis. The lack of any system- 
atic derivation of the "elementary principles of human 
morality" is, of course, inherent in the politicalization of 
ethics: the more the moral values become political values 
and the more moral behavior becomes right political be- 
havior, the less room there is for independent ethical prin- 
ciples, or rather for the derivation of their objective valid- 
ity. Still, Soviet ethics claims objective validity in so far 
as the specific goals of Soviet society are to coincide with 
the universal interest of mankind, namely, the interest in 
the realization of freedom for all. But this is also the claim 
of "bourgeois ethics." Formally, the "elementary princi- 
ples of human morality" assumed by Soviet moral philoso- 
phy will thus coincide with those assumed by its antagonist. 



232 Ethical Tenets 

By the same token, the universally valid principles tend to 
merge with the specific principles of communist morality. 
Within the context of Soviet ethics, the former receive their 
real significance from the latter, which in turn are defined 
in accord with the development of Soviet society. There- 
fore, presently, we shall discuss these principles in terms 
of their social and political function. And from the first 
step on, we are confronted with the fact that, to a striking 
degree, the specific principles of communist morality as 
well as the universal "principles of human morality" re- 
semble those of bourgeois ethics. Just as the Soviet consti- 
tution, in the proclamation of the "Fundamental Rights 
and Duties of Citizens" seems to copy the "bourgeois- 
democratic" ideology and practice, so do the Soviet state- 
ments of ethical principles. It is needless to emphasize the 
diff^erence between ideology and reality — the fact of imi- 
tation or assimilation remains. The world-historical coex- 
istence of the two competing systems, which defines their 
political dynamic, also defines the social function of their 
ethics. 

In going through the enumerations of the highest moral 
values given in Soviet ethical philosophy, it is difficult to 
find a single moral idea or syndrome of moral ideas that 
is not common to Western ethics. Care, responsibility, love, 
patriotism, diligence, honesty, industriousness, the injunc- 
tions against transgressing the happiness of one's fellow 
men, consideration for the common interest — there is noth- 
ing in this catalogue of values that could not be included in 
the ethics of the Western tradition. The similarity continues 
to prevail if we look at the specific principles of communist 



Principles of Communist Morality 233 

morality.^ The hierarchy of values stated by Lenin in 1920 
is almost literally repeated; the moral norms added to it 
are hardly more than a reformulation with respect to the 
situation of a fully and firmly established Soviet state. So- 
viet patriotism; national pride in the Soviet state; interna- 
tional, national, and individual solidarity; respect for 
socialist property; love for socialist labor; love, loyalty, 
and responsibility for the socialist family and for the Party 
— in order to be able to evaluate the actual function of 
these commonplace notions, we have to place them in the 
concrete context in which they are illustrated in Soviet eth- 
ics. This context is provided by the discussion of work 
relations, marriage and family matters, leisure activities, 
and education, and by their presentation in literature and 
in the entertainment industry. The moral values converge 
on the subordination of pleasure to duty — the duty to put 
everything one has into service for the State, the Party, and 
society. Translated into private morality, this means strict 
monogamic relations, directed toward the production and 
raising of children; discipline and competitive perform- 
ance in the established division of functions; and leisure 
activities as relaxation from work and re-creation of energy 
for work rather than as an end in itself. It is in every re- 
spect a competitive work morality, proclaimed with a 
rigidity surpassing that of bourgeois morality — softened or 
hardened according to the specific interests of the Soviet 
state (for example, softened as in the treatment of illegiti- 
mate children, or if rigidity comes into conflict with the 

^See also N. I. Boldyrev, V. I. Lenin i I. V. Stalin o vospitanii kommu- 
nisticheskoi morali (V. I. Lenin and J. V. Stalin on the Training of a Com- 
munist Morality) (Moscow, Pravda, 1951). 



234 Ethical Tenets 

requirements of political loyalty, work efficiency, party 
discipline, and so forth; hardened as in the punishment for 
theft or "sabotage" of state property). 

One of the most representative exhortations designed to 
"strengthen Communist morale" ^ is entirely centered on 
work morale. The "highest principles" governing this mo- 
rale are said to be Soviet patriotism and love for the moth- 
erland, which are joined with "proletarian international- 
ism." They serve as justification for the complete endorse- 
ment of work as the very content of the individual's whole 
life. Not only is work itself honor and glory, and "socialist 
competition" an unconditional duty, all work, under social- 
ism, has a creative character, and any degradation of man- 
ual labor impairs Communist education. In Soviet society, 
"love for one's work" is per se one of the highest principles 
of Communist morality, and work per se is declared to be 
one of the most important factors in the building of moral 
qualities. In view of the moral value of work in a socialist 
society, the differences between intellectual and manual 
labor, between elevated and lowly work, become irrelevant. 

This moral equalization of the various modes and 
spheres of work is of the greatest significance for defining 
the actual function of Soviet ethics. Marxian theory made 
an essential distinction between work as the realization of 
human potentialities and work as "alienated labor"; the 
entire sphere of material production, of mechanized and 
standardized performances, is considered as one of aliena- 
tion. By virtue of this distinction, the realization of free- 

'"Neustanno vospityvat' sovetskikh liudei v dukhe kommunisticheskoi 
morali" (Unceasingly Educate Soviet People in the Spirit of Communist 
Morality), Kommunist (Communist), 1954, No. 13 (September), pp. 3-12. 



Principles of Communist Morality 235 

dom is attributed to a social organization of labor funda- 
mentally different from the prevailing one, to a society 
where work as the free play of human faculties has become 
a "necessity," a "vital need" for society, while work for 
procuring the necessities of life no longer constitutes the 
working day and the occupation of the individual. It is in 
the last analysis the abolition of alienation which, for 
Marx, defines and justifies socialism as the "higher stage" 
of civilization. And socialism in turn defines a new human 
existence: its content and value are to be determined by 
free time rather than labor time, that is to say, man comes 
into his own only outside and "beyond" the entire realm of 
material production for the mere necessities of life. Social- 
ization of production is to reduce the time and energy spent 
in this realm to a minimum, and to maximize time and en- 
ergy for the development and satisfaction of individual 
needs in the realm of freedom. 

In contrast with this conception, Soviet work morale does 
not recognize any difference in the value of alienated and 
nonalienated labor: the individual is supposed to invest 
all his energy and all his aspirations in whatever function 
he finds himself or is put by the authorities. It is this oblit- 
eration of the decisive difference between alienated and 
nonalienated labor which enables Soviet Marxism to pro- 
claim for the Soviet system the full development of the all- 
round individual as against the mutilated individual of 
Western society.^ But application of Marx's and Engels's 
notion of a communist society to the Soviet-socialist con- 

^Igor' Semenovich Kon, Razvitie lichnosti pri sotsializme (The Develop- 
ment of Personality under Socialism) (Leningrad, Vsesoiuznoe obshchestvff 
po rasprostraneniiu politicheskikh i nauchnykh znanii, 1954), pp. 3 ff. 



236 Ethical Tenets 

struction of communism only points up the contrast be- 
tween the Marxian and the Soviet notion: in the latter, the 
full development of the individual is that of the all-round 
laborer, investing his individuality in his labor. It is 
claimed that the "very character of labor under socialism 
has changed"; consequently, "every person" is "required 
to work according to his capabilities for the good of the 
people and for himself." There is nothing socialist or com- 
munist in this formula — as long as the work according to 
his capabilities is still work within "the realm of neces- 
sity," that is, as long as it is not yet the free play of human 
faculties. 

The considerable relaxation which has recently been pro- 
claimed and implemented has not eliminated the merging 
of technical and moral standards, of labor productivity and 
ethics, efficiency and happiness. Under the old slogan of the 
fight against the remnants of capitalist influence in the 
mentality of the people, a systematic struggle is still being 
fought against all libertarian tendencies which might en- 
danger the objectives of the regime. 

Soviet Marxism links the survival of capitalist elements 
to the continuation of the "capitalist environment." The 
Western powers are accused of trying to reactivate those 
remnants of the past which still have a foothold inside the 
Soviet state. But the struggle against capitalist ideologies 
and attitudes has significance primarily for domestic pol- 
icy: it is to counteract the danger of relaxation involved 
in growing productivity. Moreover, and perhaps even more 
important, it is to improve and augment a well-trained, 
skilled, and disciplined labor force. The fight against the 



Principles of Communist Morality 237 

heritage of the past thus greatly resembles early capital- 
ism's own fight against precapitalist values and attitudes.* 

The ideological reeducation is still centered on the "so- 
cialist" attitude toward work, instead of the negative atti- 
tude said to be characteristic of and appropriate to the 
worker in an exploitative society. The demand for positive 
identification of the worker with his work, the pressure for 
relentless "socialist emulation," continues in all fields. 
According to Soviet statements, the pressure seems to be 
successful : 

In the development of the new attitude toward work, socialist com- 
petition played a major role. From the first "Communist Satur- 
days" (unpaid work) born in the years of civil war, to the storm 
brigades of the period of the country's large-scale industrializa- 
tion, to the mass movements of pioneers in industrial innovation — 
such are the main stages in the development of socialist competi- 
tion. If participants in Communist Saturdays were only advanced 
groups of workers, socialist competition and the storm-brigade 
movement in the late 1920s and early 1930s already encompassed 
the greater part of the workers who participate in socialist competi- 
tion, and the number of innovation pioneers among them increases 
incessantly.'^ 

* M. M. Rozental, Marksistskii diahkticheskii metod (Marxist Dialectical 
Method) (Moscow, Gospolitizdat, 1951), p. 303. 

* G. Glezerman, "Tvorcheskaia rol' narodnykh mass v razvitii sotsialisti- 
cheskogo obshchestva" (The Creative Role of the National Masses in the 
Development of Socialist Society), Kommunist (Communist), 1955, No. 3 
(February), p. 48. In an article on "Recent Trends in Soviet Labor Policy" 
(Monthly Labor Review, July, 1956) Jerzy G. Glicksman draws attention 
to the fact that "Stakhanovism undenvent modifications." As a result of the 
rapid technological progress after the Second World War, emphasis shifted 
from "physical effort, individual pacemaking, and record breaking to the 
search for new working processes leading to technical progress and that 
mastering and widespread application of these processes" (p. 6). However 
important this modification may be, it does not change the function of Stak- 
hanovism as streamlining of alienated labor. 



238 Ethical Tenets 

Stakhanovism is presented as creating the preconditions for 
the "all-round development of the personality." ^ Just as 
the withering away of the state is to be preceded by the 
strengthening of the state, so the abolition of toil is to be 
preceded by the intensification of toil. 

By definition, there is no alienated labor in Soviet so- 
ciety because production is nationalized. But nationaliza- 
tion does not preclude alienation. The latter prevails as 
long as (socially necessary) labor time is the measure of 
social wealth. 

For true wealth is the developed productivity of all individuals. 
Then, no longer labor time but free time (disposable time) is the 
measure of wealth. Using labor time as the measure of wealth 
places wealth itself on the foundation of poverty . . . and makes 
the entire time of the individual into labor time, thereby degrading 
him to a mere laborer, subsuming him under his labor. The most 
highly developed machinery therefore forces the laborer now to 
work longer than the savage did, or longer than he himself did 
with the most primitive, the simplest tools.^ 

The denial of alienation in Soviet ethics may at first 
appear as a mere subtlety of abstract theoretizing; how- 
ever, upon closer analysis, it reveals the concrete substance 
of Soviet ethical philosophy. In canceling the notion of 
alienation as applicable to Soviet society, Soviet ethics re- 
moves the moral ground from under the protest against a 

*Ts. A. Stepanian, "Usloviia i puti perekhoda ot sotsializma k kom- 
munizmu" (The Conditions and the Paths of the Transition from Socialism 
to Communism), in sovetskom sotsialisticheskom obshchestve (On Soviet 
Socialist Society), ed. by F. Konstantinov (Moscow, Gospolitizdat, 1948), 
p. 502. 

'Marx, Grundrisse der Kritik der Politischen Oekonomie (Berlin, Dietz, 
1953), p. 596. 



Principles of Communist Morality 239 

repressive social organization of labor and adjusts the 
moral structure and the character of the individual to this 
organization. Laboring in the service of the Soviet state is 
per se ethical — the true vocation of Soviet man. The indi- 
vidual needs and aspirations are disciplined; renumeration 
and toil is the road to salvation. The theory and practice 
which were to lead to a new life in freedom are turned into 
instruments of training men for a more productive, more 
intense, and more rational mode of labor. What the Cal- 
vinist work morale achieved though strengthening irra- 
tional anxiety about forever-hidden divine decisions, is 
here accomplished through more rational means: a more 
satisfying human existence is to be the reward for the grow- 
ing productivity of labor. And in both cases, far more tell- 
ing economic and physical force guarantee their effective- 
ness. The resemblance is more than incidental: the two 
ethics meet on the common ground of historical "contem- 
poraneousness" — they reflect the need for the incorpora- 
tion of large masses of "backward" people into a new 
social system, the need for the creation of a well-trained, 
disciplined labor force, capable of vesting the pei-petual 
routine of the working day with ethical sanction, producing 
ever more rationally ever increasing amounts of goods, 
while the rational use of these goods for the individual 
needs is ever more delayed by the "circumstances." In this 
sense, Soviet ethics testifies to the similarity between Soviet 
society and capitalist society. The basis for the similarity 
was established in the Stalinist period. 

In the development of Soviet society, the Stalinist period 



240 Ethical Tenets 

is that of industrialization, or rather "industrial civiliza- 
tion" in the sense outlined by Lenin in his last writings,* 
with the far-reaching principal objective of "catching up" 
with and surpassing the level of productivity prevailing in 
the advanced Western countries. Given the starting point for 
industrialization in the backward state of Bolshevik Russia, 
this period would correspond to the early stages of capital- 
ist industrialization, after the "primary accumulation" had 
been completed. 

However, the advantageous position of the "late-comer," 
nationalization of the means of production, central plan- 
ning, and totalitarian control makes it possible for the So- 
viet state to telescope several stages of industrialization, to 
utilize the most rationalized technology and machinery, 
advanced science, and the most intensive working methods 
without being seriously hampered by conflicting private in- 
terests. Soviet ethical philosophy formulates the basic val- 
ues of primary industrialization, but it also expresses, 
simultaneously, the diff^erent (and even conflicting) require- 
ments of the later stages. Soviet ethics must combine the 
need for "primary" disciplining of the laboring classes 
with the need for individual initiative and responsibility — 
the standardized compliance of the human tool with the 
intelligent imagination of the engineer. It must foster a 
morale conducive to a long working day as well as to a 
high productivity of labor, to quantitative as well as quali- 
tative performance. The conditions of backwardness which 
defined Soviet industrialization have met with those of ad- 
vanced technology (eighteenth-century with twentieth- 

"* See pp. 48 f . in Part I of this study. 



Principles of Communist Morality 241 

century industrialism) — in the political institutions as well 
as in the ethics of Soviet society. Administrative absolutism 
faces the effective constitutionalism of the democratic 
West, a privileged authoritatian bureaucracy must be re- 
fined and renewed and kept open to ascent from below. This 
is required not only by the need to increase the scope and 
efficiency of the productive apparatus, but also by the ob- 
vious competition with the capabilities and realities of the 
Western world. Increasing cultural and material compen- 
sations for the underlying population are indispensable — 
not only for political reasons, but also on economic 
grounds ; they belong to the "development of the productive 
forces" which constitutes the backbone of long-range Soviet 
policy.^ 

Soviet ethics tries to integrate this diversity of economic 
and political needs and to translate it into a coherent sys- 
tem of moral values. Thus one finds side by side the ex- 
hortation to individual initiative and spontaneity and to 
authoritarian discipline, to Stakhanovist competition and 
to socialist equality; the glorification of work and the glor- 
ification of leisure, of toil and of freedom, of totalitarian 
and of democratic values. Soviet social philosophy reflects 
throughout the objective historical contradiction inherent 
in Soviet society — a contradiction generated by the fact 
that the principles of socialist economy were made into an 
instrument of domination, to be applied to a backward 
country confronted with a far more advanced capitalist 
world. The need for "catching up" with capitalism called 
for enforced and accelerated industrialization as the only 

' See pp. 114, 187 f. above. 



242 Ethical Tenets 

available road to socialism. While the humanist values 
attached to the end of the road became ritualized into ide- 
ology, the values attached to the means, i.e., the values of 
total industrialization, became the really governing values. 
(In Part I of this study,^'' we have speculated on the possi- 
bility that in some not too unforeseeable future the present 
communist parties outside the Soviet orbit — and perhaps 
even within it — may become heirs to the traditional Social 
Democratic parties. Here we seem to hit upon a striking 
parallel in the ideological field. The end recedes, the means 
becomes everything; and the sum total of means is "the 
movement" itself. It absorbs and adorns itself with the 
values of the goal, whose realization "the movement" itself 
delays. Was not this the implicit and explicit philosophy 
of German Social Democracy since Eduard Bernstein?) 
Socialist morality thus succumbs to industrial morality, 
while the various historical stages of the latter are con- 
densed into one comprehensive unit, combining elements 
from the ethics of Calvinism and Puritanism, enlightened 
absolutism and liberalism, nationalism, chauvinism, and 
internationalism, capitalist and socialist values. This is 
the strange syndrome presented by Soviet ethics. 

Within this syndrome, the repressive elements are pre- 
dominant. Many of the rules of conduct in school and home, 
at work and leisure, in private and in public, resemble so 
much their traditional Western counterparts at earlier 
stages that they have the sound of secular sermons docu- 
menting the "spirit of Protestant-capitalist ethics." They 
are not too far from Puritan exhortations to good business. 

" See pp. 73 f . 



Principles of Communist Morality 243 

The praise of the monogamic family and of the joy and 
duty of conjugal love recalls classical "petty-bourgeois ide- 
ology," while the dissolution of the sphere of privacy reflects 
twentieth-century reality. The struggle against prostitution, 
adultery, and divorce evokes the same ethical norms as in 
the West, while the requirements of the birth rate and the 
sustained investment of energy in competitive work per- 
formances are praised as manifestations of Eros. To be 
sure, the public exhortations to combine erotic relations 
with meritorious occupational performance should not be 
taken too seriously: there is evidence of official and semi- 
official ridicule and protest, and of widespread private 
transgression. What is decisive is the general trend, and the 
extent to which the individual's own evaluation of his 
personal relationships agrees with the politically desired 
evaluation. 

Relaxation recently has been widespread, but without 
changing the underlying morality. The trend seems to be 
toward normalization rather than abolition of repression. 
In line with tendencies prevalent in late industrial civili- 
zation, repression is to be "spontaneously" reproduced by 
the repressed individuals; this allows a relaxation of ex- 
ternal, compulsory repression. The popular and official pro- 
tests against the subordination of love to work morale may 
provide an illustration. They are rigidly antilibertarian; 
they emphasize that love, responsibility, family morale, 
and even happiness are duties to the state: 

Underestimation of the theme of love has brought many of our 
film men to the point where they overlook a number of problems 
of immense, primary social importance. A lag is most possible 



244 Ethical Tenets 

precisely in questions of love, the family, and everyday existence, 
where people are not directly part of a larger group. It often hap- 
pens that, at his work, a man seems to be advanced — he is both a 
Stakhanovite and an active person in the community — but in 
his family he demands a rigid domestic regime, he is egotistic 
and coarse or has a thoughtless, irresponsible attitude. We must al- 
ways remember that, sooner or later, this will affect all his working 
and public life and every moral aspect of the man. The sphere 
of private life must not be forgotten. It is essential to mobilize 
all resources of the cinema, including such genres as comedy and 
satire, which scourge with humor and sear with fire the bourgeois 
survivals not only in the people's public, but in their private life.^^ 

The protests thus fall in line with the requirements for 
Soviet discipline in the service of the Soviet state. The 
new principles of sexual morality, which are to reaffirm the 
autonomy of the erotic relationships as against their sub- 
ordination to the work relationships and values of the 
"larger community," actually proclaim the need for a 
more harmonious accommodation of the former to the lat- 
ter. Love is to become a necessity rather than the reflex of 
freedom in the realm of necessity. The law of value, which, 
according to Marx, regulates the exchange relations be- 
tween commodities, is admitted to govern also the relations 
between the individuals. This is most brutally expressed by 
a woman whose talk at the Second Collective Farms Con- 
gress was quoted by Stalin: ^^ 

"M. Shmarova, "On Those Who Do Not Love to Talk About Love," in 
Current Digest of the Soviet Press, V, No. 18 (June 13, 1953), 27 (translated 
from Sovetskoe Iskusstvo [Soviet Art], May 6, 1953). See also Current 
Digest of the Soviet Press, V, No. 25 (August 1, 1953), 17 f. 

"According to S. Wolfson, in Changing Attitudes in Soviet Russia: The 
Family in the U.S.S.R., ed. by Rudolf Schlesinger (London, Routledge & 
Kegan Paul, 1949), p. 292 (quoted from Wolf son's Socialism and the 
Family) . 



Principles of Communist Morality 245 

Two years ago there was no bridegroom for me — no dowry ! Now 
I have 500 labor days, and the resuU is: I cannot rid myself of 
would-be suitors who say they want to marry me. But now I shall 
look around and make my choice. 

The fusion of economic and moral values is certainly 
not a distinguishing feature of Soviet ethics. It makes ap- 
parently little difference whether the "dowry" is counted 
in labor days or in stocks, securities, real estate, but, ac- 
cording to Western standards, such fusion is considered as 
amoral and is covered up by ideological commitments. In 
Soviet ethics, the "ideological veil" is much thinner, is al- 
most nonexistent; love and work efficiency are made to go 
together quite well. The societal conditions of love are 
brought into the light of consciousness and of political regu- 
lation. This is shocking to Western ethics, and the loss is 
really great: it affects the most cherished images and ideals 
of Western culture. As Wolf son puts it: 

In the conditions of socialism, [the theme of Romeo and Juliet] 
has outlived itself. Socialist society offers no scope for the tragic 
collisions which are produced by capitalism where social condi- 
tions prevent the union of lovers, their association in marriage 
and the family. ^^ 

The statement reveals more than what its crudity sug- 
gests. The story of Romeo and Juliet certainly depends on 
the "social conditions which prevent the union of the 
lovers" — as do the stories of Tristan and Isolde, Don 
Juan, Madame Bovary, Anna Karenina. But these social 
conditions define not only the unhappiness but also the 
happiness of their love because they create tlie dimension 

""Ibid., p. 300. 



246 Ethical Tenets 

in which love has become what it is: a relation between in- 
dividuals which is antagonistic to the res publica and which 
draws all its joy and all its pain from this antagonism. If 
Tristan and Isolde, Romeo and Juliet, and their like are 
unimaginable as healthily married couples engaged in 
productive work, it is because their (socially conditioned) 
"unproductiveness" is the essential quality of what they 
stand for and die for — values that can be realized only in 
an existence outside and against the repressive social group 
and its rules. The more this love obeys its own laws, the 
more it threatens to violate the laws of the social commu- 
nity. Western civilization has recognized this conflict and 
made it an essential element of its ethics. Law stands 
against law, value against value — there is no moral deci- 
sion as to which law shall prevail. Two value systems, two 
ethics, exist side by side, each in its own right — and each 
is to assert its own right. The dual morality pertains not 
only to the erotic loyalty which Western ethics celebrates, 
but also to other loyalties when group conflicts with group, 
cause with cause, tradition with tradition. Antigone is right 
against Creon as Creon is right against Antigone; the revo- 
lution is right against the status quo as the status quo is 
right against the revolution. By sustaining each of the con- 
flicting parties in its own right, the dual morality has justi- 
fied individual and group aspirations which transgress the 
restrictive social order; the end of the dual morality would 
mean the end of an entire period of civilization. 

With the conquest of the erotic danger zone by the state, 
the public control of individual needs would be completed. 
Effective barriers would have been erected in the very in- 
stincts of man against his liberation. If and when the sec- 



Principles of Communist Morality 247 

ond phase is reached with the distribution of the social 
product according to individual needs, these needs them- 
selves will be such that they perpetuate "spontaneously" 
their political administration. As long as the res publica 
is not the res of the individuals who are its members and 
citizens, the harmonization of private sexual morality with 
political morality, with the res publica must be repressive. 
The best it can achieve is probably a higher degree of ra- 
tionality in ethics, for example, by reduction or avoidance 
of conflicts, of neurosis, of private, personal unhappiness. 
This may be a goal worth striving for, provided happiness 
does not mean a state of mental and phychical impoverish- 
ment. If the harmonization succeeds within the framework 
of authoritarian administration, it would only add one de- 
cisive dimension — that of erotic needs — to the adminis- 
tered social needs. The development of harmonious love 
relations would become part of the "science of consump- 
tion" which looms on the horizon. A very frank statement 
to this effect was made by S. G. Strumilin at the conference 
of the Economics Institute in Jime, 1950: 

Before speaking about distribution according to needs, the needs 
being referred to must be clearly defined. The needs of the mem- 
bers of the communist society are the needs of educated, cultured 
people who do not abuse their opportunities of obtaining con- 
sumers' goods. A science of consumption is already being created 
now. An Institute of Nutrition, which studies rational norms of 
nourishment, exists in the USSR. People's requirements under 
communism will be extremely diverse and individual, but on an 
average there must be a gravitation toward fixed norms which 
would completely satisfy the needs of socially developed people. ^^ 

" Voprosy Ekonomiki (Problems of Economics), 1950, No. 10, as translated 
in Current Digest of the Soviet Press, III, No. 2 (February 24, 1951) , 7. 



12. Ethics and Productivity 



IT IS NOTEWORTHY that somc of the most significant fea- 
tures of Soviet ethical philosophy long predate the Stalinist 
period. The repressive and rigid morality of this period is 
usually sharply contrasted with the licentious twenties, 
when sexual morality was factually and legally free to a 
degree unknown in previous history. The contrast is partly 
justified: the "heroic period" of the Russian Revolution 
had quite different ethical as well as political values. How- 
ever, as the two periods share certain long-range objectives 
of socialism in one country and orbit, so they do certain 
political elements of morality. Kollontai, who is con- 
sidered as the representative spokesman of revolutionary 
sexual morality, sees in childbearing and child raising a 
mode of "productive labor," and brands the prostitute 
as a "deserter from the ranks of productive labor." ^ The 
antagonism between private and public morality, which 
Kollontai regards as characteristic of bourgeois ethics, is 
in her ethical philosophy to be reconciled by "social feel- 
ings" which could not be generated by the individualist 
morale of bourgeois society. In socialist society, the "col- 

^ Prostitutsiia i mery bor'by s nei (Prostitution and the Measures of the 
Struggle Against It) (Moscow, Gosudarstvennoe Izd., 1921), pp. 22-23. 



Ethics and Productivity 249 

lective" has become a reality which "excludes any possi- 
bility of the existence of isolated, self-enclosed family 
cells." ^ But already at that time, the new morale was that 
of a work collective rather than of a community of free 
individuals. Productivity, "development of the productive 
forces," is then and now the ethical value which is to gov- 
ern the personal as well as the societal relationships. 

The ethical connotation of the term "productivity," or 
"productive," refers, since the formation of the "capitalist 
spirit," to the output of material as well as cultural goods 
with a market value — goods which satisfy a social need. 
Marx, who maintained that there was a necessary corre- 
lation between growing productivity and impoverishment 
imder capitalism, expressed the repressive character of 
this notion of productivity by reserving the term "produc- 
tive" only for labor creating surplus value, and designat- 
ing all other modes of labor, including independent crea- 
tive intellectual work, as "unproductive." The discrepancy 
between social and individual needs, social and individual 
productivity, must, according to Marxian theory, prevail 
as long as social production is not collectively controlled 
by the individuals whose labor produces the social wealth. 
Short of this revolution in the mode of production, the 
discrepancy will remain: what is good for society and for 
the state, is not necessarily good for the individual. And 
by the same token, as long as the state remains a superim- 
posed independent power, personal relationships cannot 
be dissolved into a res publica without remodeling them 
according to the repressive needs of the latter. Under such 

* Ibid., p. 22. 



250 Ethical Tenets 

conditions, the output of children is indeed productive in 
the same sense as is that of machine tools, and a loving hus- 
band and father is "good" in the same sense as is an ef- 
ficient factory w^orker. 

The subordination of individual morality to the de- 
velopment of the productive forces was greatly strength- 
ened by the changes in Soviet ethics during the Stalinist 
period, i.e., by the restoration of a rigid, disciplinatory, 
authoritarian morality in the early thirties. The facts are 
well known and may just be recalled: tightening of the 
marriage and divorce laws; reemphasis on the family and 
its responsibility; praise of "productive" sexual relations; 
reintroduction of authoritarian education, and so forth. 
However, it is not the philosophical content of Soviet ethics 
that has changed, but rather its social content, namely, the 
level and scope of industrialization and the international 
framework within which industrialization takes place. 
With the first Five-Year Plan, the Soviet Union entered 
the long-range economic, political, and strategic competi- 
tion with the advanced countries of the West, while the 
"end of capitalist stabilization" failed to produce a "rise 
in the revolutionary tide": isolation and conflict rather 
than an international spread of socialism seemed to be the 
prospect.^ The reestablishment of authoritarianism in 
ethics was clearly part of the general tightening of controls 
— part of the mental and physical preparation for war, 
toil, and discipline. 

But if the elimination of libertinarian ethics belongs to 
the requirements of primary industrialization, why does 

* See Part I, pp. 50 £f. 



Ethics and Productivity 251 

the struggle against these ethics continue after the creation 
of the industrial base, with growing productivity and so- 
cial wealth? Surely the Stalinist policy of totalitarianism 
has paid off: the use of formerly denounced methods of 
"capitalist industrialization" (rigidly enforced labor dis- 
cipline, long working day, "scientific management," direc- 
torial authority, piece wage and bonus system, competitive 
profitability) have enabled the Soviet economy to "tele- 
scope" several stages of industrial development into two 
decades. However, the Soviet system, like its counterpart, 
is self-propelling in the sense that continuous gro^vih of 
labor-productivity and continuous rationalization become 
the inherent mechanisms which keep the system going. At 
the same time, the continued existence of the "capitalist 
environment" and the maintenance of the preparedness 
economy also make the centralized control of individual 
needs self-propelling — even though the rate of progress al- 
lows relaxation. Soviet ethics testifies to the conflict be- 
tween increasing productivity and wealth on the one hand 
and the social need for toil and renunciation on the other. 
The greater the possibility of using the former for satisfy- 
ing individual wants and enhancing individual liberty, the 
greater the need for minimizing the contradiction without 
weakening the driving power which propels the system. As 
industrialization progresses and economic competition with 
the West becomes more imperative, terror becomes unprof- 
itable and unproductive. It is no durable substitute for the 
productive and rational coordination which a highly de- 
veloped industrial society requires; these requirements 
must be injected into the individuals and become their own 



252 Ethical Tenets 

moral values. What could be left free from institutionalized 
control and to the pressure of external forces and circum- 
stances during the "heroic period" of the Revolution, what 
was implemented by terror during the Stalinist period, 
must now be normalized and made a calculable resource 
in the moral and emotional household of the individuals. 
Morality, in the form of an efficient organization of values 
guiding individual behavior inside and outside the plant 
or farm or office assumes decisive significance as an in- 
tegral part of progressing rationalization. Thus it is only 
an apparent paradox that Soviet ethical philosophy con- 
tinues to taboo — although in a very different form — the 
libertarian ideas of the revolutionary period at a stage when 
their realization seems more logical than at the stage of 
extreme scarcity and weakness. 

But with growing productivity and spreading industri- 
alization, international competition is intensified. Within 
the Soviet state, shortage continues and demands intensive 
mobilization. While sexual morality has to be sustained 
and the sexual emancipation of women has to be restricted, 
female labor power must be emancipated beyond the tra- 
ditional restrictions. According to Soviet ethics, one of 
the highest values which elevates communist morality over 
bourgeois morality is the abolition of patriarchal domina- 
tion and the establishment of equality between the sexes. 
Soviet spokesmen do not conceal the economic rationale 
for the new ethics of equality. In a representative justifica- 
tion of Soviet policies in connection with the antiabortion 
legislation of 1936, Wolfson discussed the emancipation 
of women in the Soviet Union chiefly from the point of view 



Ethics and Productivity 253 

of the emancipation of female labor productivity. "So- 
cialist society has created conditions in which the work of 
rearing and educating children leaves woman a chance of 
combining her maternal functions and duties with active, 
productive and social work." ^ He pointed out that "the 
composition of skilled labor in the U.S.S.R. has been 
sharply modified towards an equalization of female with 
male labor," and he regards as the "most interesting point" 
the fact that "Soviet women have gained and continue to 
gain in those branches of industry which are closed to 
women in capitalist society." As an example he mentioned 
the high rate of female labor in the mining and metal in- 
dustries.^ The equality of women is not confined to the 
field of manual labor. "Many women occupy an honored 
place in the ranks of innovators of industry, transport, and 
agriculture, and of scientific and cultural figures"; they 
"participate actively in the management of the Soviet 
state." ^ Here, Soviet society has probably surpassed the 
older industrial countries — but until the growing produc- 
tivity is controlled by the individuals themselves, the eco- 
nomic and cultural emancipation of women gives them only 
an equal share in the system of alienated labor. 

It thus appears that the methodical increase in human 
productivity is mainly an increase in "abstract" labor 
power, whose value is measured in terms of the calculated 

* Quoted from Socialism and the Family, in Changing Attitudes in Soviet 
Russia: The Family in the U.S.S.R., ed. by Rudolf Schlesinger (London, 
Routledge & Kegan Paul, 1949), p. 283. 

^Ibid., p. 287. 

'I. S. Kon, Razvitie lichnosti pri sotsializme (The Development of Per- 
sonality under Socialism) (Leningrad, Vsesoiuznoe obshchestvo po raspro- 
straneniiu politicheskikh i nauchnykh znanii, 1954), p. 16. 



254 Ethical Tenets 

social need. The distinctions adhering to the concrete work 
of the individuals are reduced to this common denominator 
(which allows for a whole system of quantifiable differ- 
ences, expressed in the large wage differentials). For the 
individuals, this means training for technical productivity: 
the social need is chiefly expressed in scientifically or- 
ganized and rationalized labor time. In Part I of this study, 
we have stressed the policy of using whatever working time 
may be saved for universal vocational education.' Such 
education tends to develop the individual as an all-round 
technical instrument (with a highly developed technical 
intelligence). To be sure, vocational training is to be sup- 
plemented by an ever better education for "higher culture" 
— the technical and political individual is to be the cultured 
individual. But the same historical trend which establishes 
the predominance of technological rationality within a re- 
pressive political system also vitiates the efforts to rescue 
the ethics of higher culture. The latter was the product of a 
civilization in which the ruling groups were genuine leisure 
classes; their "unproductive" existence (in terms of so- 
cially necessary labor) provided the cultural climate. In 
other words, "higher culture" depended on the institution- 
alized and ethically sanctioned separation of intellectual 
from manual labor. The values of the "personality" were 
not supposed to be and could not be practiced "on the side" : 
they were meant to shape the entire individual existence. In 
contrast, industrial civilization has progressively reduced 
the distinction between manual and intellectual labor by 
subjecting the latter to the values of commodity exchange, 

"" See especially pp. 181 ff. above. 



Ethics and Productivity 255 

and has progressively denied the ethical value of an "un- 
productive" leisure class. Deprived of its social basis for 
resistance, culture has become a cog in the machine — part 
of the administered private and public existence. 

The ethics of productivity expresses the fusion of techno- 
logical and political rationality which is characteristic of 
Soviet society at its present stage. At this stage, the fusion 
is clearly repressive of its own potentialities with respect to 
individual liberty and happiness. Freed from politics which 
must prevent the collective individual control of technics 
and its use for individual gratification, technological ra- 
tionality may be a powerful vehicle of liberation. But then, 
the question arises whether the ethics of productivity does 
not contain tendencies pushing beyond the restrictive po- 
litical framework. The question clearly parallels the one 
asked in Part I of this study: there,*^ we suggested that, 
under the condition of international "normalization," the 
development of the productive forces in the Soviet sys- 
tem may tend to "overflow" its repressive regimentation 
and vitiate possible political countermeasures designed to 
perpetuate regimentation. Now the question arises whether 
there is any corresponding trend in the development of 
individual productivity. The latter is, of course, part of 
the former, but as such it is a subjective factor whose 
laws of motion remain its own even if they are "given" 
from outside (by the state or by the society). Does the 
development of individual productivity as technical pro- 
ductivity perhaps tend to overflow its political direction — 
and limitation? Any attempt even at a preliminary answer 

* See especially pp. 185 ff. 



256 Ethical Tenets 

would involve a sociological and psychological discussion 
far beyond the framework of this study. However, because 
of the importance of the question for the evaluation of 
prospective Soviet developments we venture to offer some 
suggestions. 

One fact seems to be of foremost significance: in Soviet 
society, there seem to be no inherent forces which resist ac- 
celerated and extensive automation — either on the part of 
management or on the part of labor. The transfer of socially 
necessary and unpleasant work from the human organism 
to the machine is therefore bound to progress rather rapidly 
— the more so since it is one of the most effective weapons in 
the competitive struggle with the Western world. Naturally, 
the saving of human energy thus achieved is largely can- 
celled in its liberating effect by the repressive usage of 
technology: length of the working day, speed-up methods, 
production of waste, and so forth. It is this usage of tech- 
nology which makes for its dehumanizing and destructive 
features: a restrictive social need determines technical 
progress. Any reorganization of the technical apparatus 
with a view to the best possible satisfaction of individual 
needs presupposes a "redefinition" of the social need 
which determines technology. In other words, the truly 
liberating effects of technology are not implied in tech- 
nological progress per se; they presuppose social change, 
involving the basic economic institutions and relationships. 

Would the nationalization of the economy perhaps en- 
able Soviet society to skip, as it were, tliis stage of social 
change and require only political change, i.e., transfer of 
control from above to below while retaining the same so- 



Ethics and Productivity 257 

cial base (nationalization)?* The prospects for such a 
development are linked to the international balance of 
power. It is precisely the international situation (of "co- 
existence") which enforces accelerated and extensive auto- 
mation in Soviet society. As long as this international situa- 
tion prevails, technological rationality tends to militate 
against the restrictive political rationality and to drive the 
latter toward liberalization on the established base. 

The technological rationality also contains an element of 
playfulness which is constrained and distorted by the re- 
pressive usage of technology: playing with (the possibilities 
of) things, with their combination, order, form, and so 
forth. If no longer under the pressure of necessity, this ac- 
tivity would have no other aim than growth in the con- 
sciousness and enjoyment of freedom. Indeed, technical 
productivity might then be the very opposite of specializa- 
tion and pertain to the emergence of that "all-round indi- 
vidual" who looms so large in Marxian theory — a theory 
which, in its inner logic, is based on the idea of the com- 
pleted rationalization of necessary labor, on the truly 
technical administration of things. 

Needless to say, the present reality is so far removed 
from this possibility that the latter appears as idle specu- 
lation. However, the forces inherent in a systematically 
progressing industrialization are such that they deserve 
consideration even if the strongest political forces seem to 
arrest or suppress them. 

®The distinction between social and political change is, of course, very 
precarious, but here it might serve to underline the difference between a 
devlopment involving a change in the economic structure of society (for 
example, from private enterprise to nationalization or socialization) and 
changes within an established economic structure. 



13. The Trend of Communist Morality 



WE HAVE SUGGESTED that the common requirements of in- 
dustrialization make for a high degree of similarity be- 
tween the featured values of "bourgeois" and Soviet ethics; 
such similarity appears in the work morality as well as in 
the sexual morality. Soviet ethical philosophy itself takes 
cognizance of this relation between the two antagonistic 
systems by claiming that the ethical values which were 
vitiated by bourgeois society are being realized in Soviet 
society — that what had to remain an ideology in the 
former could become a reality in the latter. The claim of 
Soviet ethics that, in the Soviet Union, ethical principles 
govern reality rather than ideology may be just as easily 
disputed as similar claims in the West. But in spite of 
all similarity, the question would still be open whether, 
from the social function of Soviet ethics, a different pros- 
pect of development may be inferred. The technical- 
economic base of Soviet ethics per se does not "prescribe" 
any such prospects: it makes for the affinity as well as 
for the fundamental difference between the systems. The 
common requirements of industrialization may define the 
affinity; the essentially different mode of industrialization 
may generate the essential difference behind the appar- 
ently identical values. 



Trend of Communist Morality 259 

When we now try to identify the prospective direction 
of Soviet ethics, we take again the illuminating statement 
on Romeo and Juliet as a starting point. The statement 
proclaims the passing of the bourgeois individual by his 
fulfillment in the res publica and thereby the passing of 
the autonomous "subject" which, as ego cogitans and 
agens, was to be the beginning and the end of Westem 
culture. In the telescoped Soviet scheme, the dissolution 
of the autonomous "bourgeois" individual would corre- 
spond to the latest stage of the prevalent industrial civili- 
zation, where mass production and mass manipulation 
lead to the shrinking of the ego and to the administrative 
regulation of his material and intellectual needs. The co- 
ordination between private and public existence, which, 
at the postliberal stage of Western society, takes place 
largely unconsciously and behind the backs of the indi- 
viduals, occurs, in the Soviet Union, in the light of a well- 
trained consciousness and as a publicized program. It is 
part of the total mobilization of the individuals for the 
requirements of competitive total industrialization. Here, 
and only here, are the remnants and relics of preindustrial 
culture conquered: the romantic elements of the individ- 
ual, especially in erotic relations, which were almost iden- 
tical with "unproductive," socially unuseful relations, are 
made congruous with and conducive to political, socially 
useful work relations. If this indoctrination is effective, it 
would mean, to the individual, the loss of the entire sphere 
in which his existence was still free from the needs of the 
res publica; to the state, it would mean control over one 
of the danger zones in which explosive demands and as- 



260 Ethical Tenets 

pirations could be kept alive. With the passing of the in- 
dividual, the ethical values lose their autonomous charac- 
ter, and this loss is not compensated by transcendental 
sanctions and promises. Ethics as a philosophical and 
existential discipline in its own right disappears. 

But the validity of ethics does not necessarily depend 
on autonomy or on transcendental sanction. If it did, civi- 
lized society would long since have exploded, for the au- 
tonomous personality and the efficacy of transcendence 
have become increasingly corroded by the growth of tech- 
nological controls. Sanction may indeed come from the 
res publica instead of being vested in a transcendental 
agency or in the moral autonomy of the individual con- 
science. However, such sanction would be ethically bind- 
ing for the individual (i.e., would be more than external 
or internalized compulsion) only if the res publica, in its 
institutions, were to protect and promote a truly human ex- 
istence for all individuals. Ethics may indeed be political in 
substance. Nor is it obvious that an effective system of 
overtly political ethics must necessarily result in a totalitar- 
ian state of robots. The pattern of behavior which Soviet 
ethics envisages would presuppose that human existence as 
well as society is rebuilt: the "bourgeois individual," whose 
substance is to a great extent apart from the res publica 
and whose needs are apart from the social need, would 
give way to an individual who is an integral part of the 
res publica because his needs are at the same time social 
needs. Theoretically and historically, such a development 
is not impossible: political philosophy has described it as 
"community" [Gemeinschaft) against "society" {Gesell- 



Trend of Communist Morality 261 

schaft), as the ideal "Polis," or, in Hegelian terms, as the 
harmony of the universal and the particular; its interpre- 
tation in Soviet ethics makes use of the Marxian idea of 
classless society as the association of "all-round individ- 
uals." In all these theories, the realization of such a har- 
mony between the ethical and the political values pre- 
supposes a free and rational organization of social labor, 
that is, the disappearance of the state as an independent 
power over and above and against the individuals; whereas 
Soviet ethics fuses ethical and political values in and for 
a state which wields independent power over the individ- 
uals. As long as this situation prevails, the new ethics will 
continue to function as a subservient instrument for the 
primary social objective of the state, that is, in the pres- 
ent period, the objective of total industrialization. 

However, even at this stage, where Soviet ethics merely 
seems to recapture and "catch up" with the initial func- 
tion of "bourgeois ethics," the different social basis of the 
former does not preclude a different trend of development. 
Once firmly established, the basic societal institutions en- 
force and perpetuate the morality which their effective 
functioning demands. In the Soviet case, this process is 
not left to the slow but almost automatic impact of the 
institutions on individual behavior and values — rather, it 
is systematically directed by the political agencies. But 
this does not arrest the dynamic according to which the 
people thus conditioned must in turn influence the de- 
velopment of the conditioning system. No matter how 
thoroughly they are controlled and how deeply they are 
conditioned, they perform the necessary labor which re- 



262 Ethical Tenets 

produces the controlled society. Thus, no matter how "ab- 
stract" and "general" this labor may be, they remain the 
ultimate "productive force." We have suggested that the 
reemphasis on the "bourgeois values" in the construction 
of socialism recaptures that stage of ethics where the state 
relies on the "introjection" of the socially required values 
rather than on their extraneous imposition, on "spontane- 
ous" reproduction of ethical behavior rather than on ter- 
roristic enforcement. But here the "human material" with 
which Soviet ethics works militates against a mere repeti- 
tion of the process of "bourgeois ethics." 

In the Western tradition, the introjection of ethical 
values took place in and with the "individual": his eman- 
cipation from older traditional economic, political, and 
ideological bonds was the precondition for the efficacy of 
the process. Man's separation from the state, from the 
community, from custom and tradition, his antagonistic 
relation to them as well as to the new powers and institu- 
tions was to be prerequisite to his moral autonomy, to the 
spontaneous, internal elaboration and reproduction of ethi- 
cal values. Only on such ground could introjection become 
genuine internalization, that is, demands of the individual's 
own conscience and faith. Their validity is thereby greatly 
strengthened. They do not appear as imposed upon the 
individual from outside but rather as flowing from the 
individual's own ideal nature, sanctioned not by force but 
by universally valid ethical laws, and obedience to them 
tends to become instinctual and almost automatic. Duty, 
work, and discipline then serve as ends in themselves, no 
longer dependent on rational justification in terms of their 



Trend of Communist Morality 263 

actual necessity. Renunciation becomes an integral part 
of the individual's mental household (part of his con- 
stitution, as it were), transmitted from generation to gen- 
eration through education and the social climate; it does 
not have to be enforced continually by specific political 
and economic measures. However, in Soviet society, this 
process from the beginning is counteracted by the politi- 
calization of ethics, by the absorption of the individual 
into the res publica. The externalization of ethical values 
allows only for a very low degree of internalization. With 
the dissolution of the traditional substance of the indi- 
vidual, the basis of internalization is undermined. All ethi- 
cal values are systematically referred to the requirements 
of Soviet society: the specific situation of this society, and 
the objectives and needs of the Soviet state are to validate 
moral norms. This reference, and this mode of validation 
is made explicit and perpetually brought to consciousness. 
We have tried to show that the political externalization 
of ethics is ultimately guided by an absolute, i.e., com- 
munism, and thus distinguished from pragmatistic rela- 
tivism. But the absolute standard pertains ultimately to the 
goal toward which society is to move — not to the moral 
(and technical) instrumentalities for attaining the goal. 
No matter how close the latter are identified with the for- 
mer, the moral norms are not ends in themselves; they aim 
at the future, and they obtain their sanction only from 
the societal norms formulated for the future by the state 
and its organs. Thus, toil as such is not a value, but only 
toil for socialism and communism ; not all competitive be- 
havior but only socialist competition; not property but 



264 Ethical Tenets 

only socialist property; not patriotism but only Soviet pa- 
triotism, and so forth. To the individual, this makes no 
difference as long as he has no choice and as long as the 
state defines what socialism and communism are and en- 
forces the definition. However, the weakness of internaliza- 
tion impairs the social cohesion and the depth of morality. 
Soviet ethics is rationalistic to an extent which may en- 
danger its stabilization at the desired level. In the first 
part of this study,^ we have stressed the magical and ritual 
elements in Soviet Marxism. In this connection, we have 
suggested that even these apparently irrational elements 
operate in the service of the overriding rationality of the 
system. Its rationalism is inherent in the methodical ori- 
entation of moral norms on the "absolute" communist 
goal, which is in turn rationally defined in verifiable terms. 
Whether the working day is reduced to five hours and less 
or not, whether the individual's free time is really his or 
not, whether he must "earn his living" by procuring the 
necessities of life or not, whether he can freely choose his 
occupation or not — all these can be verified by the indi- 
viduals themselves. No matter how regimented and ma- 
nipulated the latter may be, they will know whether 
communism thus defined is a fact or not. Here lies the 
decisive difference between Soviet social philosophy on 
the one hand, and fascist and nazi on the other. The latter 
center around essentially a-rational, pseudonatural en- 
tities such as race, blood, charismatic leadership. No mat- 
ter how rational the actual organization of the fascist and 
nazi state may have been (the total mobilization and the 

' See Chap. 3, especially pp. 87 ff. 



Trend of Communist Morality 265 

total war economy in Germany belong to the most efficient 
performances of modern industrial civilization), this state 
itself was irrational in its historical function; that is to 
say, it arrested the development of the material and cul- 
tural resources for human needs and organized them in the 
interest of destructive domination. Its inherent goal con- 
stituted the historical limit of the fascist state. In contrast, 
Soviet rationalism does not stop at the instrumentalities 
but extends to the direction and goal of social organiza- 
tion. Marxian doctrine provides the conceptual link. The 
definition of communism in terms of a production and 
distribution of social wealth according to freely develop- 
ing individual needs, in terms of a quantitative and quali- 
tative reduction of work for the necessities, of the free 
choice of functions — these notions certainly appear to be 
unrealistic in the light of the present state of affairs. But 
in themselves they are rational; moreover, technical prog- 
ress and the growing productivity of labor make evolution 
toward this future a rational possibility. 

The question whether or not the structure of the Soviet 
regime precludes the future realization of the possibility 
has been discussed in the first part of this study." There we 
have suggested that the continued promulgation and in- 
doctrination in Marxism may still turn out to be a danger- 
ous weapon for the Soviet rulers. Thus far, the regime has 
tried to reconcile ideology and reality by justifying its 
basic policy in Marxian terms. The repressive morality 
canonized during the Stalinist period is said to express tlie 
objective requirements of the first phase, that is, the con- 

* See Part I, Chap. 6. 



266 Ethical Tenets 

struction of an adequate socialist base. The ethics of work 
and leisure discipline, of competitive patriotism in love 
and toil — the entire morality of political Puritanism — is 
supposed to conform to the stage of socialism which was 
compelled by scarcity to evaluate individual behavior ac- 
cording to its socially useful performance. The ethical ra- 
tionale is identified with the sociological rationale. 

If this identification, which is essential to the Soviet 
ideology, is to be maintained, long-range changes in the 
development of society must be accompanied by changes 
in the ideology: the repressive morality must be reduced 
with the progressive reduction of scarcity. In the first part 
of this study, we have proposed that continued growth in 
productivity under circumstances of long-range "peaceful 
coexistence" would tend to such reduction. If the Soviet 
regime cannot or does not wish to relax correspondingly 
the repressive morality, it would become increasingly ir- 
rational according to its own standards. This irrationality 
in turn would tend to weaken the moral fiber of Soviet so- 
ciety. The whole indoctrination was focused on the ra- 
tionality of the objectives in the individual as well as gen- 
eral interest; faith in this rationality seems to have been 
a decisive element in the popular strength of the regime. 
Here the limits of internalization, which seem to be in- 
herent in the prevailing structure of Soviet ethics, may 
prove to be decisive. Its values are not autonomous since 
they are in the last analysis validated by an "external" 
political goal. Only thoroughly internalized ethics can in 
the long run operate with autonomous values, and only a 
high degree of ethical autonomy can in the long run sustain 



Trend of Communist Morality 267 

calculable and durable ethical behavior reasonably inde- 
pendent of the vicissitudes of individual existence. Only 
on such ground can the individual be made morally shock- 
proof against socially required sacrifices, injustices, and 
inequalities which appear as irrational. The political ra- 
tionality of Soviet ethics militates against such moral 
shockproofing of the individual and sustains the idea that 
the potentialities for human development should grow in 
accord with the growing social productivity of Soviet so- 
ciety. Ideological pressure thus seems to tend in the same 
direction as technical-economic pressure, namely, toward 
the relaxation of repression. To be sure, ideological pres- 
sure and even the weakening of the established morality 
are not per se a serious threat to a regime which has at 
its disposal all the instruments for enforcing its objectives. 
However, substantially linked with the economic and politi- 
cal dynamic on an international scale, these forces, though 
unformed and unorganized, may well determine, to a con- 
siderable extent, the course of Soviet developments. 



Index 



Aesthetics, see Art 
Aleksandrov debate, 11, 128 
Alienation, 196, 208, 234 f., 238 
Art: and realism, 128 (I.; Hegel on, 
130 f.; in Soviet society, 131 £F. 

Bernstein, Eduard, 28, 31, 148, 242 
Bolshevik Revolution, 11, 42, 43, 

121, 150, 197 
Bourgeois-democratic revolution, 43, 

71 ff. 
Brecht, Bert, 129 
Bucharin, N. I., 64 
Bureaucracy, Soviet, 108 fi., 115 ff., 

171 

Capitalism, 6, 27, 161 ; as a precondi- 
tion for Socialism, 19 f ., 43 f. ; un- 
even development of, 42; Soviet 
Marxist analysis of, 50 ff.; "gen- 
eral crisis," 58 ff., 165 f. 

Class struggle, 23, 54, 96 f. 

Coexistence, 7, 62 ff., 70, 80, 93, 100, 
116, 118, 155, 159, 173, 176, 178, 
185, 197, 257 

Common interest, 117 f. 

Communist morality, see Morality, 
Communist 

Contradictions, interimperialist, 49, 
65 f., 99; internal and external, 
79 f ., 94, 97 ff. ; in Soviet society, 
108, 166 f.; antagonistic and non- 
antagonistic, 153 f. 

Control, social, 110 ff. 



Dewey, John, 224, 226, 228 ff. 

Dialectic, 136 ff., 227; Hegelian, 137, 
138 ff., 151, 158; Marxian, 141 f., 
158; Soviet, 141 ff., 169 £.; Engels 
on, 142 f. 

Education, Stalin on, 182 f. 

Engels, Friedrich, 21, 22 f., 69, 74, 
104, 105, 120 ff., 167, 168, 180, 183, 
200, 222; and dialectic, 138, 
142 ff.; and freedom, 152 

Ethics, Soviet, 197, 201 ff., 210 ff., 
228, 259 ff.; Western, 198 ff., 204, 
211 f., 232, 246, Soviet criticism of, 
225 ff.; and politics, 220 ff.; Soviet 
compared with Western, 258 

Fascism, 51 ff., 75 

Foster, William, 90 

Freedom, 20, 92, 117, 125 f., 129 f., 
132 f., 196, 213, 215 f.. 221 f.. 231. 
235, 257; logic of, 140 f.: Hegel 
on, 140 f., 152, 223; and necessity, 
151 f., 222 f.; and security, 191, 
205 ff.; Western notion of, 198. 
205 ff., 211 f.; Marx on, 201, 208; 
and Soviet society, 207 f. 

Freud, Sigmund, 224 

Hegel, G. W. F., 220, 261 ; and his- 
torical law, 2ff. ; and freedom, 2, 
152, 222 f.; and Marx, 2 f ., 154; 
and art, 130 f.; and dialectic, 
137 f. 



270 

Hilferding, Rudolf, 32 f., 47, 64 
Historical laws, 2 ff., 6 
Historical necessity and Soviet ethic, 
219 

Ideology, discussion of, 91, 124 ff. 
Imperialism, 28 f., 46 fE., 60, 62, 76, 

161 f. 
Intelligentsia, see Bureaucracy 
Interest, real and immediate, in 

Leninism, 41 f.; in Soviet Marxism 

after Lenin, 96, 118 f. 

Kautsky, Karl, 31, 33, 103 
Kollantai, A., 248 
Khrushchev, Nikita, 169, 177 
Kuusinen, O., 54 

Lenin, V. I., 64, 70, 99, 116; reinter- 
pretation of Marx, 40 ff. ; on com- 
munist morality, 214 ff. 

Leninism, 11, 29 ff., 74 ff. 

Linguistics debate, 158 f. 

Logic, 139 f., 157; formal and dia- 
lectical, 156 ff. 

Luxemburg, Rosa, 64 

Magic, and language, 88 f.; and art, 
133 f. 

Malenkov, G. M., 174, 177 

Marr, N. J., 157 ff. 

Marshall Plan, 56, 68 

Marx, Karl : on historical laws, 2 f . ; 
on transition to socialism, 17 ff.; 
distinction between real and im- 
mediate interest, 23 f., 41, 118 f.; 
on the proletarian party, 26; no- 
tion of freedom, 233; notion of 
work, 234 f. 

Molotov, V. M., 177 

Morality, Communist, 214 f., 231 ff.; 
and love, 243 ff.; and productivity, 
248 ff. 

Nationalization, 81 f., 86, 93 f., 238, 

256 f. 
Nietzsche, Friedrich, 224, 228 



Index 

Philosophy, views on, 125 ff. 

Plato, and art, 132, 135; and ethics, 
220 f. 

Proletariat, 9, 15, 18, 24 f., 26, 28, 
40 f., 103 f., 125; class conscious- 
ness of, 18 f., 22 f., 27 

Rationalization: in first phase of so- 
cialism, 20; and freedom, 20; and 
"exploitation," 68; technological, 
84, 251 

Reason, in Hegel, 2, 139, 223; idea 
of, in Western civilization, 83 ff. ; 
and freedom, 85, 89, 125 f., 182, 
202, 224 

Reification, 24 

Ritualization of Marxism, 87 ff. 

Rozental, M. M., 150 

Schopenhauer, Arthur, 224, 228 

Security and freedom, 191, 206 

Shariia, P., 226 

Social control, 110 ff. 

Social Democracy, 30, 35, 242 

Socialism: two phases of, 20 ff.; con- 
struction of, in Soviet society, 
78 ff.; in one country, 93 ff.; tran- 
sition to communism, 165 ff. 

Socialist state, 21; and democratiza- 
tion, 188 f. 

Stakhanovism, 12, 160. 238 

Stalin, J. v., 53; on interimperialist 
contradictions, 65, 75, 161 f.; on 
the state, 101 f.. Ill; on economic 
problems of socialism, 160 ff. 

Stalinism and Leninism, 74 ff. 

State, 21 f., 66 f.; in Stalin, 101 f.. 
179 ff.; and Soviet society, 107 ff., 
123 ff., 183 f.; in Engels, 120 ff. 

Stepanian, Ts., A., 114 

Strumilin, S. G., 247 

Terror, 112 f., 212, 251 f. 

Trakhtenberg, I., 61 

Trotsky, Leon, 30 

Truth, interpretation of, 86 ff., 226 ff. 

Two-camp doctrine, 56 f . 



Index 271 

Ultraimperialism, 60, 67 Women, emancipation in Soviet so- 

United front policy, 57, 72 f., 173 ciety, 252 f . 

Work, attitude toward, 178, 183, 
Varga, E., 57, 66 f. 233 ff. 

Weber, Max, 185 f. Zhdanov, A., 56 f., 63 



I ^Vi'Rb or CALIFORNIA LIBRARY 



University of California Libraiy 
Los Angeles 

.;;;^lil^^^J^^^DUEon the last date stamped below. 



s'o/sa^"?^^'^ 






■ Win 



Ubi Oc 



Ill 111 



\^ 



J 



¥ 


1 
t 

! 
r! 

; 
■ 




': 

I 

i 

r. 

I 

4; 



